So it's worth taking a guess at what exactly has been going on in Trump's head:



http://www.cbsnews.com/news/60-minutes-donald-trump-family-melania-ivanka-lesley-stahl/
	President-elect Trump speaks to a divided country

	2016 Nov 13

	...Lesley Stahl: FBI director James Comey. Are you going to ask for his resignation?

	Donald Trump: I think that I would rather not comment on that yet. I don't-- I haven't made up my mind. I respect him a lot. I respect the FBI a lot. I think --

	Lesley Stahl: Even though they leak so much?

	Donald Trump: Well, there's been a lotta leaking, there's no question about that. But I would certainly like to talk to him. And see him. This is a tough time for him. And I would like to talk to him before I'd answer a question like that.

	Lesley Stahl: Sounds like you're not sure.

	Donald Trump: Well, sure, I'm not sure. I'd wanna see, you know, he may have had very good reasons for doing what he did.

	Lesley Stahl: Are you gonna release your tax returns?

	Donald Trump: At the appropriate time, I will release them. But right now I'm under routine audit. Nobody cares. The only one who cares is, you know, you and a few people that asked that question. Obviously, the public didn't care because I won the election very easily. So they don't care. I never thought they did care. 


...


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/13/us/politics/russia-hack-election-dnc.html
	The Perfect Weapon: How Russian Cyberpower Invaded the U.S.

	By ERIC LIPTON, DAVID E. SANGER and SCOTT SHANE DEC. 13, 2016 

	But Mr. Obama did decide that he would deliver a warning to Mr. Putin in person at a Group of 20 summit meeting in Hangzhou, China, the last time they would be in the same place while Mr. Obama was still in office. When the two men met for a tense pull-aside, Mr. Obama explicitly warned Mr. Putin of a strong American response if there was continued effort to influence the election or manipulate the vote, according to White House officials who were not present for the one-on-one meeting.

	Later that day, Mr. Obama made a rare reference to America’s own offensive cybercapacity, which he has almost never talked about. “Frankly, both offensively and defensively, we have more capacity,” he told reporters.

	...A week later Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. was sent out to transmit a public warning to Mr. Putin: The United States will retaliate “at the time of our choosing. And under the circumstances that have the greatest impact.”

	Later, after Mr. Biden said he was not concerned that Russia could “fundamentally alter the election,” he was asked whether the American public would know if the message to Mr. Putin had been sent.

	“Hope not,” Mr. Biden responded.

	Some of his former colleagues think that was the wrong answer. An American counterstrike, said Michael Morell, the former deputy director of the C.I.A. under Mr. Obama, has “got to be overt. It needs to be seen.”

	A covert response would significantly limit the deterrence effect, he added. “If you can’t see it, it’s not going to deter the Chinese and North Koreans and Iranians and others.”

	The Obama administration says it still has more than 30 days to do exactly that.


http://money.cnn.com/2016/12/16/technology/obama-us-vulnerable-to-hacking/index.html
	US more vulnerable to hacking than Russia, Obama says
 	December 16, 2016: 7:06 PM ET 


http://www.globalresearch.ca/cias-deputy-director-michael-morell-called-for-washington-to-deliver-a-painful-to-putin-blow-one-week-prior-to-ambassador-assassination/5564085
	CIA Former Deputy Director Called for Washington to Deliver a “Painful to Putin” Blow One Week Prior to Ambassador Assassination

	21 December 2016

	...Six days prior to the assassination, the hawkish former Deputy Director of the CIA (who also served as the Acting Director twice), Michael Morell, called for the US to respond to alleged Russian meddling in the US election by retaliating in a way that was both “overt” and “painful to Putin.” It should be noted that the whole narrative of Russia meddling or hacking is a faux one, as no proof has been presented


(context for Michael Morell:


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/08/05/opinion/campaign-stops/i-ran-the-cia-now-im-endorsing-hillary-clinton.html
	I Ran the C.I.A. Now I’m Endorsing Hillary Clinton.

	By MICHAEL J. MORELL AUG. 5, 2016 


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/trump-reveals-classified-information-russians-oval-office-report-michael-morell/
	"Highly damaging": Ex-CIA deputy director on report Trump revealed classified info

	..."This is highly damaging for two reasons," said former CIA Deputy Director Michael Morell about the reported reveal, which the White House denies. "First, the Russians will undoubtedly try to figure out the source or the method of this information to make sure that it is not also collecting on their activities in Syria -- and in trying to do that they could well disrupt the source."


http://talkingpointsmemo.com/edblog/the-mcmaster-statement
	The story that came out tonight as reported is false. The president of the foreign minister reviewed a range of common threats to our two countries, including threats to civil aviation. At no time, at no time, where intelligent sources or methods discussed. The president did not disclose any military operations that were not already publicly known. 


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/trump-reveals-classified-information-russians-oval-office-report-michael-morell/
	...Pelley asked Morell if he felt better that, according to National Security Adviser Gen. H.R. McMaster, no methods or sources were compromised.

	"Not a lot better… but not sharing that source or method does not make any better the problems I outlined earlier," he said.


http://theweek.com/speedreads/672826/former-cia-chief-suggests-that-intelligence-must-believe-parts-trump-russia-dossier
	Clapper also told Trump he does "not believe the leaks came from within" the U.S. intelligence community. On CNN on Wednesday, former acting CIA Director Michael Morell said that's likely true, noting that the dossier released by BuzzFeed was raw intelligence from a former British spy and not the two-page summary presented to Trump last Friday (also, U.S. intelligence agents would likely have been more careful redacting sensitive information).

	CNN's Christiane Amanpour asked what we can learn from this development. "I was a bit surprised that our intelligence community would take a private document and summarize it for the president and president-elect if they didn't know anything about the credibility of the information in it — that would be, quite frankly, unprecedented," Morell said.


http://www.nbcnews.com/news/us-news/clinton-ally-says-smoke-no-fire-no-russia-trump-collusion-n734176
	Clinton Ally Says Smoke, But No Fire: No Russia-Trump Collusion

	 Morell said he had learned that the former officer, Christopher Steele, paid his key Russian sources, and interviewed them through intermediaries.

	"On the question of the Trump campaign conspiring with the Russians here, there is smoke, but there is no fire, at all," Morell said at an event sponsored by the Cipher Brief, an intelligence web site.

	"There’s no little campfire, there’s no little candle, there’s no spark. And there’s a lot of people looking for it."

	Morell pointed out that former Director of National Intelligence James Clapper said on Meet the Press on March 5 that he had seen no evidence of a conspiracy when he left office January 20.

	"That’s a pretty strong statement by General Clapper," Morell said.

	...Morell said Wednesday that he continues to believe that the Russian campaign of hacking, leaking and fake news, which the CIA says was designed to hurt Clinton and help Trump, was a hugely consequential action to which the U.S. has not sufficiently responded.

	Putin, he said, has suffered no consequence for his unprecedented interference in the U.S. election.

	"This has never happened before in American history on this scale, never not even close. And Putin did not pay any price for this — nothing, zero.")


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2016-12-25/russian-military-plane-crashes-killing-all-92-board-including-60-famous-red-army-cho
	Russian Military Plane Crashes On Route To Syria Killing All On Board, Including 60 Members Of Red Army Choir
	Dec 25, 2016 9:19 AM

	...In televised comments, President Vladimir Putin, speaking in St Petersburg, declared Dec. 26 a national day of mourning. The jet, a Soviet-era Tupolev plane built in 1983, had been carrying 84 passengers and eight crew members.

	Most of the passengers on board were members of the famous Alexandrov Ensemble, better known internationally as the Red Army Choir, the Russian Defense Ministry said. They were travelling from Moscow to the Russian military base Khmeimim near Latakia, Syria to take part in a Christmas celebration with troops deployed there.

	...Kremlin spokesman Dmitry Peskov told reporters it was too early to say what had caused the crash. Putin was being kept constantly informed of the latest developments, Peskov said.


https://www.rt.com/op-edge/371721-tu-154-crash-black-sea/
	Speculation rife after Russian aircraft goes down on way to Syria

	Published time: 25 Dec, 2016 12:59 


http://www.hollywoodreporter.com/news/tom-arnold-claims-journalists-are-looking-supposed-trump-apprentice-tapes-959302
	Tom Arnold Says "Watergate Level Journalists" Are Looking Into Supposed Trump-'Apprentice' Tapes

	12:14 PM PST 12/26/2016 

	Earlier this month, actor Tom Arnold made claims to Dori Monson's Seattle-based radio show that he has unreleased recordings of president-elect Donald Trump making racist, lewd and inflammatory statements when he was host of The Apprentice. Arnold said the tapes allegedly feature Trump using "the N-word," "the C-word" and that he can be heard calling his son a "retard."

	...The actor, who had previously taken to Twitter to say that Trump's camp had contacted him about a defamation suit over the claims, laid out a litany of tweets regarding the tapes

	...I received tape via program Used in our biz 2 prevent piracy. Had a limited time password. When I received no one thought Trump would be Pres. When it became real People got scared. Can't blame them. Me & my fam get threatened by Alt Right nuts a lot plus only Billy Bush's career was hurt by "grab Her by the pussy" tape. Normally I don't think a persons private life should affect job. Didn't say anything about Natl Enquirer paying Off Trumps playmate girlfriends. Plus he'd always been nice to me but he became a bully. John McCain's POW heroism, Cruz's dad killing JFK Etc. Not the guy I knew & he was stoking racism. Lying. Basically saying anything to get elected contradicting himself.

	Then the Russian hack happened. That and him lying about releasing his taxes. I knew he'd spoken to Putin 2013 in Moscow during Miss Universe Contest from NBC guy that was with him. I shot a movie "produced" by one of his bus partners & Putin pal. Very chatty. This was 2015 so Of course he didn't think he was telling tales about what happened in 2013 to a US President. You have to see his taxes. These tapes Are disgusting but not illegal. I'm not going to out the little guy but I personally confronted 7 powerful Hollywood people who have Everything. They hate me now. Terrible career move but I believe if Russia has something they can blackmail our president with its worth The risk to me. Plus I'm a 57 year old father of 1 & 3 yr olds. I want to do all I can so there's a safe America for them. Call me & I Will give you the names of the 7 big shots and you can risk your livelihood and confront them too. All will be reviewed soon. Smart Watergate level journalists are ontop of this. 

    — Tom Arnold (@TomArnold) December 26, 2016


http://www.thedailybeast.com/apprentice-staffers-respond-to-tom-arnold-claims-of-racist-trump-tapes-wtf
	...the idea that Tom Arnold at one point possessed the key to taking down Donald J. Trump has seemed far-fetched, if not quite impossible, in this insane election year.

	...So The Daily Beast did what many other news outlets did: We took Arnold’s story seriously. So far, we have found nothing to support Tom Arnold’s recent claims, besides the word of Tom Arnold.

	The Daily Beast talked to six longtime Apprentice staffers (who, again, spoke on the condition of anonymity due to strict nondisclosure agreements those working on the production had to sign) about the alleged existence of this brutal “outtakes” compilation.

	All of them have tabloid-ready stories to tell about The Donald. None of them could back up Arnold’s story.


http://www.cnbc.com/2016/12/28/us-to-announce-new-sanctions-against-russia-in-response-to-election-hacking.html
	US to announce new sanctions against Russia in response to election hacking
	Wednesday, 28 Dec 2016 4:06 PM ET

	The White House is preparing to announce retaliatory measures against Russia for its role in directing cyber attacks in the United States, two senior officials confirmed to NBC News on Wednesday. 

	... Earlier on Wednesday, Sen. Lindsey Graham said Russia and Vladimir Putin should expect "bipartisan sanctions coming that will hit Russia hard, particularly Putin as an individual."

	In response to Graham's statements, a spokeswoman for Russia's Foreign Ministry promised retaliation in the event of new economic sanctions.

	"To be honest, we are tired of lie about the 'Russian hackers', which is being poured down in the United States from the very top," Russia Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Maria Zakharova said.

	She also called reports of possible new sanctions a "provocation directed by the White House".


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-russia-idUSKBN14I05A?il=0
	Wed Dec 28, 2016 
	Asked about Russia sanctions, Trump says 'we ought to get on with our lives'

	...Asked by reporters if the United States should sanction Russia, Trump replied: "I think we ought to get on with our lives. I think that computers have complicated lives very greatly. The whole age of computer has made it where nobody knows exactly what's going on."

	...Trump said he was not familiar with remarks earlier on Wednesday by Republican Senator Lindsey Graham, who said Russia and President Vladimir Putin should expect tough sanctions for the cyber attacks. 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/global-opinions/2017/02/16/c109bd4a-f491-11e6-8d72-263470bf0401_story.html
	...The White House said in a Dec. 29 conference call with reporters that Obama had informed Trump about the impending sanctions on Dec. 28


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/michael-flynn-in-frequent-contact-with-russias-ambassador-to-u-s/
	During a phone call Friday morning, Trump transition spokesman Sean Spicer said that Flynn had contacted the Russia’s ambassador on Dec. 25 to wish him a Merry Christmas. Spicer also mentioned another contact on Dec. 28, which was the day before the sanctions were announced. He said that on Dec. 28, Flynn texted and called Kislyak to discuss the logistics of setting up a phone call between the president-elect and Russian President Vladimir Putin after Inauguration.

	An update published in the Washington Post, citing a Trump official, said Flynn spoke to Kislyak by phone before the sanctions were announced, and the conversation did not cover the sanctions. The Trump official later told the Post that Flynn expressed condolences to Kislyak over the assassination of the Russian ambassador to Turkey on Dec. 19 and then made a second call on Dec. 28 to express condolences for the crash of a Russian plane traveling to Syria and to set up the call with Putin.


https://obamawhitehouse.archives.gov/the-press-office/2016/12/29/fact-sheet-actions-response-russian-malicious-cyber-activity-and
	December 29, 2016
	FACT SHEET: Actions in Response to Russian Malicious Cyber Activity and Harassment

	Today, President Obama authorized a number of actions in response to the Russian government’s aggressive harassment of U.S. officials and cyber operations aimed at the U.S. election in 2016.  Russia’s cyber activities were intended to influence the election, erode faith in U.S. democratic institutions, sow doubt about the integrity of our electoral process, and undermine confidence in the institutions of the U.S. government. 


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/29/us/politics/russia-election-hacking-sanctions.html
	Obama Strikes Back at Russia for Election Hacking

	By DAVID E. SANGER
	DEC. 29, 2016 

	WASHINGTON — President Obama struck back at Russia on Thursday for its efforts to influence the 2016 election, ejecting 35 suspected Russian intelligence operatives from the United States and imposing sanctions on Russia’s two leading intelligence services.

	The administration also penalized four top officers of one of those services, the powerful military intelligence unit known as the G.R.U.

	Intelligence agencies have concluded that the G.R.U. ordered the attacks on the Democratic National Committee and other political organizations, with the approval of the Kremlin, and ultimately enabled the publication of the emails it harvested to benefit Donald J. Trump’s campaign.


http://fox17online.com/2016/12/29/putin-spokesman-says-russia-weighs-retaliation/
	Putin spokesman says Russia weighs retaliation
	Posted 4:22 PM, December 29, 2016

	WASHINGTON (AP) — The spokesman for President Vladimir Putin says Moscow regrets the new sanctions that the Obama administration imposed on Russia on Thursday and is considering retaliatory steps.

	Dmitry Peskov told reporters on Thursday that the measures signal Obama’s “unpredictable” and “aggressive foreign policy.”


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/putin-hopes-trump-will-lift-sanctions-says-no-need-to-rush-retaliation/article/2610560
	Putin hopes Trump will lift sanctions, says 'no need to rush' retaliation
	Dec 29, 2016, 4:26 PM 

	Russian President Vladimir Putin hopes President-elect Trump will lift the sanctions just imposed by outgoing President Obama in response to cyberattacks targeting the Democratic National Committee and other campaigns.

	"Considering the current transition period in Washington, we still expect that we'll be able to get rid of such clumsy actions," Putin's spokesman Dmitry Peskov said, per RT, a Kremlin-funded media outlet.

	Peskov suggested that Putin might delay Russian payback over the sanctions until after Trump takes office, saying "there's no need to rush" the retaliation. "As it said before, we consider this decision and these sanctions unjustified and illegal under international law," Peskov said.


https://twitter.com/TomArnold/status/814653874862571520
	Hey gamers here's a challenge. Trumps taxes are behind this door. Let's Make America Great Again

	6:06 PM - 29 Dec 2016


https://www.cnet.com/news/tom-arnold-calls-on-gamers-to-get-trumps-taxes/
	Actor Tom Arnold is keen to get a hold of President-elect Donald Trump's tax returns by any means necessary, it seems. On Thursday, he stepped up to Twitter to challenge "gamers" to get past a WordPress portal to obtain the documents that Trump has refused to release.


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/12/trump-russian-cyberattacks-intelligence-233045
	Trump: It's time 'to move on' from claims of Russian interference in election

	The president-elect also pledges to meet with leaders of the intelligence community 'to be updated on the facts.'

	By Nolan D. McCaskill

	12/29/2016 06:14 PM EST

	Insisting it's time "to move on," President-elect Donald Trump said Thursday he will nonetheless meet next week with leaders of the intelligence community "to be updated on the facts" of alleged Russian cyberattacks.

	“It's time for our country to move on to bigger and better things,” he said in a statement. “Nevertheless, in the interest of our country and its great people, I will meet with leaders of the intelligence community next week in order to be updated on the facts of this situation.”

	...Incoming White House press secretary Sean Spicer, specifically, had called on the intelligence community to offer proof of the Russian government’s interference.

	“If we’re gonna make such broad, sweeping claims about the involvement of anybody in the legitimacy of an election and the integrity of our election systems, then I think we need to have the intelligence community come forward publicly and on the record and make it clear exactly how this happened and who was responsible for it,” he told CNN.

	“Right now, we continue to get unsourced media accounts for what the activity is, and I think that’s not — that’s not acceptable,” he continued. “If truly there is someone to blame, then I think that we should have Congress notified, go through the appropriate congressional hearings, get the intelligence community — as they did in October — come out very publicly with the findings that they have.”


http://thehill.com/policy/national-security/312132-fbi-dhs-release-report-on-russia-hacking
	FBI, DHS release report on Russia hacking
	12/29/16 03:02 PM EST 

	The FBI and the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) on Thursday released a joint report detailing how federal investigators linked the Russian government to hacks of Democratic Party organizations.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-russia-idUSKBN14X1YX
	Trump adviser had five calls with Russian envoy on day of sanctions: sources

 	Michael Flynn, President-elect Donald Trump's choice for national security adviser, held five phone calls with Russia's ambassador to Washington on the day the United States retaliated for Moscow's interference in the U.S. presidential election, three sources familiar with the matter said.

	The calls occurred between the time the Russian embassy was told about U.S. sanctions and the announcement by Russian President Vladimir Putin that he had decided against reprisals, said the sources. 


http://dailycaller.com/2017/02/14/exclusive-defiant-flynn-insists-he-crossed-no-lines-leakers-must-be-prosecuted/
	Flynn insisted that he crossed no lines in his telephone conversation with Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak

	...Flynn said there was a brief discussion of the 35 Russian diplomats who were being expelled by Obama in retaliation for Moscow’s alleged interference in the 2016 campaign.

	“It wasn’t about sanctions. It was about the 35 guys who were thrown out,” Flynn said. “So that’s what it turned out to be. It was basically, ‘Look, I know this happened. We’ll review everything.’ I never said anything such as, ‘We’re going to review sanctions,’ or anything like that.”
	
	...The December conversation “was not to relieve sanctions. It was basically to say, ‘Look, we’re coming into office in a couple of weeks. Give us some time to take a look at everything.’”


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/national-security-adviser-flynn-discussed-sanctions-with-russian-ambassador-despite-denials-officials-say/2017/02/09/f85b29d6-ee11-11e6-b4ff-ac2cf509efe5_story.html
	In a recent interview, Kislyak confirmed that he had communicated with Flynn by text message, by phone and in person, but declined to say whether they had discussed sanctions.

	...All of those officials said Flynn’s references to the election-related sanctions were explicit. Two of those officials went further, saying that Flynn urged Russia not to overreact to the penalties being imposed by President Barack Obama, making clear that the two sides would be in position to review the matter after Trump was sworn in as president.

	“Kislyak was left with the impression that the sanctions would be revisited at a later time”

	...On Dec. 28, as word of the Obama sanctions spread, Kislyak sent a message to Flynn requesting a call. “Flynn took that call,” Spicer said, adding that it “centered on the logistics of setting up a call with the president of Russia and [Trump] after the election.”


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/russia-plans-retaliation-and-serious-discomfortoverus-hacking-sanctions/2016/12/30/4efd3650-ce12-11e6-85cd-e66532e35a44_story.html
	In a rare, and calculated, break from the diplomatic tradition of reciprocal punishment, Putin opted to do nothing after the United States said it would expel 35 Russian diplomats and close a pair of Russian-owned properties in retaliation for Moscow’s meddling in the 2016 presidential election.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/814919370711461890?lang=en
	Great move on delay (by V. Putin) - I always knew he was very smart!
	11:41 AM - 30 Dec 2016 


Obama and Biden promise discrete retaliation for Russian election meddling, but former CIA director Mike Morell disagrees and calls for something overt. Russian propagandists later use this to blame the U.S. for the assassination of a Russian diplomat, and Russian propaganda outlets also hint at foul play in the crash of a Russian military jet that killed 60 members of a famous Russian military choir. It is unclear if the Obama Administration or Flynn understand Morell to be a Russian agent of influence, or if Trump or Flynn think the incidents constituted retaliation by the U.S. Regardless, Flynn is said to have referenced both incidents in his later calls with Kislyak.

Actor Tom Arnold claims on twitter that Russia can blackmail Trump. Arnold mostly talks about embarrassing tapes of Trump but also mentions his taxes. Most media outlets focus on the claims of tapes and generally don't take him seriously. Trump had previously denied there were any improper dealings with Russians were in his tax returns, saying he would release them when they are no longer under audit.

Trump learns that the Obama administration is planning to sanction Russia for the election meddling. When asked if the U.S. should sanction Russia, Trump says "I think we ought to get on with our lives" and casts doubt that Russia is to blame. That same day, Mike Flynn contacts Russian ambassador Kislyak to arrange a phone call between Trump and Putin.

The next day, the Obama administration officially sanctions Russia for "eroding faith in U.S. Institutions" and "sowing doubt about the integrity of our electoral process," sanctioning Russian intelligence officers and expelling 35 Russian diplomats. The FBI and DHS also release a report on how investigators linked the hacking to the Russian government. Putin makes public his warnings of retaliation and hopes the Trump administration will reverse the sanctions. Tom Arnold calls on hackers to find Trump's tax returns.

Flynn holds five calls with the Russian ambassador between the time the Russian embassy was notified of the sanctions and the time Putin decides against retaliation. Reportedly, Flynn urges Kislyak against retaliation and leaves an impression that the sanctions would be revisited by Trump. Trump tells reporters it's time "to move on" from claims of Russian interference, but promises to meet with the intelligence community to "be updated on the facts of this situation." Sean Spicer dismisses the claims of Russian interference as "unsourced media accounts." After Putin decides against retaliation, Trump praises him on twitter, saying "Great move on delay (by V. Putin) - I always knew he was very smart!"


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/31/us/politics/donald-trump-russia-hacking.html
	Trump Promises a Revelation on Hacking

	By MAGGIE HABERMAN
	DEC. 31, 2016

	President-elect Donald J. Trump, expressing lingering skepticism about intelligence assessments of Russian interference in the election, said on Saturday evening that he knew “things that other people don’t know” about the hacking, and that the information would be revealed “on Tuesday or Wednesday.”

	Speaking to a handful of reporters outside his Palm Beach, Fla., club, Mar-a-Lago, Mr. Trump cast his declarations of doubt as an effort to seek the truth.

	“I just want them to be sure because it’s a pretty serious charge,” Mr. Trump said of the intelligence agencies. “If you look at the weapons of mass destruction, that was a disaster, and they were wrong,” he added, referring to intelligence cited by the George W. Bush administration to support its march to war in 2003. “So I want them to be sure,” the president-elect said. “I think it’s unfair if they don’t know.”

	He added: “And I know a lot about hacking. And hacking is a very hard thing to prove. So it could be somebody else. And I also know things that other people don’t know, and so they cannot be sure of the situation.”

	When asked what he knew that others did not, Mr. Trump demurred, saying only, “You’ll find out on Tuesday or Wednesday.”

	Mr. Trump, who does not use email, also advised people to avoid computers when dealing with delicate material. “It’s very important, if you have something really important, write it out and have it delivered by courier, the old-fashioned way, because I’ll tell you what, no computer is safe,” Mr. Trump said.

	“I don’t care what they say, no computer is safe,” he added. “I have a boy who’s 10 years old; he can do anything with a computer. You want something to really go without detection, write it out and have it sent by courier.”

	The comments on Saturday were a departure from a statement that Mr. Trump issued through transition officials last week, in which he said that it was time for people to “move on” from the hacking issue but that he would be briefed on the matter by intelligence officials early in the new year.

	...Mr. Trump, who has sought a warmer relationship with Mr. Putin, has repeatedly scoffed at the notion that Russia was behind the hacking, a stance at odds with members of his own party. At one point, Mr. Trump declared that the hacking may have been the work of “someone sitting on their bed weighing 400 pounds.”


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/816452807024840704?lang=en
	The "Intelligence" briefing on so-called "Russian hacking" was delayed until Friday, perhaps more time needed to build a case. Very strange!
	5:14 PM - 3 Jan 2017 


http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/312609-trumps-delayed-meeting-was-always-scheduled-for-friday-report
	Report: Trump's 'delayed' intelligence meeting was always scheduled for Friday
	01/03/17


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/schumer-warns-trump-intel-officials-have-six-ways-from-sunday-at-getting-back-at-you/article/2610823
	Schumer warns Trump: Intel officials 'have six ways from Sunday at getting back at you'
	by Daniel Chaitin
	Jan 3, 2016

	The new leader of Democrats in the Senate says Donald Trump is being "really dumb" for picking a fight with intelligence officials, suggesting they have ways to strike back, after the president-elect speculated Tuesday that his "so-called" briefing about Russian cyberattacks had been delayed in order to build a case.

	
http://www.cbsnews.com/news/report-on-russian-hacking-released-by-intelligence-community/
	January 6, 2017, 4:25 PM
	Report on Russian hacking released by intelligence community

	Russian President Vladimir Putin ordered a campaign involving covert intelligence operations and overt propaganda to undermine faith in the U.S. election, disparage Hillary Clinton and help Donald Trump’s election chances, the intelligence community concluded in a report released Friday afternoon. 

	...“We assess Russian President Vladimir Putin ordered an influence campaign in 2016 aimed at the US presidential election. Russia’s goals were to undermine public faith in the US democratic process, denigrate Secretary Clinton, and harm her electability and potential presidency. We further assess Putin and the Russian Government developed a clear preference for President-elect Trump,” the report said. 

	...“These activities demonstrated a significant escalation in directness, level of activity and scope of effort compared to previous operations,” said the report, which was presented to President Obama Thursday and on which Mr. Trump was briefed Friday. 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/investigation-of-russian-hacking-is-a-witch-hunt-trump-says/2017/01/06/cf330600-d430-11e6-a783-cd3fa950f2fd_story.html
 	Investigation of Russian hacking is a ‘witch hunt,’ Trump says 

	By David Nakamura January 6

	As U.S. intelligence officials have raised increasing alarm this week over Russia’s meddling in the presidential election, Donald Trump has sought to recast the investigation as a matter of old-fashioned politics rather than national security.

	The president-elect has reacted to mounting pressure to take stronger steps against Russia not only by trying to discredit the intelligence community but also by suggesting that the intense Washington focus on the issue is being driven by political rivals still stung by his electoral victory.

	“This is a political witch hunt,” Trump said Friday in an interview with the New York Times ahead of a private briefing from U.S. officials on a classified 50-page report, ordered by President Obama, on Russia’s role in the election.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	Statement for the Record

	Senate Select Committee on Intelligence

	James B. Comey

	...January 6 Briefing

	I first met then- President-Elect Trump on Friday, January 6 in a conference room at Trump Tower in New York. I was there with other Intelligence Community (IC) leaders to brief him and his new national security team on the findings of an IC assessment concerning Russian efforts to interfere in the election. At the conclusion of that briefing, I remained alone with the President-Elect to brief him on some personally sensitive aspects of the information assembled during the assessment.

	The IC leadership thought it important, for a variety of reasons, to alert the incoming President to the existence of this material, even though it was salacious and unverified.

	...When the FBI develops reason to believe an American has been targeted for recruitment by a foreign power or is covertly acting as an agent of the foreign power, the FBI will “open an investigation” on that American and use legal authorities to try to learn more about the nature of any relationship with the foreign power so it can be disrupted.

	In that context, prior to the January 6 meeting, I discussed with the FBI’s leadership team whether I should be prepared to assure President-Elect Trump that we were not investigating him personally. That was true; we did not have an open counter-intelligence case on him. We agreed I should do so if circumstances warranted. During our one-on-one meeting at Trump Tower, based on President-Elect Trump’s reaction to the briefing and without him directly asking the question, I offered that assurance.


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jan/06/donald-trump-russia-hacking-meeting-intelligence-officials
	Spencer Ackerman in New York and Julian Borger and David Smith in Washington

	Friday 6 January 2017 13.49 EST 

	Donald Trump struck a conciliatory tone with US intelligence officials after meeting with their leadership, but did not publicly support their conclusion that Russia interfered in the 2016 US presidential contest.

	In a statement issued ahead of the release of a declassified version of the intelligence assessment, Trump said he had “tremendous respect for the work and service done by the men and women of this community”, describing his meeting with James Clapper, the director of national intelligence, and other senior intelligence officials, as “constructive”.

	His comments came after an extraordinary public feud between Trump and leaders of the intelligence apparatus he will soon control. However, Trump discussed the hack and leak of embarrassing Democratic National Committee data in generic terms, suggesting he had not moved away from his earlier statements casting attribution for the data breach as unknowable.

	“Russia, China, other countries, outside groups and people are consistently trying to break through the cyber infrastructure of our governmental institutions, businesses and organizations,” Trump said in a Friday afternoon statement, and underlined “there was absolutely no effect on the outcome of the election including the fact that there was no tampering whatsoever with voting machines”.

	...Trump and his deputies have treated discussion of potential foreign interference in a US election as an effort merely to delegitimize his presidency before it begins. 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/obama-orders-review-of-russian-hacking-during-presidential-campaign/2016/12/09/31d6b300-be2a-11e6-94ac-3d324840106c_story.html
 	Secret CIA assessment says Russia was trying to help Trump win White House

	 By Adam Entous, Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller December 9, 2016

	The CIA has concluded in a secret assessment that Russia intervened in the 2016 election to help Donald Trump win the presidency, rather than just to undermine confidence in the U.S. electoral system, according to officials briefed on the matter.


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/12/trump-team-russia-cia-intel-election-232460
	Trump team rejects intel agencies' claims of Russian meddling
	12/09/2016

	Donald Trump is rejecting official assessments that Russia interfered with the U.S. election — reportedly to help him win the presidency — by comparing intelligence agencies' latest analyses to the past flawed claims that led to the Iraq war.

	"These are the same people that said Saddam Hussein had weapons of mass destruction," the Trump transition team said in a statement late Friday. 


https://web.archive.org/web/20170110221529/http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/10/politics/donald-trump-intelligence-report-russia/index.html
	Intel chiefs presented Trump with claims of Russian efforts to compromise him

	By Evan Perez, Jim Sciutto and Jake Tapper and Carl Bernstein, CNN

	Updated 5:09 PM ET, Tue January 10, 2017

	Classified documents presented last week to President Obama and President-elect Trump included allegations that Russian operatives claim to have compromising personal and financial information about Mr. Trump, multiple US officials with direct knowledge of the briefings tell CNN.

	The allegations were presented in a two-page synopsis that was appended to a report on Russian interference in the 2016 election. The allegations came, in part, from memos compiled by a former British intelligence operative, whose past work US intelligence officials consider credible.

	...One reason the nation's intelligence chiefs took the extraordinary step of including the synopsis in the briefing documents was to make the President-elect aware that such allegations involving him are circulating among intelligence agencies, senior members of Congress and other government officials in Washington, multiple sources tell CNN.

	...One high level administration official told CNN, "I have a sense the outgoing administration and intelligence community is setting down the pieces so this must be investigated seriously and run down. I think [the] concern was to be sure that whatever information was out there is put into the system so it is evaluated as it should be and acted upon as necessary."


http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/donald-trump-sex-allegations-russia-hacking-intelligence-report-perverted-moscow-a7520916.html
	Donald Trump Russia claims: Leaked documents allege Moscow holds compromising dossier on President-elect

	The President-elect has dismissed the allegations as 'fake news'

	Wednesday 11 January 2017


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/819164172781060096
	Intelligence agencies should never have allowed this fake news to "leak" into the public. One last shot at me.Are we living in Nazi Germany?
	4:48 AM - 11 Jan 2017


http://abcnews.go.com/US/trump-odds-intel-chief-characterization-conversation-russia-report/story?id=44723926
	Trump at Odds With Intel Chief on Characterization of Conversation About Russia Report

	...Trump railed against the intelligence community in a tweet earlier Wednesday, suggesting that the IC "allowed" the document to leak.

	...Trump conceded today that Russia was probably responsible for the hacking after casting doubt on the IC's assessment.


http://time.com/4632743/james-clapper-donald-trump-russia/
	U.S. Intelligence Chief James Clapper to Donald Trump: We Didn't Leak Russia Documents


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/11/us/politics/trump-press-conference-transcript.html
	JAN. 11, 2017

	QUESTION: But why did you spend weeks undermining U.S. intelligence community before simply getting the facts and then making a public statement?

	TRUMP: Well, I think it’s pretty sad when intelligence reports get leaked out to the press. I think it’s pretty sad. First of all, it’s illegal. You know, these are — these are classified and certified meetings and reports.

	I’ll tell you what does happen. I have many meetings with intelligence. And every time I meet, people are reading about it. Somebody’s leaking it out. So, there’s — maybe it’s my office. Maybe in my office because I have a lot of people, a lot of great people. Maybe it’s them. And what I did is I said I won’t tell anybody. I’m going to have a meeting and I won’t tell anybody about my meeting with intelligence.

	And what happened is I had my meeting. Nobody knew, not even Rhona, my executive assistant for years, she didn’t know — I didn’t tell her. Nobody knew. The meeting was had, the meeting was over, they left. And immediately the word got out that I had a meeting.

	So, I don’t want that — I don’t want that. It’s very unfair to the country. It’s very unfair to our country; what’s happened. That report should have never — first of all, it shouldn’t have been printed because it’s not worth the paper it’s written on. And I thank the New York Times for saying that.

	I thank a lot of different people for saying that. But, I will tell you, that should never, ever happen. OK.


Trump decides that U.S. intelligence agencies got the Russian hacking claims wrong, since he "knows a lot about hacking" and "hacking is a very hard thing to prove," before suggesting U.S. intelligence made the "so-called Russian hacking" story up. Chuck Schumer warns Trump that the USIC will get back at him. After USIC finally briefs Trump on Russian interference, Comey pulls Trump aside to brief him on the "dodgy dossier" and warn him he might be blackmailed. Comey also assures Trump he is not under investigation.

After the briefing, Trump declares the Russia investigation a "witch hunt," but takes a more conciliatory tone with the USIC. Three days later, the Washington post reports a "secret CIA assessment" that Russia actually intended to install Trump. Trump dismisses the entire Russian interference story and suggests intelligence agencies must be wrong since they were wrong about Iraq.

The next day, CNN reports that Trump was briefed on the dossier and suggests the USIC believes the dossier is credible. The dossier is leaked shortly afterward. Trump blames the leak on the USIC and compares them to Nazis. Trump appears to honestly think the USIC leaked the dossier.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/819520238446411777
	James Clapper called me yesterday to denounce the false and fictitious report that was illegally circulated. Made up, phony facts.Too bad!
	4:23 AM - 12 Jan 2017 


http://www.thedailybeast.com/reports-flynn-phoned-russian-ambassador-on-day-sanctions-were-announced
	13 Jan 2017

	The Washington Post on Thursday and the Associated Press on Friday both reported that Retired Lt. Gen. Michael T. Flynn repeatedly phoned the Russian ambassador to the U.S. on the very same day the Obama administration expelled 35 Russian diplomats over election hacking. The allegation, made by an unnamed senior U.S. government official, raises the question of whether Flynn, President-elect Donald Trump’s pick for national-security adviser, was in violation of federal law with this alleged phone call. 


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/michael-flynn-in-frequent-contact-with-russias-ambassador-to-u-s/
	January 13, 2017, 12:13 PM
	Michael Flynn in frequent contact with Russia's ambassador to U.S.

	A senior U.S. official says the Obama administration is aware of frequent contacts between President-elect Donald Trump’s top national security adviser and Russia’s ambassador to the United States, and Trump transition spokesman Sean Spicer revealed what was talked about on some of the calls.


http://www.nbcnews.com/news/us-news/white-house-we-didn-t-coordinate-flynn-call-russian-ambassador-n706806
	Jan 13 2017, 11:50 pm ET
	White House: We Didn’t Coordinate Flynn Call to Russian Ambassador

	...Spicer said there was nothing unusual about the call, but White House officials told NBC News it was not coordinated with them. It is unclear how the U.S. government became aware of the call, which was first reported by Washington Post columnist David Ignatius, who said there were multiple calls and raised the question of whether the conversations violated the "spirit" of a law that bars private citizens from negotiating with foreign governments. 


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jan/13/fbi-investigation-donald-trump-russia-james-comey-congress
	Angering Congress, James Comey won't address Trump-Russia inquiry privately

	FBI director’s refusal to clarify potential investigation was met with frustration from lawmakers who recall his interjections about Hillary Clinton during election

	Friday 13 January 2017 14.37 EST

	Embattled FBI director James Comey has refused to clarify whether his organization is investigating Donald Trump’s ties to Russia in a closed briefing on Friday for members of Congress, angering legislators who recall his high-profile interjections about Hillary Clinton during the 2016 presidential campaign, the Guardian has learned.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/blogs/post-partisan/wp/2017/01/13/comey-should-resign/?utm_term=.8f73c665d86b
	Comey should resign
	By Ed Rogers January 13

	The Wall Street Journal says President-elect Donald Trump's incoming administration should fire James Comey if the FBI director does not resign.


http://thehill.com/policy/national-security/fbi/314144-wall-street-journal-fbi-head-should-resign
	Wall Street Journal: Comey should resign
	By Mark Hensch - 01/13/17 10:04 AM EST 


http://www.msnbc.com/am-joy/watch/james-comey-should-he-resign-855064131798
	AM Joy 1/14/17
	James Comey: Should he resign?

	Joy Reid and her guests discuss the growing calls for FBI Director James Comey to resign following accusations that he acted perhaps unwisely and possibly with bias related to actions that may have impacted the election.


http://time.com/4635505/bernie-sanders-james-comey-fbi/
	Bernie Sanders: FBI Director James Comey's Resignation 'Would Not Be a Bad Thing'
	Jan 15, 2017


http://thehill.com/policy/national-security/314391-pence-on-whether-trump-has-confidence-in-comey-youll-have-to-ask-him
	Pence dodges on Trump's confidence in Comey: 'You'll have to ask him'
	01/15/17 09:39 AM EST 


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/week-transcript-15-17-reince-priebus-sen-bernie/story?id=44778012&cid=clicksource_903_null_vert_hed
	Jan 15, 2017

	 STEPHANOPOULOS: We just heard Bernie Sanders say he thinks that FBI Director James Comey should think about stepping down. President-elect Trump was very tough on the FBI director during the campaign, said he disagreed with his final decision on Hillary Clinton, repeated again this week that he thinks Hillary Clinton was guilty as hell.

	Does he have confidence in FBI Director Comey?

	PRIEBUS: Yes, he has confidence in Director Comey. We have had a great relationship with him over the last several weeks. He's extremely competent.

	But, look, his term extends for some time yet. There's no plans at the moment in changing that term. And we've enjoyed our relationship with him and find him to be extraordinarily competent. 


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/mike-pence-michael-flynn-russia-contact-strictly-coincidental/
	January 15, 2017

	Mike Pence says Trump adviser's contact with Russia was "strictly coincidental"

	He added that Flynn has been in touch with diplomatic leaders in approximately 30 countries -- “that’s exactly what the incoming national security adviser should do,” he said.

	“But what I can confirm having spoken to him about it is those conversations that happened to occur around the time that the United States took action to expel diplomats had nothing whatsoever to do with those sanctions,” he said.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/brennan-rips-trump-tweets-russia/
	Outgoing CIA chief rips into Trump on Russia threat

 	January 15, 2017 


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/314436-trump-on-outgoing-cia-director-was-this-the-leaker-of-fake-news
	Trump on outgoing CIA director: ‘Was this the leaker of Fake News?’

	01/15/17 08:47 PM EST


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-russia-arms-deal-idUSKBN14Z0YE
	Mon Jan 16, 2017 | 7:23am EST
	Trump's offer to Russia: an end to sanctions for nuclear arms cut - London Times

	U.S. President-elect Donald Trump will propose offering to end sanctions imposed on Russia over its annexation of Crimea in return for a nuclear arms reduction deal with Moscow, he told The Times of London.

	Criticizing previous U.S. foreign policy in an interview published on Monday, he described the U.S.-led invasion of Iraq in 2003 as possibly the gravest error in the history of the United States and akin to "throwing rocks into a beehive".

	But Trump, who will be inaugurated on Friday as the 45th U.S. president, raised the prospect of the first big nuclear arms control agreement with Moscow since the Strategic Arms Reduction Treaty signed by President Barack Obama in 2010.

	"They have sanctions on Russia — let’s see if we can make some good deals with Russia," the Republican president-elect was quoted as saying by The Times.

	"For one thing, I think nuclear weapons should be way down and reduced very substantially, that’s part of it. But Russia’s hurting very badly right now because of sanctions, but I think something can happen that a lot of people are gonna benefit."


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/12/trump-nuclear-arms-race-russia-232944
	Trump threatens to upend U.S. nuclear weapons policy
	'We will outmatch them at every pass and outlast them all,' Trump says.
	12/23/2016 

	In a series of impromptu statements about nuclear weapons, Donald Trump is threatening to upend longstanding U.S. nonproliferation policy, even as his advisers contradict him and muddy his intentions.

	The president-elect had alarmed and perplexed some experts and others in Washington when he pronounced, without offering more details, via Twitter on Thursday that the U.S. “must greatly strengthen and expand its nuclear capability until such time as the world comes to its senses regarding nukes.”

	He further escalated his call on Friday, telling the MSNBC program “Morning Joe” that he is fine with the country taking part in an “arms race” if it puts the U.S. in a stronger position against foreign adversaries.

	“Let it be an arms race … we will outmatch them at every pass and outlast them all,” Trump said in an off-air conversation on Friday.


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/314483-almost-three-quarters-of-americans-want-trump-to-release-tax-returns
	Poll: 74 percent want to see Trump's tax returns
	By Mallory Shelbourne - 01/16/17 04:41 PM EST 

	Almost three-quarters of Americans think President-elect Donald Trump should release his tax returns, according to a new ABC News/Washington Post poll.

	Seventy-four percent say Trump should release his tax returns, which the president-elect refused to do during his campaign. At his first post-election press conference last week, Trump argued that no one but members of the media care about his tax returns, reiterating that he won't release them while he's under federal audit. The IRS has said an audit does not prevents someone from releasing personal tax information.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-russia-lavrov-trump-nuclear-idUSKBN1510VQ
	Tue Jan 17, 2017 | 5:02am EST
	Russia expects dialogue with Trump on nuclear weapons: Lavrov

	Russia expects to have a dialogue with the Trump administration on strategic stability, including on nuclear weapons, Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov said on Tuesday.

	Lavrov added to reporters that such a dialogue could cover hypersonic weapons, a U.S. missile shield in Europe, space weapons and nuclear testing.

	He said that Russia was ready to meet with Donald Trump's administration to discuss these issues after the U.S. president-elect takes office.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/01/russia-us-relations-trump-kremlin-233673
	Lavrov: We may have improved relations with U.S. under Trump
	01/17/2017 07:10 AM EST 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/17/world/europe/putin-trump-memo.html
	Putin Says Accusations in Trump Dossier Are ‘Clearly Fake’

	JAN. 17, 2017

	President Vladimir V. Putin of Russia declared on Tuesday that the political memo alleging that the Kremlin had sought for years to influence President-elect Donald J. Trump was “fake,” and he said that the effort to compile such a dossier was further evidence of the political decay of the West — one of the Russian leader’s favorite themes.

	Mr. Putin also accused the departing United States administration of trying to undermine President Obama’s successor, saying that Russian spies had better things to do than chase rich American businessmen and try to catch them in compromising situations.

	“These bogus stories are clearly fake,” Mr. Putin said at a news conference of allegations that included Mr. Trump cavorting with prostitutes while visiting Russia.

	“He is a grown man, somebody who for many years has been organizing beauty contests, interacted with the most beautiful women in the world,” he added. “You know, it is difficult for me to imagine that he ran to a hotel to meet with our young women with lowered social responsibility.”


http://www.foxnews.com/politics/2017/01/17/cias-brennan-rejects-donald-trumps-criticism-says-dossier-didnt-come-from-intel-community.html
	CIA's Brennan rejects Donald Trump's criticism, says dossier didn't come from intel community

	Published January 17, 2017

	The day after the dossier's contents were published by BuzzFeed, Trump posted on Twitter that intelligence agencies "should never have allowed this fake news to 'leak'" before asking "Are we living in Nazi Germany?"

	Brennan was reportedly indignant that Trump attacked his fellow spies, according to The Journal. He mentioned Trumps tweet on Nazi Germany in particular.

	“Tell the families of those 117 CIA officers who are forever memorialized on our wall of honor that their loved ones who gave their lives were akin to Nazis,” Brennan said. “Tell the CIA officers who are serving in harm’s way right now and their families who are worried about them that they are akin to Nazi Germany. I found that to be very repugnant, and I will forever stand up for the integrity and patriotism of my officers who have done much over the years to sacrifice for their fellow citizens.”


http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2017/jan/18/donald-trump-to-reform-us-intelligence-community/
	Donald Trump to reform intelligence

	By Bill Gertz - - Wednesday, January 18, 2017

	One national security priority of the incoming administration of President-elect Donald Trumpis to reform the heavily bureaucratized and, to some critics, politicized U.S. intelligence community.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/us-counterintelligence-officials-are-examining-possible-ties-between-russia-and-trump-associates/2017/01/19/7e10f31c-debd-11e6-918c-99ede3c8cafa_story.html
	U.S. counterintelligence officials are examining possible ties between Russia and Trump associates
	By Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller
	January 19

	U.S. counterintelligence officials are sifting through intercepted communications and financial data as part of a wider look at possible ties between the Russian government and associates of President-elect Donald Trump, officials said.

	...FBI Director James B. Comey has been chastised by Democratic lawmakers for refusing to even acknowledge that it was investigating alleged links between Trump or his associates and the Kremlin.

	Trump’s former campaign chairman, Paul Manafort, has been under FBI scrutiny for some time, including for allegations of illegal financial dealings in Ukraine, current and former U.S. officials said. Manafort has done business in Russia and Ukraine.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/19/us/politics/trump-russia-associates-investigation.html
	Intercepted Russian Communications Part of Inquiry Into Trump Associates

	By MICHAEL S. SCHMIDT, MATTHEW ROSENBERG, ADAM GOLDMAN and MATT APUZZO
	JAN. 19, 2017

	American law enforcement and intelligence agencies are examining intercepted communications and financial transactions as part of a broad investigation into possible links between Russian officials and associates of President-elect Donald J. Trump, including his former campaign chairman Paul Manafort, current and former senior American officials said.

	The continuing counterintelligence investigation means that Mr. Trump will take the oath of office on Friday with his associates under investigation and after the intelligence agencies concluded that the Russian government had worked to help elect him. As president, Mr. Trump will oversee those agencies and have the authority to redirect or stop at least some of these efforts.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/01/21/trump-to-visit-cia-headquarters-after-sharply-criticizing-the-intelligence-community/
	Trump visits CIA headquarters after sharply criticizing the intelligence community
	By Philip Rucker and Greg Miller
	January 21

	President Trump visited CIA's headquarters in Northern Virginia on Saturday afternoon, making a gesture of goodwill after he harshly criticized the intelligence community in the run-up to his inauguration.

	“There is nobody that feels stronger about the intelligence community and the CIA than Donald Trump,” said Trump.


http://thehill.com/policy/national-security/intelligence/315483-trump-blames-intel-community-feud-on-dishonest-media
	Trump blames intel community 'feud' on ‘dishonest media’
	By Max Greenwood - 01/21/17 04:51 PM EST 


https://www.c-span.org/video/?c4650720/president-trump-tells-cia-us-may-another-chance-get-iraqi-oil
	January 21, 2017 | Clip Of President Trump Remarks at the Central Intelligence Agency
	President Trump Tells CIA U.S. May Have Another Chance to Get Iraqi Oil

	Speaking to employees at CIA headquarters in Langley, Virginia, President Trump said the U.S. should have kept the oil when it left Iraq, saying it would have prevented ISIS. He then suggested, "Maybe we'll have another chance."


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/315568-trump-greets-comey-at-white-house-hes-become-more-famous-than-me
	Trump greets Comey: 'He's become more famous than me'
	01/22/17

	President Donald Trump greeted FBI Director James Comey during a reception for law enforcement at the White House on Sunday afternoon.

	During the event, the president singled out Comey, who approached the president, shook his hand and gave him a hug.

	"He's become more famous than me," the president joked.

	...The president had in the past attacked Comey and the intelligence community, accusing it of leaking an unverified dossier alleging Russia had compromising information on Trump.

	The president also thanked the law enforcement officers for doing such a good job during his inauguration.

	He said the event had been "such a success, a safety success."

	Trump went to the Central Intelligence Agency headquarters on Saturday, where he blasted reporters and affirmed his support for the nation’s intelligence agencies.

	On Sunday, he tweeted that he had a "great" meeting at the CIA headquarters with "amazing people," calling it a "win."


http://www.huffingtonpost.co.za/entry/donald-trump-james-comey-air-kiss_us_58857527e4b096b4a232b942
	Trump Appears To Blow A Kiss At FBI Director James Comey
	“He’s become more famous than me."


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/22/politics/kellyanne-conway-trump-tax-returns/index.html
	Conway: Trump will not release tax returns

	Sun January 22, 2017

	President Donald Trump will not release his tax returns -- even after the audit he's frequently cited is completed -- senior adviser Kellyanne Conway said Sunday.

	In an interview on ABC's "This Week," Conway was pressed on whether the White House will respond to more than 200,000 petition signatures calling on Trump to release his tax returns.

	"The White House response is that he's not going to release his tax returns," Conway said.

	"We litigated this all through the election. People didn't care," she said. "They voted for him, and let me make this very clear: Most Americans are very focused on what their tax returns will look like while President Trump is in office, not what his look like. And you know full well that President Trump and his family are complying with all the ethical rules, everything they need to do to step away from his businesses and be a full-time president."


http://fortune.com/2017/01/23/wikileaks-trump-tax-returns/
	WikiLeaks Says It Will Publish Donald Trump’s Tax Returns
	Don Reisinger
	Jan 23, 2017

	WikiLeaks said it is planning to release President Donald Trump's tax returns. The controversial organization on Sunday requested anyone with access to President Trump's tax returns turn them over to the organization so it can make them public.

	...The organization has published secret documents and other leaked information about governments and organizations worldwide, on everything from the Iraq and Afghanistan wars to secret information on Russian businesses and prominent individuals.

	...Over a series of months, WikiLeaks released communications between party officials and Podesta. The U.S. has since said that the documents came from accounts hacked by groups connected to the Russian government in an effort to impact the election.

	...Trump's unwillingness to release his returns has prompted WikiLeaks to turn its attention to his tax returns. It's unknown who might have access to Trump's returns and whether anyone would leak them to WikiLeaks. But if someone does, the organization seems ready to publish them once it gets them.


Flynn's contacts with the Russian ambassador are revealed in the press, and some speculate criminal wrongdoing. The White House denies involvement. Pence denies sanctions were discussed, citing his conversations with Flynn. Trump continues to fight with the USIC while unveiling his plan to lift Russian sanctions in exchange for a nuclear arms reduction deal. Trump had previously said he plans to "greatly expend" the U.S. nuclear weapons arsenal.

Comey faces criticism for his handling of the email case and refusing to confirm if ties between Trump and Russia are under investigation, and officials and newspapers call on Comey to resign. Priebus tells journalists Trump has "confidence" in Comey, but Pence says "you'd have to ask him." Trump had previously told 60 minutes he wanted to meet with Comey before deciding to keep him on.

The Trump administration unveils a plan to "reform" the "politicized" intelligence community. The next day, the Washington Post and New York Times report that the Trump campaign is under investigation for ties and communications with Russia. Trump abruptly changes his tune, attempting gestures of goodwill toward the CIA, FBI, and Comey.

Wikileaks raises the spectre of Trump's tax returns.


http://www.latimes.com/sns-bc-us--comey-in-the-room-20170608-story.html
 	Comey and Trump: 2 alpha males face off over dinner

	The setting: the Green Room, dinner for two. No witnesses but the Navy stewards shuttling in and out with food and drinks.

	...GREEN ROOM, Jan. 27: "Honest loyalty"

	...The conversation is strange from the start: Trump asks whether Comey wants to keep his job even though the FBI director had twice before told Trump he wanted to stay on.

	... Things get stranger from there, when Trump tells Comey: "I need loyalty, I expect loyalty."

	...Trump returns to the salacious allegations against him, calling them disgusting and saying he's considering ordering Comey to investigate and disprove them. Comey warns that such an investigation could "create a narrative that we were investigating him personally, which we weren't."


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	HOLT: Let me ask you about your termination letter to Mr. Comey. You write, "I greatly appreciate you informing me on three separate occasions that I am not under investigation." Why did you put that in there?

	TRUMP: Because he told me that. I mean, he told me that.

	HOLT: He told you, you weren't under investigation with...

	TRUMP: Yeah, and I...

	HOLT: ...regard to the Russian investigation.

	TRUMP: ...I've heard that -- I've heard that from others. I think...

	HOLT: Was it in a phone call? Did you meet face to face?

	TRUMP: I had a dinner with him. He wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on. We had a very nice dinner at the White House...

	HOLT: He -- he asked...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: ...very early on. That dinner was arranged. I think he asked for the dinner.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	KING: With regard to the — several of these conversations, in his interview with Lester Holt on NBC, the president said, I had dinner with him. He wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on. Is this an accurate statement?

	COMEY: No, sir.

	KING: Did you in any way initiate that dinner?

	COMEY: No. He called me at my desk at lunchtime and asked me, was I free for dinner that night. Called himself. Said, can you come over for dinner tonight? I said, yes, sir. 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/24/us/politics/trump-comey-fbi-director-.html
	Trump Is Said to Keep James Comey as F.B.I. Director

	By MICHAEL S. SCHMIDT and ADAM GOLDMAN JAN. 24, 2017 

	WASHINGTON — The F.B.I. director, James B. Comey, told his top agents from around the country that he had been asked by President Trump to stay on the job running the federal government’s top law enforcement agency, according to people familiar with the matter.

	...When Mr. Comey and the president-elect met at Trump Tower for the first time this month for an intelligence briefing, Mr. Trump told the F.B.I. director that he hoped he would remain in his position, according to people briefed on the matter. And Mr. Trump’s aides have made it clear to Mr. Comey that the president does not plan to ask him to leave, these people said.


https://web.archive.org/web/20170124155639/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-director-james-comey-to-say-on-in-trump-administration/2017/01/24/033d3bc8-e246-11e6-a453-19ec4b3d09ba_story.html?utm_term=.13d7738addb2
 	FBI Director James Comey to stay on in Trump administration

	By Matt Zapotosky, Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller January 24 at 10:21 AM 

	...The news that Comey would stay in place became public Tuesday, some time after he began informing senior FBI officials around the country that he had been asked to continue.

	Under normal circumstances, the revelation might have been unsurprising: Comey is less than four years into a 10-year term, and it is extremely rare for a president to remove an FBI director. But President Trump had notably declined to say whether he would keep the FBI director, telling “60 Minutes” in an interview after his election that he wanted to meet with Comey first. 


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	...And he wanted to stay on as the FBI head. And I said I'll, you know, consider. We'll see what happens.

	But we had a very nice dinner. And at that time, he told you are not under investigation...

	HOLT: That was...

	TRUMP: ...which I knew anyway.

	HOLT: That was one meeting. When was the -- when was the other two?

	TRUMP: First of all, when you're under investigation, you're giving all sorts of documents and everything. I knew I wasn't under. And I heard it was stated at the committee -- at some committee level that I wasn't, number one.

	HOLT: So, that didn't come directly from him.

	TRUMP: Then, during a phone call, he said it. And then, during another phone call he said it.

	So, he said it once at dinner and then he said it twice during phone calls.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/06/07/politics/james-comey-memos-testimony/index.html
	January 6 Briefing

	...I discussed with the FBI's leadership team whether I should be prepared to assure President-Elect Trump that we were not investigating him personally. ...During our one-on-one meeting at Trump Tower, based on President Elect Trump's reaction to the briefing and without him directly asking the question, I offered that assurance.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	SEN. SUSAN COLLINS: ...I want first to ask you about your conversations with the president, three conversations in which you told him that he was not under investigation. The first was during your January 6th meeting, according to your testimony, in which it appears that you actually volunteered that assurance. Is that correct?

	COMEY: That's correct.

	...COLLINS: Then on the January 27th dinner, you told the president that he should be careful about asking you to investigate because, “you might create a narrative that we are investigating him personally, which we weren't.” Again, were you limiting that statement to counterintelligence investigations, or more broadly, such as a criminal investigation?

	COMEY: I didn't modify the word investigation. It was, again, he was reacting strongly against the unverified material, saying I'm tempted to order you to investigate it. In the context of that, I said, sir, be careful about it. I might create a narrative we're investigating you personally. 


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	HOLT: Did -- did you call him?

	TRUMP: In one case I called him and one case he called me.

	HOLT: And did you ask am I under investigation?

	TRUMP: I actually asked him, yes. I said if it's possible, would you let me know am I under investigation. He said you are not under investigation.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/11/us/politics/trump-comey-firing.html
	In a Private Dinner, Trump Demanded Loyalty. Comey Demurred.

	By MICHAEL S. SCHMIDTMAY 11, 2017 

	Mr. Trump told NBC that Mr. Comey requested it to ask to keep his job. Mr. Trump said he asked the F.B.I. director if he was under investigation, a question that legal experts called highly unusual if not improper. In Mr. Trump’s telling, Mr. Comey reassured him that he was not.


http://thehill.com/policy/defense/315582-flynns-communications-with-russia-investigated-report
	Flynn’s communications with Russia investigated: report
	01/22/17

	U.S. counterintelligence agents investigated national security adviser Michael Flynn’s communications with Russian officials, The Wall Street Journal reported Sunday night.


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	TRUMP: ...As far as the general's concerned, when I first heard about it, I said huh, that doesn't sound wrong. My counsel came, Don McGahn, White House Counsel, and he told me and I asked him, he can speak very well for himself. He said he doesn't think anything is wrong, you know, really didn't think.

	It was really, what happened after that but he didn't think anything was done wrong. I didn't either because I waited a period of time and I started to think about it, I said "well I don't see" -- to me, he was doing the job.

	The information was provided by -- who I don't know, Sally Yates. And I was a little surprised because I said "doesn't sound like he did anything wrong there." 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	YATES: I had two in-person meetings and one phone call with the White House Counsel about Mr. Flynn. The first meeting occurred on January 26, called Don McGahn first thing that morning and told him that I had a very sensitive matter that I needed to discuss with him, that I couldn't talk about it on the phone and that I needed to come see him. And he agreed to meet with me later that afternoon.

	...DURBIN: ...Ms. Yates, let me ask you about this meeting on January the 26th with White House Counsel Don McGahn. You shared the Justice Department's concern about his communications with Russia, his apparent dishonesty about those communications and his vulnerability to blackmail. Is that correct?

	YATES: That's right.

	...YATES: ...One of the -- one of the issues that Mr. McGahn raised with me in this second meeting that again was on the 27th, the day after the first meeting, was his concern because we had told him before that we were giving him this information so that they could take action.

	And he said that they were concerned that taking action might interfere with the FBI investigation. And we told him, both the senior career official and I, that he should not be concerned with it, that General Flynn had been interviewed, that their action would not interfere with any investigation and in fact, I remember specifically saying, you know it wouldn't really be fair of us to tell you this and then expect you to sit on your hands.


https://lawfareblog.com/what-do-we-know-about-investigations-trump-associates-ties-russia
	What Do We Know About Investigations Into Trump Associates’ Ties to Russia?
	By Susan Hennessey, Jordan Brunner
	Wednesday, January 25, 2017

	On Sunday night, the Wall Street Journal broke a story that U.S. counterintelligence officials “had investigated” the communications of National Security Advisor Michael Flynn as part of a counterintelligence inquiry. This set off a storm of contradicting reports, with the Washington Post asserting that Flynn had been cleared and was not part of the broader investigation into Trump associates’ ties to Russia, and then still other outlets reporting that in fact the investigation was still ongoing.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-to-russia-1485134942
https://www.dowjones.com/scoops/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-russia/
	U.S. Eyes Michael Flynn’s Links to Russia
	By Carol E. Lee, Devlin Barrett and Shane Harris
	Jan. 22, 2017 8:29 p.m. ET 

	Counterintelligence agents have investigated communications by President Trump’s national security adviser, including phone calls to Russian ambassador in late December

	Michael Flynn is the first person inside the White House under Mr. Trump whose communications are known to have faced scrutiny as part of investigations by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Central Intelligence Agency, National Security Agency and Treasury Department to determine the extent of Russian government contacts with people close to Mr. Trump.

	It isn’t clear when the counterintelligence inquiry began, whether it produced any incriminating evidence or if it is continuing. Mr. Flynn, a retired general who became national security adviser with Mr. Trump’s inauguration, plays a key role in setting U.S. policy toward Russia.

	The counterintelligence inquiry aimed to determine the nature of Mr. Flynn’s contact with Russian officials and whether such contacts may have violated laws, people familiar with the matter said.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-reviewed-flynns-calls-with-russian-ambassador-but-found-nothing-illicit/2017/01/23/aa83879a-e1ae-11e6-a547-5fb9411d332c_story.html
 	FBI reviewed Flynn’s calls with Russian ambassador but found nothing illicit 

	By Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller January 23

	The FBI in late December reviewed intercepts of communications between the Russian ambassador to the United States and retired Lt. Gen. Michael T. Flynn — national security adviser to then-President-elect Trump — but has not found any evidence of wrongdoing or illicit ties to the Russian government, U.S. officials said. 

	...Although Flynn’s contacts with Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak were listened to, Flynn himself is not the active target of an investigation, U.S. officials said. The Wall Street Journal reported Sunday that U.S. counterintelligence agents had investigated the communications between Flynn and Kislyak.


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	TRUMP: 	...And I was a little surprised because I said "doesn't sound like he did anything wrong there." But he did something wrong with respect to the vice president and I thought that was not acceptable. As far as -- as far as the actual making the call, fact I've watched various programs and I've read various articles where he was just doing his job.


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/report-fbi-clears-flynn-of-wrongdoing-in-talk-with-russian-ambassador/article/2612774
	...The Post reported Flynn did not commit any wrongdoing and there is no evidence of illicit ties between him and the Russian government.


http://dailycaller.com/2017/01/23/report-probe-of-michael-flynns-russia-phone-calls-found-nothing-illicit/
	...Michael Flynn, was not the target of a counter-intelligence investigation of his contacts with Russia’s ambassador to the U.S., contrary to reports on Sunday suggesting that he was, according to The Washington Post.


http://www.breitbart.com/national-security/2017/01/25/fbi-nothing-illicit-flynns-calls-russian-ambassador/
	...The Post flatly states that “Flynn himself is not the active target of an investigation, U.S. officials said.”

	Other reports, such as a Sunday posting from the Wall Street Journal, have said it was unclear if any Flynn investigations were still in progress.


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/2016-election/trump-revokes-washington-post-s-press-credentials-n591586
	Jun 13 2016, 6:22 pm ET
	Trump Revokes Washington Post’s Press Credentials

	by Andrew Rafferty and Alex Seitz-Wald

 	Unhappy with "incredibly inaccurate coverage," Donald Trump on Monday announced he would revoke the Washington Post's press credentials.

	“The Washington Post unfortunately covers Mr. Trump very inaccurately. Today's headline, 'Donald Trump Suggests President Obama Was Involved With Orlando Shooting' is a perfect example. We no longer feel compelled to work with a publication which has put its need for "clicks" above journalistic integrity,” Trump’s campaign said in a statement.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/23/politics/flynn-russia-calls-investigation/index.html
	US investigating Flynn calls with Russian diplomat
	Jim Sciutto-Profile-Image

	Updated 7:50 PM ET, Mon January 23, 2017 

	US investigators are scrutinizing late December calls between Mike Flynn, President Donald Trump's national security adviser, and Russia's ambassador to the US as part of a broader counterintelligence investigation of Russian activities in the US, law enforcement and intelligence officials told CNN.

	The calls were captured by routine US eavesdropping targeting the Russian diplomats, according to the intelligence and law enforcement officials. But the officials said some of the content of the conversation raised enough potential concerns that investigators are still looking into the discussions, amid a broader concern about Russian intelligence-gathering activities in the United States.

	The officials all stressed that so far there has been no determination of any wrongdoing.

	...Among the communications being scrutinized are calls between Russia's ambassador, Sergey Kislyak, and Flynn on December 29.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-to-russia-1485134942
https://www.dowjones.com/scoops/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-russia/
	U.S. Eyes Michael Flynn’s Links to Russia
	By Carol E. Lee, Devlin Barrett and Shane Harris
	Jan. 22, 2017 8:29 p.m. ET 

	...In a statement Sunday night, the White House said it has “absolutely no knowledge of any investigation or even a basis for such an investigation.”


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	TRUMP: ...That was very normal. You know, first everybody got excited because they thought he did something wrong. After they thought about it, it turned out he was just doing his job. So -- and I do. And by the way, with all of that being said, I do think he's a fine man.

	...And just while you're at it, because you mentioned this, Wall Street Journal did a story today that was almost as disgraceful as the failing New York Time's story, yesterday. And it talked about -- these are (ph) front page.

	So director of national intelligence just put out, acting a statement, any suggestion that the United States intelligence community, this was just given to us, is withholding information and not providing the best possible intelligence to the president and his national security team is not true.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/spies-keep-intelligence-from-donald-trump-1487209351
	Spies Keep Intelligence From Donald Trump on Leak Concerns
	Decision to withhold information underscores deep mistrust between intelligence community and president

	By Shane Harris and Carol E. Lee
	Feb. 16, 2017 12:33 a.m. ET


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	TRUMP: ...So they took this front page story out of The Wall Street Journal top and they just wrote the story that its not true. And I'll tell you something, I'll be honest, because I sort of enjoy this back and forth that I guess I have all my life but I've never seen more dishonest media than frankly, the political media. I thought the financial media was much better, much more honest.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-to-russia-1485134942
https://www.dowjones.com/scoops/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-russia/
	U.S. Eyes Michael Flynn’s Links to Russia
	By Carol E. Lee, Devlin Barrett and Shane Harris
	Jan. 22, 2017 8:29 p.m. ET

	...Michael Flynn is the first person inside the White House under Mr. Trump whose communications are known to have faced scrutiny as part of investigations by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Central Intelligence Agency, National Security Agency and Treasury Department

	...A key issue in the investigation is a series of telephone calls Mr. Flynn made to Sergey Kislyak, the Russian ambassador to the U.S., on Dec. 29. That day, the Obama administration announced sanctions and other measures against Russia in retaliation for its alleged use of cyberattacks to interfere with the 2016 U.S. election.

	...Officials also have examined earlier conversations between Mr. Flynn and Russian figures, the people familiar with the matter said.

	...Earlier this month, Sean Spicer, then spokesman for the Trump transition team and now White House press secretary, said the contacts between Messrs. Flynn and Kislyak dealt with the logistics of arranging a conversation between Mr. Trump and Russia’s leader.

	“That was it,” Mr. Spicer said, “plain and simple.”

	U.S. officials have collected information showing repeated contacts between Messrs. Flynn and Kislyak, these people said. It is common for American officials’ conversations with foreign officials to surface in NSA intercepts, because the U.S. conducts wide-ranging surveillance on foreign officials. American names also may surface in descriptions of conversations shared among officials of foreign governments.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	WHITEHOUSE: Following the Comey line, the director testified a few days ago in the full committee that the FBI had interviewed Mr. Flynn a day before, or two days before, your meeting at the White House, and you've just testified that you had told the White House counsel that the FBI had interviewed Flynn and he'd asked -- McGahn had asked, how'd he do?

	YATES: Right.

	...WHITEHOUSE: Do you know where that interview took place or under what circumstances?

	YATES: I believe it took place at the White House.

	WHITEHOUSE: The Flynn interview?

	YATES: Yes.

	WHITEHOUSE: OK. Do you know if Flynn was represented by council at the time?

	YATES: I don't believe he was.

	...YATES: ...The FBI had conducted the interview on the 24th. We got a readout from the FBI on the 25th, a detailed readout specifically from the agents that had conducted the interview.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/824083821889015809
	Big day planned on NATIONAL SECURITY tomorrow. Among many other things, we will build the wall!
	6:37 PM - 24 Jan 2017 


http://www.cnbc.com/2017/01/24/trump-to-restrict-immigration-from-several-middle-east-countries-reuters.html
	Trump expected to sign executive orders on immigration
	Tuesday, 24 Jan 2017 | 9:17 PM ET

	 U.S. President Donald Trump is expected to sign several executive orders on Wednesday restricting immigration from Syria and six other Middle Eastern or African countries, according to several congressional aides and immigration experts briefed on the matter.

	In addition to Syria, Trump's orders are expected to temporarily restrict access to the United States for most refugees. Another order will block visas from being issued to those from Iraq, Iran, Libya, Somalia, Sudan and Yemen, said the aides and experts, who asked not to be identified.

	The restrictions on refugees are likely to include a multi-month ban on admissions from all countries until the State Department and the Department of Homeland Security can make the vetting process more rigorous.


http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/read-draft-text-trump-executive-order-muslim-entry_us_5888fe00e4b0024605fd591d
	01/25/2017 03:19 pm ET 

	Read Draft Text Of Trump’s Executive Order Limiting Muslim Entry To The U.S. (EXCLUSIVE)
	The document details how the president plans to deliver on his campaign promise of a Muslim ban.

	The White House intends to temporarily shut down travel from a wide swath of countries to the United States and implement dramatic restrictions on immigration and refugee admission, according to a draft version of a White House executive order obtained Wednesday by The Huffington Post.


http://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/protestors-flood-nycs-washington-square-park-in-anticipation-of-muslim-ban_us_58893575e4b0737fd5cb81db
	01/25/2017 08:33 pm ET | Updated Jan 26, 2017
	Protesters Flood NYC’s Washington Square Park To Oppose Muslim Ban

	NEW YORK ― “Resist!”

	That was the chant that could be heard blocks away from New York City’s Washington Square Park Wednesday night as up to a thousand protesters gathered to show their solidarity with the Muslim community.


http://www.thedailystar.net/world/protesters-fill-nyc-park-protest-muslim-immigration-ban-1351291
	January 26, 2017

	Protesters fill in NY park to protest immigration ban

	After Donald Trump’s recent order curtailing immigration of refugees and attacking Muslim and immigrant rights, demonstrators filled Washington Square Park in New York City on Wednesday afternoon in protest.

	The crowd filled the streets of West Village with passionate chanting and cheering.


https://www.democracynow.org/2017/1/26/headlines/thousands_protest_trumps_immigration_crackdown_in_nyc_dc_la
	Thousands Protest Trump's Immigration Crackdown in NYC, D.C. & L.A.
	Jan 26, 2017

	Trump’s crackdown on immigration drew immediate protest nationwide. Thousands of people poured into New York City’s Washington Square Park Tuesday night holding candles and signs reading "No One Is Illegal." Vigils and rallies were also held outside Los Angeles City Hall and at the Columbia Heights Civic Plaza in Washington, D.C.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/01/trump-immigration-block-muslim-ban-234205
	Trump says immigration block 'not the Muslim ban'

	01/25/2017 11:22 PM

	“No, it’s not the Muslim ban,” the president told ABC's David Muir during an interview that aired Wednesday night, while reiterating the need to restrict access into the U.S. in some form.

	“You’re looking at people that come in in many cases with evil intentions. I don’t want that. They’re ISIS. They’re coming in under false pretense. I don’t want that," he added.

	According to a draft copy and supporting material for a White House executive order that the president plans to unveil as early as Thursday


http://time.com/4645442/gorbachev-putin-trump/
	Mikhail Gorbachev: 'It All Looks as if the World Is Preparing for War'
	Mikhail Gorbachev
	Jan 26, 2017

	...Today, however, the nuclear threat once again seems real. Relations between the great powers have been going from bad to worse for several years now. The advocates for arms build-up and the military-industrial complex are rubbing their hands.

	We must break out of this situation. We need to resume political dialogue aiming at joint decisions and joint action.

	There is a view that the dialogue should focus on fighting terrorism. This is indeed an important, urgent task. But, as a core of a normal relationship and eventually partnership, it is not enough.


http://www.newsweek.com/russias-lavrov-warns-master-deal-trump-putin-can-negotiate-too-548513
	Russia’s Lavrov Warns ‘Master of Deal’ Trump That Putin Is More Than a Match at Negotiating Table
	By Damien Sharkov On 1/26/17 at 11:03 AM 

	Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov has told parliament in his home country that although Donald Trump boasts of being a “master of the deal,” Russia’s own leader is also no slouch in getting the best results for Russia.

	Lavrov spoke in the lower house of parliament Thursday, referring to Donald Trump’s speech at his presidential inauguration last week, when he declared his prime policy would be “America first.” While Putin and Trump have voiced a willingness to improve their countries’ relationship, they are yet to settle on a date for a meeting.


http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/316382-petition-demanding-trumps-tax-returns-gets-record-number-of
	Petition for Trump’s tax returns gets record number of signatures
	By Max Greenwood - 01/26/17 04:59 PM EST 


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/white-house/trump-putin-speak-phone-weekend-n712851
	Jan 27 2017, 12:36 am ET
	Trump and Putin to Speak by Phone This Weekend

 	President Donald Trump will speak with Russian President Vladimir Putin by phone this weekend, an administration official familiar with the planning said.

	The planned phone call appears to be the first conversation between the two leaders since Trump was inaugurated as the nation’s 45th president last Friday. 


http://www.newsweek.com/russias-lavrov-warns-master-deal-trump-putin-can-negotiate-too-548513
	...Whenever that meeting does occur though, Lavrov told parliamentarians, Putin was unlikely to be outmaneuvered, Russian state news agency Itar-Tass reports.

	“We have no illusions that there will be a new reset with the United States,” Lavrov cautioned. “We do not bear any naive expectations.”

	However, after explaining that both sides must work on improving relations, he told Russian politicians not to expect Putin to back down from Russia’s interests either.

	“We know that Trump considers himself a master in the (art of the) deal, but Vladimir Putin also knows how to negotiate, and does it always in the interest of Russia,” Lavrov added.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/06/08/us/politics/senate-hearing-transcript.html
	BLUNT: And — and you’re — had you previously, on February the 14th, discussed with the president, in the previous meeting, anything your investigators had learned, or their impressions from talking to Flynn?

	COMEY: No, sir.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	BLUMENTHAL: ...The meeting that the FBI conducted on January 24th preceded by one day, approximately, your first meeting with Donald McGahn. Isn't it a fact that Michael Flynn lied to the FBI?

	YATES: And I can't reveal the internal FBI investigation, Senator, even though it's not -- even though part would not be technically classified, it's on ongoing investigation and I can't reveal that.

	BLUMENTHAL: Did you tell Donald McGahn that then-National Security Adviser Flynn told the truth to the FBI?

	YATES: No, he asked me how he had done in the interview, and I specifically declined to answer that.

	BLUMENTHAL: Because it was part of an investigation?

	YATES: That's right.

	BLUMENTHAL: Was that intended to indicate to him that Michael Flynn had a problem in that interview?

	YATES: No, I was intending to let him know that Michael Flynn had a problem on a lot of levels, but it wasn't necessarily with respect to how he performed in the interview. I was intentionally not letting him know how the interview had gone.
	
	...YATES: ...The first topic in the second meeting was essentially why does it matter to DOJ if one White House official lies to another. The second topic related to the applicability of criminal statutes and the likelihood that the Department of Justice would pursue a criminal case. The third topic was his concern that their taking action might interfere with an investigation of Mr. Flynn. And the fourth topic was his request to see the underlying evidence.

	...YATES: ...And there was a request made by Mr. McGahn, in the second meeting as to whether or not they would be able to look at the underlying evidence that we had that we had described for him of General Flynn's conduct. And we told him that we were inclined to allow them to look at that underlying evidence, that we wanted to go back to DOJ and be able to make the logistical arrangements for that. This second meeting on the 27th occurred late in the afternoon, this is Friday the 27th. 


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jan/27/donald-trump-muslim-refugee-ban-executive-action
	Trump signs 'extreme vetting' executive order for people entering the US 

	Friday 27 January 2017 16.54 EST

	Marking a draconian shift in US policy, Donald Trump on Friday issued an executive order that will deny refugees and immigrants from certain Muslim-majority countries entry to the United States.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	WHITEHOUSE: Did you discuss criminal prosecution of Mr. Flynn -- General Flynn?

	YATES: My recollection is that did not really come up much in the first meeting. It did come up in the second meeting, when Mr. McGahn called me back the next morning and asked the -- the morning after -- this is the morning of the 27th, now -- and asked me if I could come back to his office.

	And so I went back with the NSD official, and there were essentially four topics that he wanted to discuss there, and one of those topics was precisely that. He asked about the applicability of certain statutes, certain criminal statutes and, more specifically, about...


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	January 27 Dinner

	The President and I had dinner on Friday, January 27 at 6:30 pm in the Green Room at the White House. He had called me at lunchtime that day and invited me to dinner that night

	...The President began by asking me whether I wanted to stay on as FBI Director, which I found strange because he had already told me twice in earlier conversations that he hoped I would stay, and I had assured him that I intended to. He said that lots of people wanted my job and, given the abuse I had taken during the previous year, he would understand if I wanted to walk away.

	My instincts told me that the one-on-one setting, and the pretense that this was our first discussion about my position, meant the dinner was, at least in part, an effort to have me ask for my job and create some sort of patronage relationship. That concerned me greatly, given the FBI’s traditionally independent status in the executive branch.

	I replied that I loved my work and intended to stay and serve out my ten-year term as Director. And then, because the set-up made me uneasy, I added that I was not “reliable” in the way politicians use that word, but he could always count on me to tell him the truth. I added that I was not on anybody’s side politically and could not be counted on in the traditional political sense, a stance I said was in his best interest as the President.

	A few moments later, the President said, “I need loyalty, I expect loyalty.” I didn’t move, speak, or change my facial expression in any way during the awkward silence that followed. We simply looked at each other in silence. The conversation then moved on, but he returned to the subject near the end of our dinner.

	...During the dinner, the President returned to the salacious material I had briefed him about on January 6, and, as he had done previously, expressed his disgust for the allegations and strongly denied them. He said he was considering ordering me to investigate the alleged incident to prove it didn’t happen. I replied that he should give that careful thought because it might create a narrative that we were investigating him personally, which we weren’t, and because it was very difficult to prove a negative. He said he would think about it and asked me to think about it.

	...At one point, I explained why it was so important that the FBI and the Department of Justice be independent of the White House. I said it was a paradox: Throughout history, some Presidents have decided that because “problems” come from Justice, they should try to hold the Department close. But blurring those boundaries ultimately makes the problems worse by undermining public trust in the institutions and their work.

	Near the end of our dinner, the President returned to the subject of my job, saying he was very glad I wanted to stay, adding that he had heard great things about me from Jim Mattis, Jeff Sessions, and many others. He then said, “I need loyalty.” I replied, “You will always get honesty from me.” He paused and then said, “That’s what I want, honest loyalty.” I paused, and then said, “You will get that from me.” As I wrote in the memo I created immediately after the dinner, it is possible we understood the phrase “honest loyalty” differently, but I decided it wouldn’t be productive to push it further. The term – honest loyalty – had helped end a very awkward conversation and my explanations had made clear what he should expect.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	SEN. RON WYDEN: ...In talking to senator Warner about this dinner that you had with the president, I believe January 27th, all in one dinner, the president raised your job prospects, he asked for your loyalty and denied allegations against him. All took place over one supper. Now, you told senator Warner that the president was looking to, quote, get something. Looking back, did that dinner suggest that your job might be contingent on how you handled the investigation?

	COMEY: I don't know that I'd go that far. I got the sense my job would be contingent upon how he felt I — excuse me — how he felt I conducted myself and whether I demonstrated loyalty. But I don't know whether I'd go so far as to connect it to the investigation.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/27/politics/trump-putin-call-russia-sanctions/index.html
	Trump says he might not like Putin once he gets to know him

	Updated 9:10 PM ET, Fri January 27, 2017

	President Donald Trump said Friday it was "too early" to start discussing lifting sanctions on Russia, whose leader he will speak with Saturday, though he indicated his interest in warmer ties.

	Earlier Friday, though, top Trump adviser Kellyanne Conway told Fox News that lifting US sanctions on Russia would be up for discussion when the two countries' leaders talk.

	"All of that is under consideration," Conway said when asked specifically whether lifting sanctions approved by the Obama administration would be considered.

	Friday night, however, a senior administration official said the current plan was not to lift the Russian sanctions.

	Saturday's phone call will be the first phone conversation between Trump and Russian President Vladimir Putin since the inauguration. Vice President Mike Pence also will join the call.

	"I hear a call was set up and we will see what happens," Trump said regarding sanctions during a White House news conference.

	"We're looking to have a great relationship with all countries," Trump added. "If we can have a great relationship with Russia and China and all countries, I'm all for that."

	He added, "How the relationship works out, I won't be able to tell you that (until) later. I've had many times where I thought I'd get along with people and I don't like them at all."

	Trump also said there was "no guarantee" on a path forward.

	The President said he hopes to have a good rapport with Putin but that it was possible they would be adversaries.

	"I hope we have a fantastic relationship. That's possible, and it's also possible that we won't. We will see what happens," he said. 

	Obama imposed sanctions on Russia throughout his eight years as president and earlier this month expelled 35 Russian diplomats from the United States for alleged Russian interference in the 2016 election.



On Jan 22nd, the Wall Street Journal reports that Flynn's contacts with the Russian ambassador are under legal scrutiny. On Jan 23rd, the Washington Post reports that the FBI reviewed Flynn's communications and found no wrongdoing, launching a flurry of contradicting reports. The next day, Flynn is interviewed by the FBI at the White House. Flynn does not have a lawyer present during the interview. That morning, the same authors at the Washington Post report that Trump intends to keep James Comey as FBI director. However, both Comey and Trump will later say that they discussed whether or not Comey should stay as FBI director at the Jan 27th dinner, three days later.

Later the day of Jan 24th, Trump announces plans for his travel ban. The text of the executive order is leaked the next day to widespread protest. Putin threatens Trump about something the following morning.

On the 26th, Yates warns the White House that Flynn has been compromised, vulnerable to blackmail for lying to the Vice President about discussing sanctions with the Russians. Yates tells the White House that Pence repeating this lie to the media further amplifies the potential for blackmail. It is unclear why Trump himself does not correct Pence. Yates also tells the White House that Flynn's communications with the Russian ambassador are problematic in and of themselves, and that Flynn has been interviewed by the FBI. It is unclear if Trump learned that Flynn was interviewed without a lawyer, although he might have been able to infer such by examining White House visitor logs.

The next day, the 27th, Trump schedules a phone call with Putin, apparently at Putin's request. This appears to be the phone call Flynn had promised to the Russian ambassador on December 28th. The agenda for the call is said to include U.S. sanctions on Russia. Trump also schedules his dinner meeting with Comey around the same time. That afternoon, McGahn returns to meet Yates with questions about the applicability of certain criminal statues and whether or not the DOJ would pursue a criminal case. McGahn also requests to schedule a meeting to see the underlying evidence of Flynn's conduct. If the White House ever reviews the evidence, it is not before Yates is fired later on the 31st.

Later the evening of the 27th, Trump and Comey meet in a one-on-one setting. According to Comey's testimony, Trump begins by asking Comey if he wants to stay on as FBI director, and offers him the opportunity to leave. Comey tells Trump he wants to stay, but warns that he is not "reliable" or "on anybody's side" in the political sense. In response to this, Trump tells comey "I need loyalty, I expect loyalty." Comey doesn't say anything in response.

During the dinner, Trump asks Comey if he's under investigation, and Comey tells Trump he's not under investigation. Comey had previously assured trump he was not under investigation on the 6th. Trump will go on to say the dinner was the first time he learned he was not under investigation.

Trump also tells Comey he's considering ordering him to investigate the salacious allegations in the dossier. Comey tells Trump to think carefully, as that could make it look like the FBI were investigating Trump. Trump says he would think about it and asks Comey to think about it.

At some point during the dinner, Comey explains to Trump that it is important for the FBI and DOJ to be independent of the White House. Comey says that some Presidents try to encroach on the independence of the DOJ when "problems" come from Justice, but this makes the problems worse.

At the end of the dinner, Trump tells Comey he's glad he wants to stay on, and once again tells him "I need loyalty." Comey tells him "You will always get honesty from me." Trump says "That's what I want, honest loyalty." Comey replies "You will get that from me."


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/for-first-call-between-president-trump-and-putin-moscow-hopeseverything-will-be-positive/2017/01/28/b9a0a8ce-e542-11e6-879b-356663383f1b_story.html
 	For first call between President Trump and Putin, Moscow hopes ‘everything will be positive’ 
	By David Filipov January 28

	...Trump has also vehemently denied allegations that his positive view of Moscow resulted from business ties or blackmail by Russian intelligence, and he has sought to portray his upbeat words about Putin as a positive.

	He has consistently argued that Russia can be a strong ally instead of a strategic ally, saying the two countries could cooperate on counterterrorism in general and rolling back the Islamic State in particular, as well as countering nuclear weapon proliferation. Trump has suggested that Washington can work with Moscow on the conflicts in Syria and Ukraine and that he might be ready to negotiate down NATO’s strong defensive posture on Russia’s western border. 


https://www.csmonitor.com/World/2017/0129/Sanctions-didn-t-come-up-on-Trump-Putin-call
 	Sanctions didn't come up on Trump-Putin call 

	January 29, 2017 —Officials say the thorny matter of U.S.-imposed sanctions on Russia didn't come up during President Donald Trump's first phone call with Russian President Vladimir Putin, which suggests that the more difficult obstacles to warmer relations between their nations can wait.

	...The White House official who spoke after the statement was issued said Putin brought up several times that Islamic terrorism was a "common foe" for the U.S. and Russia. The official was not authorized to disclose details of the call by name and insisted on anonymity.

	Addressing topics not mentioned in the White House statement, the Kremlin said that the two leaders discussed the importance of "restoring mutually beneficial trade and economic ties between business circles of the two countries."


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/trump-talks-with-putin-merkel-foreign-leaders-phone-calls/
	Trump talks with Putin, foreign leaders in round of phone calls

	Last Updated Jan 28, 2017 8:58 PM EST

	...According to a White House readout of the call, the “positive” conversation lasted approximately one hour and discussed topics ranging from “mutual cooperation in defeating ISIS” to efforts in Syria. 

	“Both President Trump and President Putin are hopeful that after today’s call the two sides can move quickly to tackle terrorism and other important issues of mutual concern,” the readout said. 

	In a Kremlin statement, Russia also mentioned that the leaders spoke about plans to organize a summit for the two. The White House did not confirm the information in their own readout of the call. 

	Vice President Mike Pence, chief of staff Reince Priebus, chief White House strategist Steve Bannon and National Security Adviser Michael Flynn were in the Oval Office during the call. 


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/01/30/russia-putin-trump-could-meet-before-july/97234574/
	Russia: Putin, Trump could meet before July

	Published 8:05 a.m. ET Jan. 30, 2017

	Russian President Vladimir Putin could meet face-to-face with President Trump before July, after the two leaders held an hour-long phone conversation over the weekend, a presidential spokesman said.

	Dmitry Peskov, Putin’s spokesman, told Russian news agency TASS that the two could “quite likely” meet before a Group of 20 summit in Hamburg, Germany on July 7-8. He said he hoped the leaders’ aides will "waste no time" in preparing.


http://www.christianpost.com/news/trump-to-prioritize-persecuted-christians-as-refugees-173681/
	Trump to Prioritize Persecuted Christians as Refugees

	By Anugrah Kumar , Christian Post Contributor
	Jan 28, 2017 

	President Donald Trump signed new orders to "keep radical Islamic terrorists out of the United States of America" and pledged to give priority to persecuted Christians as refugees.

	"We are going to help them (persecuted Christians). They've been horribly treated," Trump told CBN News Friday, the day he signed new orders to tighten America's refugee and visa policies.

	"Do you know if you were a Christian in Syria it was impossible, at least very tough to get into the United States? If you were a Muslim you could come in, but if you were a Christian, it was almost impossible and the reason that was so unfair, everybody was persecuted in all fairness, but they were chopping off the heads of everybody but more so the Christians. And I thought it was very, very unfair," Trump continued in the interview with The Brody File, which will be aired Sunday.

	...The newswire says President Trump also plans to suspend issuing visas for people from the predominantly Muslim countries of Iran, Iraq, Libya, Somalia, Sudan, Syria and Yemen for at least 30 days.

	...some Christian groups have expressed dismay at Trump's plans to curb refugee resettlement.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/30/politics/trump-travel-ban-q-and-a/
	This is the "extreme vetting" Trump promised during the campaign, but it still seems to have caught folks by surprise.

	Team Trump apparently never ran the order by officials at the Justice Department. Homeland Security officials weren't given much guidance about how the order would be implemented or enforced. Thus the confusion and chaos.

	The ban snared green card holders and people with valid visas alike. Some travelers who were in the air when Trump signed the order weren't able to enter the country when they landed. Some were detained. Others were sent back to where they flew in from. Lawsuits began to fly and by Saturday night a federal judge had temporarily and partially blocked Trump's order.

	How big is the backlash?

	It's global. Hundreds showed up at airports across the country -- from New York to Atlanta to Dallas to Seattle -- to protest. Vocal crowds against the order gathered outside the White House. 

	...There's panic in some US colleges and universities that have a large number of foreign students. Some students and faculty members fear they'll have to decide between careers or families. Some raced back to the United States as the executive order loomed, so they would be able to complete a degree. Now they're left to wonder when they'll get to see their families again if they remain in the United States.

	...There's hardship for those who planned to come to the States as well. Mahmoud Hassan, an 18-year-old Syrian in Damascus, accepted an offer to attend MIT earlier this year, but because of the ban, he said his "dreams are basically ruined." 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	KLOBUCHAR: And during that meeting did they mention -- anyone mention that this refugee order was about to come out?

	...YATES: No and that was one thing that was of concern to us, is that not only was department leadership not consulted here and beyond department leadership, really the subject matter experts, the national security experts, not only was the department not consulted, we weren't even told about it. I learned about this from media reports.

	KLOBUCHAR: So you learned about it after the meeting at the White house Council from the media.

	YATES: Right.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/01/28/trump-moves-past-day-refugee-ban-putin-more-executive-orders/97181992/
	Immigration ban fallout: What you need to know
	Published 11:05 a.m. ET Jan. 28, 2017

	...Judge grants emergency stay for those in limbo after immigration ban

	...Protests ramp up at airports across USA

	...Lawsuits also on the rise

	...Dozens detained at U.S. airports, other stranded abroad

	...Iran retaliates, Canada opens arms after Trump immigration ban

	...Trump: Immigration ban working 'nicely’

	...Refugee fallout around the USA

	...Advocacy group flooded with 1,000 calls amid 'complete chaos'

	...Kremlin: Trump, Putin agree to coordinate on fighting Islamic State

	...Iranian filmmaker Asghar Farhadi can't go to Oscars

	...Travel uncertainty for tens of thousands

	...Shockwaves felt through tech industry


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/316726-giuliani-trump-asked-me-how-to-do-a-muslim-ban-legally
	Giuliani: Trump asked me how to do a Muslim ban 'legally'

	By Rebecca Savransky - 01/29/17 08:48 AM EST

	Former New York City Mayor Rudy Giuliani (R) said in an interview on Saturday that President Trump had previously asked him about legally implementing a "Muslim ban."

	But Giuliani then disputed the notion that the president's sweeping executive order barring refugees and people from seven predominantly Muslim nations amounts to a ban on Muslims.

	"I’ll tell you the whole history of it: When he first announced it, he said ‘Muslim ban,'" Giuliani said on Fox News.

	"He called me up, he said, ‘Put a commission together, show me the right way to do it legally.’"

	Giuliani said he then put together a commission that included lawmakers and expert lawyers.

	"And what we did was we focused on, instead of religion, danger," Giuliani said.

	"The areas of the world that create danger for us, which is a factual basis, not a religious basis. Perfectly legal, perfectly sensible."


http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/28/politics/2-iraqis-file-lawsuit-after-being-detained-in-ny-due-to-travel-ban/
	Judges temporarily block part of Trump's immigration order, WH stands by it


dhttps://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2017/01/29/president-trumps-travel-ban-is-causing-chaos-dont-expect-him-to-back-down/
	A federal judge in New York blocked deportations nationwide late Saturday of those detained on entry to the United States after an executive order from President Trump targeted citizens from seven predominantly Muslim countries.

	Judge Ann Donnelly of the U.S. District Court in Brooklyn granted a request from the American Civil Liberties Union to stop the deportations after determining that the risk of injury to those detained by being returned to their home countries necessitated the decision.


https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2017/01/30/us/document-Letter-From-Sally-Yates.html
	Letter From Sally Yates

	Jan 30, 2017

	...Its review does not take account of statements made by an administration or its surrogates close in time to the issuance of an Executive Order that may bear on the order's purpose.

	...I am not convinced that the defense of the Executive Order is consistent with these responsibilities nor am I convinced that the Executive Order is lawful.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	YATES: Right, so that that would not have a negative impact on the FBI investigation at that point.

	And there was a request made by Mr. McGahn, in the second meeting as to whether or not they would be able to look at the underlying evidence that we had that we had described for him of General Flynn's conduct. And we told him that we were inclined to allow them to look at that underlying evidence, that we wanted to go back to DOJ and be able to make the logistical arrangements for that.

	...YATES: Two meetings and then a phone call at the end to let him know...

	WHITEHOUSE: That the material was available if he wanted to see it.

	YATES: ... that the material was available. He had to call me back. He was not available then and I did not hear back from him until that afternoon of Monday the 30th.

	WHITEHOUSE: And that was the end of this episode, nobody came over to look at the material?

	YATES: I don't know what happened after that because that was my last day with DOJ.


https://www.bostonglobe.com/news/politics/2017/01/30/read-full-white-house-statement-sally-yates/HkFReIYJidU9deDelPK6SM/story.html
	January 31, 2017

	 The White House has fired acting Attorney General Sally Yates, a Democratic appointee, after she directed Justice Department attorneys not to defend President Donald Trump’s controversial executive refugee and immigration ban.

	The following is the full White House statement:

	“The acting Attorney General, Sally Yates, has betrayed the Department of Justice by refusing to enforce a legal order designed to protect the citizens of the United States. This order was approved as to form and legality by the Department of Justice Office of Legal Counsel.

	Ms. Yates is an Obama Administration appointee who is weak on borders and very weak on illegal immigration.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2017/02/02/the-leaks-coming-out-of-the-trump-white-house-right-now-are-totally-bananas/
	The leaks coming out of the Trump White House right now are totally bananas
	By Chris Cillizza February 2

	Here are a few leaks that have come out of the Trump administration in just the last 24 hours:

	* President Trump abruptly ended a phone call with Australian Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull after condemning a refugee deal with the country and telling Turnbull "this was the worst call by far" he has had with a world leader.

	* Trump threatened — his administration insisted it was "light-hearted" — Mexican President Enrique Peña Nieto with sending American troops into his country.

	* The White House asked Judge Thomas Hardiman to drive toward D.C. to amp up the drama in advance of Trump's Supreme Court pick on Tuesday night. (Hardiman was passed over in favor of Colorado federal appeals court judge Neil Gorsuch.)

	...What's truly remarkable is that the leaking appears to be growing even more frequent and even more deleterious to President Trump's image within just the last few days.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-leaks-idUSKBN15I321
	Fri Feb 3, 2017 | 6:32pm EST
	White House investigates leaks of Trump calls to Australia, Mexico

	The White House is looking into how embarrassing details of President Donald Trump's recent tense phone conversations with his counterparts in Australia and Mexico were leaked to news organizations, White House spokesman Sean Spicer said on Fox News Channel.

	"The president takes these leaks very seriously," Spicer said in an interview with Fox News Channel, which on Friday provided a transcript of a segment set to air on Saturday.


http://www.foxnews.com/politics/2017/02/06/trump-leaked-transcripts-mexico-australia-calls-disgraceful.html
	Trump: Leaked transcripts of Mexico, Australia calls 'disgraceful'
	Published February 06, 2017

	Trump, speaking to Fox News, accused “Obama people” of giving news organizations embarrassing details of his recent tense phone conversations with his Australian and Mexican counterparts, and said that the holdovers from the Obama administration still serving on his White House and National Security Council staff were being replaced.

	“It’s a disgrace that they leaked because it’s very much against our country,” Trump said, without stating why he believed that career civil servants who work in Democratic and Republican administrations were the source of the leaks. “It’s a very dangerous thing for this country,” he said.


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/318621-trump-white-house-besieged-by-leaks
	Trump White House besieged by leaks

	By Niall Stanage - 02/09/17 

	Donald Trump’s White House has sprung a remarkable number of leaks since his inauguration.

	The question is where they’re coming from.

	Barely a day goes by without some unusual tale emerging from 1600 Pennsylvania Ave. Recent examples in a single New York Times story included the assertion that White House aides have held meetings in the dark because they can’t figure out how the lights work and that the president is fond of watching television alone in his bathrobe.

	Trump took to Twitter to assert that the Times “writes total fiction” about him, while White House press secretary Sean Spicer insisted that the president does not even own a bathrobe.

	More serious matters have been leaked as well, such as descriptions of Trump’s call with Australian Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull. Trump apparently said a U.S.-Australia deal on refugees, agreed to by President Obama, was “the worst deal ever,” and told Turnbull their conversation was “the worst call by far” among several he had held with world leaders that day.

	The leakiness of the Trump White House has been a boon to the press corps, who find themselves feasting on the juicy insider details that were hard to come by during the “No Drama Obama” years.

	But to those rooting for a successful Trump presidency, the picture looks very different.

	“There have been a ton of leaks. It seems that everyone has their own leaking apparatus,” lamented one Trump ally who works outside the White House.

	...The speculation about who’s up and who’s down among Trump’s cadre of advisors won’t subside anytime soon, however.

	In part, that’s because any leak that emerges is immediately parsed for clues as to the source — and whom they might be intending to harm.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/national-security-adviser-flynn-discussed-sanctions-with-russian-ambassador-despite-denials-officials-say/2017/02/09/f85b29d6-ee11-11e6-b4ff-ac2cf509efe5_story.html
 	National security adviser Flynn discussed sanctions with Russian ambassador, despite denials, officials say 

	By Greg Miller, Adam Entous and Ellen Nakashima February 9

	National security adviser Michael Flynn privately discussed U.S. sanctions against Russia with that country’s ambassador to the United States during the month before President Trump took office, contrary to public assertions by Trump officials, current and former U.S. officials said.

	Flynn’s communications with Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak were interpreted by some senior U.S. officials as an inappropriate and potentially illegal signal to the Kremlin that it could expect a reprieve from sanctions that were being imposed by the Obama administration in late December to punish Russia for its alleged interference in the 2016 election.

	Flynn on Wednesday denied that he had discussed sanctions with Kislyak. Asked in an interview whether he had ever done so, he twice said, “No.”


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/09/us/flynn-is-said-to-have-talked-to-russians-about-sanctions-before-trump-took-office.html
	Flynn Is Said to Have Talked to Russians About Sanctions Before Trump Took Office

	By MATTHEW ROSENBERG and MATT APUZZO
	FEB. 9, 2017

	Weeks before President Trump’s inauguration, his national security adviser, Michael T. Flynn, discussed American sanctions against Russia, as well as areas of possible cooperation, with that country’s ambassador to the United States, according to current and former American officials.

	Throughout the discussions, the message Mr. Flynn conveyed to the ambassador, Sergey I. Kislyak — that the Obama administration was Moscow’s adversary and that relations with Russia would change under Mr. Trump — was unambiguous and highly inappropriate, the officials said.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/02/09/jeff-sessions-sworn-84th-attorney-general-executive-actions/97691732/
	Jeff Sessions sworn in as attorney general while Trump signs orders
	Published 11:43 a.m. ET Feb. 9, 2017

	Alabama Sen. Jeff Sessions was sworn in Thursday as the 84th attorney general of the United States as President Trump signed three executive actions aimed at bolstering law enforcement.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/02/10/trump-executive-order-obama-justice-department-succession/97752898/
	Without fanfare, Trump reverses Obama order on Justice Department succession
	USA TODAY 3:46 p.m. ET Feb. 10, 2017

	President Trump has quietly signed an executive order changing the order of succession in the Department of Justice, reversing an executive order by President Obama signed just last month.

	The order appears to be the first that Trump has not signed in a public ceremony. It's dated Thursday — the same day Attorney General Jeff Sessions was sworn in — but was not posted to the White House website until Friday morning. The White House did not explain the discrepancy.

	The executive order spells out who will act as the nation's highest law enforcement officer if the attorney general dies, resigns or becomes incapacitated. Such orders have been routine since the 2001 terrorist attacks, but Trump's is notable becomes it comes two weeks after he fired acting Attorney General Sally Yates for refusing to defend his executive order banning travelers from seven predominately Muslim countries.

	That time, Trump went outside the official order of succession — as he has the right to do — to elevate Dana Boente, the U.S. attorney for the Eastern District of Virginia, to acting attorney general.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/02/mike-flynn-nsa-aide-trump-234923
	CIA freezes out top Flynn aide

	The agency denied a security clearance for a key aide to the National Security Adviser — ratcheting up tensions between Flynn and the intel community.

	By Kenneth P. Vogel and Josh Dawsey

	02/10/2017 10:16 


www.cnn.com/2017/02/10/politics/flynn-russia-us-sanctions-reports/
	Trump says he's unaware of reports Flynn discussed sanctions with Russian ambassador

	Updated 7:22 PM ET, Fri February 10, 2017

	President Donald Trump said Friday afternoon he was unaware of reports that his national security adviser, Michael Flynn, may have spoken about sanctions with the Russian ambassador before the inauguration.
	Trump, speaking to reporters aboard Air Force One, said he will "look into that."


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/justice-department-warned-white-house-that-flynn-could-be-vulnerable-to-russian-blackmail-officials-say/2017/02/13/fc5dab88-f228-11e6-8d72-263470bf0401_story.html
	Justice Department warned White House that Flynn could be vulnerable to Russian blackmail, officials say 

	By Adam Entous, Ellen Nakashima and Philip Rucker February 13

	The acting attorney general informed the Trump White House late last month that she believed Michael Flynn had misled senior administration officials about the nature of his communications with the Russian ambassador to the United States, and warned that the national security adviser was potentially vulnerable to Russian blackmail, current and former U.S. officials said.


https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2017/02/13/us/politics/document-Michael-Flynn-Resignation-Letter.html
	Michael Flynn’s Resignation Letter

	February 13

	"I inadvertently briefed the Vice President Elect and others with incomplete information regarding my phone calls with the Russian Ambassador. I have sincerely apologized to the President and the Vice President, and they have accepted my apology."


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831510532318429184
	The real story here is why are there so many illegal leaks coming out of Washington? Will these leaks be happening as I deal on N.Korea etc?
	6:28 AM - 14 Feb 2017 


http://thehill.com/homenews/319386-wikileaks-flynn-leaving-due-to-destabilization-campaign-by-dems-media
	WikiLeaks: Flynn leaving due to 'destabilization campaign' by Dems, media
	02/14/17 08:49 AM EST


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/14/world/europe/russia-cruise-missile-arms-control-treaty.html
	Russia Deploys Missile, Violating Treaty and Challenging Trump
	FEB. 14, 2017

	Russia has secretly deployed a new cruise missile that American officials say violates a landmark arms control treaty, posing a major test for President Trump as his administration is facing a crisis over its ties to Moscow.


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/nationworld/politics/ct-democrat-effort-trump-tax-returns-20170214-story.html
	Republicans block Dem effort to get Trump's tax returns 
	February 14, 2017, 1:26 PM

	House Republicans on Tuesday blocked an attempt by Democrats to use an obscure law to obtain President Donald Trump's tax returns from the IRS.

	Democrats on the House Ways and Means Committee tried to frame the issue as a matter of national security. They questioned whether Trump has any investments in Russia.

	Trump has said he has no investments in Russia, and Democrats acknowledged that have no evidence otherwise. That's why they want Trump's returns, said Rep. Joseph Crowley, R-N.Y.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	February 14 Oval Office Meeting

	On February 14, I went to the Oval Office for a scheduled counter-terrorism briefing of the President. He sat behind the desk and a group of us sat in a semi-circle of about six chairs facing him on the other side of the desk. The Vice President, Deputy Director of the CIA, Director of the National Counter-Terrorism Center, Secretary of Homeland Security, the Attorney General, and I were in the semi-circle of chairs.

	...The President signaled the end of the briefing by thanking the group and telling them all that he wanted to speak to me alone. I stayed in my chair. As the participants started to leave the Oval Office, the Attorney General lingered by my chair, but the President thanked him and said he wanted to speak only with me.

	...the President began by saying, “I want to talk about Mike Flynn.” Flynn had resigned the previous day. The President began by saying Flynn hadn’t done anything wrong in speaking with the Russians, but he had to let him go because he had misled the Vice President. He added that he had other concerns about Flynn, which he did not then specify.

	The President then made a long series of comments about the problem with leaks of classified information – a concern I shared and still share. After he had spoken for a few minutes about leaks...

	...The President then returned to the topic of Mike Flynn, saying, “He is a good guy and has been through a lot.” He repeated that Flynn hadn’t done anything wrong on his calls with the Russians, but had misled the Vice President. He then said, “I hope you can see your way clear to letting this go, to letting Flynn go. He is a good guy. I hope you can let this go.” I replied only that “he is a good guy.” (In fact, I had a positive experience dealing with Mike Flynn when he was a colleague as Director of the Defense Intelligence Agency at the beginning of my term at FBI.) I did not say I would “let this go.”

	The President returned briefly to the problem of leaks. I then got up and left out the door by the grandfather clock, making my way through the large group of people waiting there, including Mr. Priebus and the Vice President.

	I immediately prepared an unclassified memo of the conversation about Flynn and discussed the matter with FBI senior leadership. I had understood the President to be requesting that we drop any investigation of Flynn in connection with false statements about his conversations with the Russian ambassador in December. I did not understand the President to be talking about the broader investigation into Russia or possible links to his campaign. I could be wrong, but I took him to be focusing on what had just happened with Flynn’s departure and the controversy around his account of his phone calls. Regardless, it was very concerning, given the FBI’s role as an independent investigative agency.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/14/us/politics/russia-intelligence-communications-trump.html
	Trump Campaign Aides Had Repeated Contacts With Russian Intelligence

	By MICHAEL S. SCHMIDT, MARK MAZZETTI and MATT APUZZO
	FEB. 14, 2017

	WASHINGTON — Phone records and intercepted calls show that members of Donald J. Trump’s 2016 presidential campaign and other Trump associates had repeated contacts with senior Russian intelligence officials in the year before the election, according to four current and former American officials.

	American law enforcement and intelligence agencies intercepted the communications around the same time they were discovering evidence that Russia was trying to disrupt the presidential election by hacking into the Democratic National Committee, three of the officials said. The intelligence agencies then sought to learn whether the Trump campaign was colluding with the Russians on the hacking or other efforts to influence the election.

	The officials interviewed in recent weeks said that, so far, they had seen no evidence of such cooperation.

	But the intercepts alarmed American intelligence and law enforcement agencies, in part because of the amount of contact that was occurring while Mr. Trump was speaking glowingly about the Russian president, Vladimir V. Putin.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831830548565852160
	The fake news media is going crazy with their conspiracy theories and blind hatred. @MSNBC & @CNN are unwatchable. @foxandfriends is great!
	3:40 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831837514226921472
	This Russian connection non-sense is merely an attempt to cover-up the many mistakes made in Hillary Clinton's losing campaign.
	4:08 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/14/us/politics/russia-intelligence-communications-trump.html
	...The National Security Agency, which monitors the communications of foreign intelligence services, initially captured the calls between Mr. Trump’s associates and the Russians as part of routine foreign surveillance. After that, the F.B.I. asked the N.S.A. to collect as much information as possible about the Russian operatives on the phone calls, and to search through troves of previous intercepted communications that had not been analyzed.

	The F.B.I. has closely examined at least three other people close to Mr. Trump, although it is unclear if their calls were intercepted. They are Carter Page, a businessman and former foreign policy adviser to the campaign; Roger Stone, a longtime Republican operative; and Mr. Flynn.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831840306161123328
	Information is being illegally given to the failing @nytimes & @washingtonpost by the intelligence community (NSA and FBI?).Just like Russia
	4:19 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831842652085686273
	Thank you to Eli Lake of The Bloomberg View - "The NSA & FBI...should not interfere in our politics...and is" Very serious situation for USA
	4:28 AM - 15 Feb 2017


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-02-14/the-political-assassination-of-michael-flynn
	The Political Assassination of Michael Flynn
	The national security adviser was the appetizer. Trump is the main course.
	by Eli Lake

	February 14, 2017, 3:09 PM GMT

	If we are to believe the Trump White House, National Security Adviser Michael Flynn just resigned because he lied about his conversations with Russia's ambassador to the vice president. As White House senior counselor Kellyanne Conway told NBC's "Today Show" on Tuesday: "Misleading the vice president really was the key here."

	...A better explanation here is that Flynn was just thrown under the bus.

	...Flynn was a fat target for the national security state. He has cultivated a reputation as a reformer and a fierce critic of the intelligence community leaders he once served with when he was the director the Defense Intelligence Agency under President Barack Obama. Flynn was working to reform the intelligence-industrial complex, something that threatened the bureaucratic prerogatives of his rivals.

	He was also a fat target for Democrats. Remember Flynn's breakout national moment last summer was when he joined the crowd at the Republican National Convention from the dais calling for Hillary Clinton to be jailed.

	...In the end, it was Trump's decision to cut Flynn loose. In doing this he caved in to his political and bureaucratic opposition. Nunes told me Monday night that this will not end well. "First it's Flynn, next it will be Kellyanne Conway, then it will be Steve Bannon, then it will be Reince Priebus," he said.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/15/us/politics/trump-condemns-leaks-to-news-media-in-a-twitter-flurry.html
	Flynn Was Brought Down by Illegal Leaks to News Media, Trump Says
	FEB. 15, 2017

	President Trump lashed out at the nation’s intelligence agencies again on Wednesday, saying that his former national security adviser, Michael T. Flynn, was brought down by illegal leaks to the news media, on a day of new disclosures about the Trump camp’s dealings with Russia during and after the presidential campaign.

	“From intelligence, papers are being leaked, things are being leaked,” Mr. Trump said at a White House news conference with Benjamin Netanyahu, the prime minister of Israel. “It’s a criminal action, criminal act, and it’s been going on for a long time before me, but now it’s really going on. And people are trying to cover up for a terrible loss that the Democrats had under Hillary Clinton.”

	With his statement and a burst of early-morning posts he made on Twitter, Mr. Trump tried to shift attention from damaging questions about contacts with Russia by Mr. Flynn and others close to the president, arguing that the outrage is not those contacts, but the leaks about them. 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831846101179314177
	Crimea was TAKEN by Russia during the Obama Administration. Was Obama too soft on Russia?
	4:42 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831853862281699331
	The real scandal here is that classified information is illegally given out by "intelligence" like candy. Very un-American!
	5:13 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/15/us/politics/trump-intelligence-agencies-stephen-feinberg.html
	White House Plans to Have Trump Ally Review Intelligence Agencies

	By JAMES RISEN and MATTHEW ROSENBERGFEB. 15, 2017 

	WASHINGTON — President Trump plans to assign a New York billionaire to lead a broad review of American intelligence agencies, according to administration officials, an effort that members of the intelligence community fear could curtail their independence and reduce the flow of information that contradicts the president’s worldview.

	The possible role for Stephen A. Feinberg, a co-founder of Cerberus Capital Management, has met fierce resistance among intelligence officials already on edge because of the criticism the intelligence community has received from Mr. Trump during the campaign and since he became president. On Wednesday, Mr. Trump blamed leaks from the intelligence community for the departure of Michael T. Flynn, his national security adviser, whose resignation he requested.


http://video.foxnews.com/v/5325771485001/?#sp=show-clips
	Trump: Intel leaks will stop as we get our people in place
	Feb. 16, 2017


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	FEBRUARY 16, 2017, 2:55 PM

	Russia is fake news. Russia -- this is fake news put out by the media. The real news is the fact that people, probably from the Obama administration because they're there, because we have our new people going in place, right now.

	As you know, Mike Pompeo has -- has now taken control of the CIA, James Comey at FBI, Dan Coats is waiting to be approved, I mean he is a senator and a highly respected one and he's still waiting to be approved. But our new people are going in.

	...QUESTION: Can we ask what you're going to do and also, we've heard about a -- a review of the intelligence community headed up by Steven Feinberg, what can you tell us about that?

	TRUMP: Well, first of all about that, we now have Dan Coats, hopefully soon, Mike Pompeo and James Comey and they're in position so I hope that we'll be able to straighten that out without using anybody else.

	...QUESTION: Did you direct Mike Flynn to discuss sanctions with the Russian ambassador --

	TRUMP: No, I didn't.

	QUESTION: -- prior to your --

	TRUMP: No, I didn't.

	QUESTION: -- inauguration.

	TRUMP: No, I didn't.

	QUESTION: And then fired him --

	TRUMP: Excuse me.

	QUESTION: (OFF-MIKE)

	TRUMP: No, I fired him because of what he said to Mike Pence. Very simple. Mike was doing his job. He was calling countries and his counterparts. So, it certainly would have been OK with me if he did it. I would have directed him to do it if I thought he wasn't doing it.

	...QUESTION: Thank you. I was just hoping that we could get a yes or no answer on one of these questions involving Russia. Can you say whether you are aware that anyone who advised your campaign had contacts with Russia during the course of the election?

	TRUMP: Well I told you, Gen. Flynn obviously was dealing. So that's one person. But he was dealing, as he should have been.

	QUESTION: During the election?

	TRUMP: No. Nobody that I know of. Nobody...

	QUESTION: So you're not aware of any contact during the course..

	TRUMP: Look, look, look...

	QUESTION: ... of the election?

	TRUMP: How many times do I have to answer this question?

	QUESTION: Can you just say yes or no?

	TRUMP: Russia is a ruse.

	I know you have to get up and ask a question. It's so important.

	Russia is a ruse. I have nothing to do with Russia.

	...TRUMP: Mike Flynn is a fine person, and I asked for his resignation. He respectfully gave it. He is a man who there was a certain amount of information given to Vice President Pence, who is with us today. And I was not happy with the way that information was given.

	He didn't have to do that, because what he did wasn't wrong -- what he did in terms of the information he saw.


https://web.archive.org/web/20170216214656/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/flynn-in-fbi-interview-denied-discussing-sanctions-with-russian-ambassador/2017/02/16/e3e1e16a-f3d5-11e6-8d72-263470bf0401_story.html
	Flynn in FBI interview denied discussing sanctions with Russian ambassador 

	By Sari Horwitz and Adam Entous February 16 at 4:37 PM

	Former National Security Adviser Michael Flynn denied to FBI agents in an interview last month that he had discussed U.S. sanctions against Russia with that country’s ambassador to the United States before President Trump took office, contradicting the contents of intercepted communications collected by intelligence agencies, current and former U.S. officials said.

	The Jan. 24 interview potentially puts Flynn in legal jeopardy, as lying to the FBI is a felony


Trump takes makes his widely anticipated/dreaded call with Putin, denying that he is being blackmailed. 
According to the Kremlin's readout of the call, Trump and Putin discussed "restoring beneficial trade and economic ties" and plans to organize a personal meeting between Trump and Putin in July. Pence was present for the call. The discussion of "economic ties" and plans for the meeting do not appear in the White House readout.

Meanwhile, Trump's travel ban is causing world-wide chaos. The ban caught the Justice Department and other U.S. officials by surprise, greatly adding to the confusion. Trump and his surrogates make public statements establishing the travel ban as religiously motivated, which is unconstitutional. Yates refuses to defend the ban, and Trump fires her for "betraying the Justice Department." Trump stresses that Yates is an Obama Administration appointee.

In the next few days, the White House is besieged by leaks showing, among other things, that Trump is incompetent and attempts to bully and threaten other leaders. The White House investigates the leaks, which Trump takes "very seriously." Trump blames the leaks on "Obama people." 

The leaks take-on new form on February 9th, when it is revealed that Flynn discussed the U.S. sanctions to deter election meddling with the Russian ambassador and made it unambiguous they would be revisited after Trump takes office. Meanwhile, Flynn is still vulnerable to blackmail, and Trump has not informed Pence that he was mislead. Flynn attempts to install an aide who's security clearance is denied by the CIA. Trump denies knowledge of reports that Flynn discussed sanctions.

It is around this time that Jeff Sessions is sworn in as Attorney General. Trump quietly signs an executive order changing the order of succession for the Attorney General, making Dana Boente next in line. Trump had previously picked Boente to replace acting AG Yates.

Trump keeps Flynn on for four more days. On the 13th, it is reported that Yates warned that White House Flynn was vulnerable to blackmail for lying to Pence. Trump fires Flynn a few hours later. Trump complains on twitter that the "real story" is the "illegal leaks coming out of Washington." Trump later charges that Flynn was brought down by "criminal leaks" from "intelligence." Wikileaks agrees.

The next day, Russia deploys a new nuclear missile, violating international law. Trump doesn't respond. House Republicans block Congress from obtaining Trump's tax returns.

In an oval office meeting that day, Trump singles out Comey to talk to him about Flynn and rant at him about leaks. Trump tells Comey Flynn "didn't do anything wrong" in talking to the Russians, but he had to fire him because he "misled the Vice President." Trump asks Comey "I hope you can see your way clear to letting this go, to letting Flynn go. He is a good guy. I hope you can let this go," although Comey doesn't make clear what exactly Trump wants Comey to "let go." Comey interprets it as Trump asking him to drop any investigation connected with Flynn's statements to the Russians.

Shortly after the meeting, it is reported that Trump's campaign was in repeated contact with Russian intelligence. Trump continues to publicly rant about leaks from the Intelligence Community and blame them on Obama-appointees. Trump claims the leaks will stop once he "gets his people in place," and his administration threatens to "review" U.S. intelligence agencies. Trump gives a press conference, threatening intelligence agencies, asserting he has nothing to do with Russia, and stressing that "Flynn did nothing wrong." A few hours later, the Washington post reports that Flynn lied to the FBI, and may by charged with a felony.


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/politics-news/schiff-defends-committee-examining-russia-trump-connections-n735391
	Mar 19 2017
	Rep. Schiff: ‘Circumstantial Evidence of Collusion’ Between Trump Campaign, Russia

	Despite denials from some top intelligence officials that there was any evidence of collusion between associates of Donald Trump’s presidential campaign and Russian operatives while Moscow tried to interfere with the 2016 election, Rep. Adam Schiff on Sunday defended the House Intelligence Committee continuing to look into the matter.

	Two weeks ago on "Meet The Press," James Clapper, the Director of National Intelligence under President Obama, denied that any evidence of such collusion existed while he oversaw the work of U.S. intelligence agencies. The Trump administration has also reiterated those denials. 

	But this Sunday on "Meet The Press," Schiff, D-Calif., told host Chuck Todd, "I was surprised to see Director Clapper say that because I don’t think you can make that claim categorically as he did. I would characterize it this way at the outset of the investigation: There is circumstantial evidence of collusion."


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843772976151642112
	James Clapper and others stated that there is no evidence Potus colluded with Russia. This story is FAKE NEWS and everyone knows it!
	3:35 AM - 20 Mar 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843776582825267201
	The Democrats made up and pushed the Russian story as an excuse for running a terrible campaign. Big advantage in Electoral College & lost!
	3:49 AM - 20 Mar 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843779892776964097
	The real story that Congress, the FBI and all others should be looking into is the leaking of Classified information. Must find leaker now!
	4:02 AM - 20 Mar 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843813078076719107
	What about all of the contact with the Clinton campaign and the Russians? Also, is it true that the DNC would not let the FBI in to look?
	6:14 AM - 20 Mar 2017


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-us-canada-39324587
	Trump Russia claims: FBI's Comey confirms investigation of election 'interference'
	20 March 2017

	FBI director James Comey has confirmed for the first time that the FBI is investigating alleged Russian interference in the 2016 election.

	However, Mr Comey said his agency had seen no evidence to back up President Trump's claim that his phones had been tapped by the Obama administration.

	He was giving evidence to the congressional intelligence committee.

	The Trump administration said nothing had changed and there was "no evidence of Trump-Russia collusion".


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/03/20/fbi-bombshell-comey-trump-russia-investigation/99411214/
	Analysis: FBI bombshell creates 'a big gray cloud' over Trump's White House

	Published 3:48 p.m. ET March 20, 2017

	WASHINGTON — Not since Watergate.

	FBI Director James Comey delivered more than one bombshell at a rare public hearing of the House Intelligence Committee Monday. He said there was no evidence to back up President Trump's accusation that President Obama wiretapped Trump Tower during the 2016 campaign, joining congressional leaders and intelligence officials in discounting Trump's unsubstantiated claims.

	What was more explosive, though, was Comey's matter-of-fact confirmation that the FBI is investigating whether Trump associates colluded with Russia in the effort by one of the United States' leading global adversaries to affect the outcome of the 2016 presidential campaign.

	...The allegations “are more serious than anything we’ve seen in recent decades,” says political historian Matthew Dallek, a professor at George Washington University and author of Defenseless Under the Night: The Roosevelt Years and the Origins of Homeland Security. “That is far from a lone instance of an illegal leak or a president fudging the truth under oath about sex with a White House intern.”  While we obviously don’t know what evidence the FBI has assembled and whether anybody will ever be charged with a crime, the scope of the investigation appears to encompass at least several of Trump’s chief advisers and perhaps Trump himself."

	...it would not only be a serious crime,” California Rep. Adam Schiff, the ranking Democrat on the panel, said in his opening statement. “It would also represent one of the most shocking betrayals of our democracy in history.”

	After more than five hours of testimony, Intelligence Chairman Devin Nunes, R-Calif., closed the hearing with an almost anguished plea to Comey to finish the investigation as soon as possible. “The longer this hangs out here, the bigger the cloud is,” he said. “There is a big gray cloud that you have now put over people who have very important work to do to lead this country.”

	The White House dismissed the whole idea as preposterous.

	“James Clapper and others stated that there is no evidence Potus colluded with Russia,” Trump declared in the first of a string of early-morning tweets Monday on his personal Twitter account, @realDonaldTrump. “This story is FAKE NEWS and everyone knows it!”

	...There were signs that Trump was watching — and no signs that he was ready to temper his rhetoric.

	While Comey was testifying, there was a tweet on the official @POTUS Twitter account. “FBI Director Comey refuses to deny he briefed President Obama on calls made by Michael Flynn to Russia,” it said — suggesting that the former president himself was behind the leak. Another tweet declared, “The NSA and FBI tell Congress that Russia did not influence electoral process.”

	That wasn’t quite what they said, Comey and Rogers told the panel when the tweet was read to them, in what amounted to an awkward fact-checking exchange in real time with their boss. They said they hadn’t drawn conclusions on the impact of Moscow’s efforts.

	Comey did predict that Russia’s efforts to disrupt American elections weren’t over.

	“They’ll be back in 2020,” he warned. “They may be back in 2018. And one of the conclusions they may draw ... is they were successful.”


http://video.foxnews.com/v/5366444971001/?#sp=show-clips
	Russia cloud to continue to follow Trump

	Mar. 20, 2017 - 12:55 - It wasn't a good day for President Trump as FBI Director Comey confirmed a probe on possible collusion between Trump camp ad Russia in election and no evidence of wiretapping by Obama. 


https://newrepublic.com/minutes/141545/true-cnn-report-russia-destroy-trumps-presidency
	If true, this CNN report about Russia could destroy Trump’s presidency.

	“There is more than circumstantial evidence now” that the Trump campaign colluded with Russians, Schiff told MSNBC. 

	...It suggests that evidence of collusion between the Trump campaign and Russian officials may exist, something that Trump lackeys have been denying for months. And collusion is serious enough that it could bring down this administration.

	...At the very least, it’s hard not to see this leak as being retaliation for Nunes’s weird and unethical freelancing earlier in the day. Russia is, as Nunes put it, “a big gray cloud” over the administration. This report only makes that cloud bigger and grayer. 


https://twitter.com/mitchellvii/status/844707663187456000
	Donald J. Trump Retweeted
	Bill Mitchell Verified account @mitchellvii Mar 22

	EXACTLY AS I SAID - House Intel Chair: We Cannot Rule Out Sr. Obama Officials Were Involved in Trump Surveillance

	http://www.thegatewaypundit.com/2017/03/boom-house-intel-chair-cannot-rule-sr-obama-officials-involved-trump-surveillance/


https://twitter.com/mitchellvii/status/844689725755703296
	Donald J. Trump Retweeted
	Bill Mitchell Verified account @mitchellvii Mar 22

	Trump always ends up being right.  It's almost a little freaky.


http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/325193-biden-on-trump-russia-relationship-what-in-the-hell-are-we
	Biden on Trump, Russia relationship: 'What in the hell are we doing?'

	03/22/17

	Former Vice President Joe Biden on Wednesday knocked the Trump administration for its relationship with Russia, criticizing Secretary of State Rex Tillerson's decision to visit Russia before a NATO meeting.

	"The notion that there's still this romance with Putin ... I'm told [Tillerson] has decided he's going to go visit Putin before he goes to the NATO conference? What in the hell are we doing?" Biden told reporters at the Capitol.

	On Monday, it was announced that Tillerson would not attend an April 5-6 meeting of NATO foreign ministers. He is instead staying in the U.S. for a visit by Chinese President Xi Jinping. Tillerson will then travel to Russia for a meeting with Russian President Vladimir Putin.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/23/politics/adam-schiff-trump-russia-grand-jury/index.html
	Schiff: New evidence shows possible Trump-Russia collusion

	Updated 9:41 PM ET, Thu March 23, 2017

	The top Democrat on the House Intelligence Committee is claiming that he has been presented with new information on collusion between associates of President Donald Trump and Russia, suggesting "it's the kind of evidence" that a grand jury investigation would want to consider.


http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/325574-dem-rep-says-trump-administration-surrounded-by-cloud-of
	Dem rep: 'We must pause the entire Trump agenda' until Russia investigation complete
	By Nikita Vladimirov - 03/23/17 

		Cloud of treason means we must have total shutdown of any @POTUS agenda item. No votes on any item. My stmt https://t.co/stvzhHfMZ6 #GetWoke
    		— Ted Lieu (@tedlieu) March 23, 2017


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/03/chuck-grassley-rod-rosenstein-justice-nomination-236483
	Grassley relents on Rosenstein nomination

	03/24/2017 

	Senate Judiciary Committee Chairman Chuck Grassley (R-Iowa) is finally letting the nomination of a top Justice Department official advance, after refusing to schedule a vote because he had not received sufficient information on the ongoing Russia probe.

	The committee announced Friday that it will take up the nomination of Rod Rosenstein for deputy attorney general at its business meeting on Monday. Grassley had complained the administration was stonewalling his requests for more information, and earlier this month said he would not schedule a vote for Rosenstein until he was briefed by the FBI.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/03/chuck-grassley-donald-trump-dossier-236538
	Grassley requests information from firm behind Trump dossier

	03/27/2017

	Senate Judiciary Chairman Chuck Grassley is requesting information about the relationship between the FBI and the opposition research firm behind an unsubstantiated dossier whose contents included salacious allegations against President Donald Trump and his campaign aides.

	Grassley has sent a letter to the firm, Fusion GPS, asking for the firm to disclose who funded the dossier, which was compiled by a former British intelligence agent, and whether the company was in touch with the FBI or Justice Department about it.

	“When political opposition research becomes the basis for law enforcement or intelligence efforts, it raises substantial questions about the independence of law enforcement and intelligence from politics,” Grassley wrote in the letter.

	...The Washington Post reported that the FBI reached an agreement with the former British intelligence agent, Christopher Steele, to continue his research — though the deal reportedly never came to fruition.


https://www.grassley.senate.gov/sites/default/files/judiciary/upload/2017-03-28%20CEG%20to%20FBI%20%28McCabe%20Conflict%20in%20Trump%20Associates%20Investigation%29.pdf
	March 28, 2017

	Dear Director Comey: 

	...Pursuant to its authority under the Constitution and the Rules of the Senate, the Committee requires information to determine: (1) the extent to which FBI Deputy Director Andrew McCabe has been involved in the FBI’s investigation of President Trump’s associates and Russia; (2) whether that involvement raises the appearance a conflict of interest in light of his wife’s ties with Clinton associates; and (3) whether Mr. McCabe has been or should be recused from the investigation. 
 
	As you know, Mr. McCabe is under investigation by the Department of Justice Office of the 
Inspector General. ...examining whether the political and financial connections between his wife’s Democratic political campaign and Clinton associates warranted his recusal ...just five days after the New York Times broke the story about Secretary Clinton’s use of private email ...met with Virginia Governor Terry McAuliffe, a longtime, close associate of the Clintons ...McAuliffe recruited Dr. McCabe, who had not previously run for any political office, to be the Democratic candidate for ...subsequently gave nearly $500,000 to her campaign while the FBI’s investigation of Secretary Clinton was ongoing. ...also donated over $200,000 ...failed to recuse himself from the Clinton email investigation, despite the appearance of a conflict created by his wife’s campaign accepting $700,000 from a close Clinton associate during the investigation.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/trump-administration-sought-to-block-sally-yates-from-testifying-to-congress-on-russia/2017/03/28/82b73e18-13b4-11e7-9e4f-09aa75d3ec57_story.html
 	Trump administration sought to block Sally Yates from testifying to Congress on Russia

	By Devlin Barrett and Adam Entous March 28

	The Trump administration sought to block former acting attorney general Sally Yates from testifying in the House investigation of possible links between Russian officials and Donald Trump’s campaign, according to letters provided to The Washington Post.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/03/adam-schiff-sally-yates-michael-flynn-testimony-236585
	Schiff: Yates would have testified on Flynn ‘cover-up’

	03/28/2017 

	Rep. Adam Schiff, the top Democrat on the House Intelligence Committee, says a hearing set for Tuesday with former acting Attorney General Sally Yates — which was canceled by Republicans — would have featured explosive testimony on Michael Flynn’s efforts to "cover up" his conversations with Russia’s ambassador.

	The intelligence panel was scheduled to hold a public hearing with members of the Obama administration, including Yates, but Republicans nixed the session last week after the Trump administration raised concerns about Yates' possible testimony.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/28/politics/donald-trump-russia-presidency/index.html
	There's a Russian storm over Trump's struggling presidency

	By Stephen Collinson, CNN

	Tue March 28, 2017

	Washington (CNN)The darkening storm over Russia is now looming over President Donald Trump's innermost circle.

	The intrigue now threatening to swamp Washington politics deepened on Monday when Trump's son-in-law and trusted adviser, Jared Kushner, offered to testify to senators about meetings with senior Kremlin officials -- including the head of a bank closely linked to President Vladimir Putin's government.

	And more revelations about a secret trip to the White House complex by House Intelligence Chairman Devin Nunes spurred claims by Democrats that he was in league with the President's aides to subvert his own panel's investigation into Moscow's alleged election meddling and ties to the Trump campaign.

	It was all too much for the President. Perhaps prompted by rising speculation about Russia, Trump launched a Twitter barrage Monday night, possibly to distract attention from stories damaging to his White House by attacking a familiar target.

	"Why isn't the House Intelligence Committee looking into the Bill & Hillary deal that allowed big Uranium to go to Russia, Russian speech....money to Bill, the Hillary Russian 'reset,' praise of Russia by Hillary, or Podesta Russian Company. Trump Russia story is a hoax. #MAGA!" Trump wrote in a pair of tweets.

	...But the storm isn't likely to break soon: There will be new Russia-related headlines on Thursday, when an intelligence committee hearing offers senators their first chance to go on the record addressing the widening controversy embroiling Trump and Russia.

	...Political troubles

	...One Gallup tracking poll Monday put his approval ratings as low as 36% -- far lower than most presidents go across the span of the entire terms.

	..."It is just astonishing how little support there is for anything the President wants to do," said a senior Democratic official. "No matter what the President tries to do next, the public is going to be opposed to it."


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/847061031293779969
	If the people of our great country could only see how viciously and inaccurately my administration is covered by certain media!
	5:21 AM - 29 Mar 2017 


http://thehill.com/policy/finance/326220-republicans-vote-to-block-resolutions-on-trumps-tax-returns
	Republicans vote to block resolutions on Trump's tax returns
	03/28/17 06:49 PM


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-mideast-crisis-russia-unitedstates-idUSKBN17029Z
	Wed Mar 29, 2017

	Russia's Lavrov: still possible to renew cooperation with U.S. in Syria

	Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov said it was still possible to renew cooperation with the United States on settling the Syrian crisis, in an interview published on The National Interest website on Wednesday.

	"President Donald Trump said that fighting terrorism is his number one international goal, and I believe this is absolutely natural. We will be sharing this approach, I am sure," Lavrov was quoted as saying.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/30/politics/tillerson-haley-syria-assad-turkey/index.html
	US signals openness to Assad staying put

	Updated 9:38 PM ET, Thu March 30, 2017 

 	The Trump administration doubled down Thursday on prioritizing the fight against ISIS over ending the Syrian civil war and getting rid of its main protagonist, President Bashar al-Assad -- a suggestion that was swiftly criticized by hawks on the Hill.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/29/politics/james-comey-fbi/index.html
	Comey: I know when I'm going to cause a 'storm'

	Updated 5:25 AM ET, Thu March 30, 2017

	FBI Director James Comey said Wednesday his agency makes its decisions on a nonpartisan basis and said he doesn't care about the political backlash of the choices he makes.

	"I know that when I make a hard decision, a storm is going to follow," Comey said at the Intelligence and National Security Alliance Leadership dinner. "Honestly, I don't care."


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/847455180912181249
	The failing @nytimes has disgraced the media world. Gotten me wrong for two solid years. Change libel laws?
	
		The New York Times’ ongoing dishonesty only helps Trump...

	7:27 AM - 30 Mar 2017


http://nypost.com/2017/03/27/the-new-york-times-ongoing-dishonesty-only-helps-trump/amp/
	The New York Times’ ongoing dishonesty only helps Trump

	...As I’ve written before, back on Jan. 20 the Times carried a front-page story with the headline: “Wiretapped Data Used in Inquiry of Trump Aides.”

	...if that reporting was correct, the Times knew that some people associated with Trump were being wiretapped or — possibly — had been mentioned in wiretaps of foreign governments.

	...James Comey, the head of the FBI, recently denied Trump’s allegations in testimony before Congress, as did the head of the National Security Agency. Both are now expected to meet with Congress behind closed doors to see if they’d like to change their testimony.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/mike-flynn-offers-to-testify-in-exchange-for-immunity-1490912959
	Mike Flynn Offers to Testify in Exchange for Immunity

	Updated March 30, 2017 9:00 p.m. ET

	Mike Flynn, President Donald Trump’s former national security adviser, has told the Federal Bureau of Investigation and congressional officials investigating the Trump campaign’s potential ties to Russia that he is willing to be interviewed in exchange for a grant of immunity from prosecution, according to officials with knowledge of the matter.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	March 30 Phone Call

	On the morning of March 30, the President called me at the FBI. He described the Russia investigation as “a cloud” that was impairing his ability to act on behalf of the country. He said he had nothing to do with Russia, had not been involved with hookers in Russia, and had always assumed he was being recorded when in Russia. He asked what we could do to “lift the cloud.” I responded that we were investigating the matter as quickly as we could, and that there would be great benefit, if we didn’t find anything, to our having done the work well. He agreed, but then re-emphasized the problems this was causing him.

	Then the President asked why there had been a congressional hearing about Russia the previous week – at which I had, as the Department of Justice directed, confirmed the investigation into possible coordination between Russia and the Trump campaign. I explained the demands from the leadership of both parties in Congress for more information, and that Senator Grassley had even held up the confirmation of the Deputy Attorney General until we briefed him in detail on the investigation. I explained that we had briefed the leadership of Congress on exactly which individuals we were investigating and that we had told those Congressional leaders that we were not personally investigating President Trump. I reminded him I had previously told him that. He repeatedly told me, “We need to get that fact out.” (I did not tell the President that the FBI and the Department of Justice had been reluctant to make public statements that we did not have an open case on President Trump for a number of reasons, most importantly because it would create a duty to correct, should that change.)

	The President went on to say that if there were some “satellite” associates of his who did something wrong, it would be good to find that out, but that he hadn’t done anything wrong and hoped I would find a way to get it out that we weren’t investigating him.

	In an abrupt shift, he turned the conversation to FBI Deputy Director Andrew McCabe, saying he hadn’t brought up “the McCabe thing” because I had said McCabe was honorable, although McAuliffe was close to the Clintons and had given him (I think he meant Deputy Director McCabe’s wife) campaign money. Although I didn’t understand why the President was bringing this up, I repeated that Mr. McCabe was an honorable person.

	He finished by stressing “the cloud” that was interfering with his ability to make deals for the country and said he hoped I could find a way to get out that he wasn’t being investigated. I told him I would see what we could do, and that we would do our investigative work well and as quickly as we could.

	Immediately after that conversation, I called Acting Deputy Attorney General Dana Boente (AG Sessions had by then recused himself on all Russia-related matters), to report the substance of the call from the President, and said I would await his guidance. I did not hear back from him before the President called me again two weeks later.


http://gizmodo.com/this-is-almost-certainly-james-comey-s-twitter-account-1793843641
	This Is Almost Certainly James Comey’s Twitter Account

	Ashley Feinberg
	3/30/17 3:29pm

	There is only one person currently following the account: Benjamin Wittes of Lawfare. 

	...follows 27 other accounts, the majority of which are either reporters, news outlets, or official government and law enforcement accounts. The New York Times’ Adam Goldman and David Sanger and the Washington Post’s Ellen Nakashima and David Ignatius, all of whom have been aggressively covering the FBI investigation into Trump’s contacts with Russian agents, made the list, as did Wittes and former Bush Administration colleague Jack Goldsmith. Donald Trump is on there, too, but @projectexile7 seems to have begun following him relatively recently (its first follow was @nytimes).

	...And of the 39 total tweets the account has liked thus far eight refer directly to the FBI or James Comey himself

	...One deals with an active FBI investigation:

		Jared Kushner and Michael Flynn met with Russian envoy in December, White House says https://t.co/1rLCyNjxkM
		— The New York Times (@nytimes) March 2, 2017

	And four refer to the Trump administration in general:

		...#NotesFromUnderTrump, Day 25: The excellent Paul Gewirtz with a measured critique of the 9th Circuit. Very useful: https://t.co/rKpmpzsbHc

		...The hearing was titled, "Making EPA great again." Scientists are afraid the opposite will happen. https://t.co/wWiuWw4AdE

		...The "Who Wants to be a Secretary of State?" Edition - President-Elect Trump is zeroing in on a nominee for... https://t.co/5UbT8ccrqY

		...Donald Trump is assembling the richest administration in modern American history https://t.co/tpT6UnV3Dy


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/847766558520856578
	Mike Flynn should ask for immunity in that this is a witch hunt (excuse for big election loss), by media & Dems, of historic proportion!
	4:04 AM - 31 Mar 2017 


http://www.foxnews.com/politics/2017/03/31/intelligence-official-who-unmasked-trump-associates-is-very-high-up-source-says.html
	Intelligence official who 'unmasked' Trump associates is 'very high up,' source says

	By Malia Zimmerman, Adam Housley Published March 31, 2017

	The U.S. intelligence official who “unmasked,” or exposed, the names of multiple private citizens affiliated with the Trump team is someone “very well known, very high up, very senior in the intelligence world,” a source told Fox News on Friday. 

	Intelligence and House sources with direct knowledge of the disclosure of classified names told Fox News that House Intelligence Committee Chairman Devin Nunes, R-Calif., now knows who is responsible -- and that person is not in the FBI.

	...“The main issue in this case, is not only the unmasking of these names of private citizens, but the spreading of these names for political purposes that have nothing to do with national security or an investigation into Russia’s interference in the U.S. election,” a congressional source close to the investigation told Fox News. 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/848216035153121285
	Wow, @FoxNews just reporting big news. Source: "Official behind unmasking is high up. Known Intel official is responsible. Some unmasked....
	9:50 AM - 1 Apr 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/848219027659010051
	..not associated with Russia. Trump team spied on before he was nominated." If this is true, does not get much bigger. Would be sad for U.S.
	10:02 AM - 1 Apr 2017


Comey reveals that Trump's associates are under a counterintelligence investigation for ties to Russia while Trump rants about it on twitter. That and subsequent revelations are said to put a "big gray cloud" over the Trump administration. Trump continues to insist Obama spied on him. Meanwhile, Trump's associates are stiffing NATO and blocking Sally Yate's testimony on Flynn. Biden wonders "what the hell are we doing." Schiff insists there is evidence of cover-ups and collusion and Grassley raises a stink about FBI connections with the "dirty dossier."

The Washington Post reports that Trump tried to block Sally Yates from testifying, adding another "big gray cloud" to the "storm" of Russian collusion over Trump's presidency. Trump complains the media is treating him unfairly. Republicans vote to block Congress from obtaining Trump's tax returns, and the next day Lavrov mentions that it's "still possible" for Trump "renew cooperation" in fighting terrorism in Syria, saying "We will be sharing this approach, I am sure." Trump doubles down on allowing Assad to stay put.

Meanwhile, Comey mentions that he "knows when he's going to cause a storm" but he "doesn't care." On the morning of March 30th, Flynn offers to testify for the Russia probe in exchange for immunity. That same morning, Trump calls Comey.

Trump says he has nothing to do with Russia, and "the cloud" of the Russia investigation is impairing his dealmaking abilities. He asks Comey what they could do to "lift the cloud." Trump and Comey agree that the FBI should do the investigation well, but Trump reemphasizes that "the cloud" is causing him problems.

Reading between the lines of Comey's statement, it looks like Trump asks Comey why he publicly confirmed the counterintelligence investigation into his associates, and Comey tells him that Congress wanted it. 
This call is said to be the third time Comey tells Trump he is not under investigation. Trump repeatedly tells Comey "we need get it out" that he is not under investigation, and says it would be good to clear the names of his associates if they haven't done anything wrong. 

In an apparent attempt to bargain, Trump points out to Comey that he hadn't mentioned "the McCabe thing" (that McCabe had the appearance of a conflict of interest regarding donations from Clinton associates) since Comey said McMabe is "honorable." Comey repeats that McCabe is "honorable" and Trump reiterates that the "cloud" is hurting his dealmaking and he wants the public to know he's not under investigation. Comey tells him "I'll see what we can do."

After the meeting, a journalist claims to have found Comey's twitter account, which is following several high-profile journalists who have been reporting on the Russia story in the Washington Post and New York Times. Trump tweets that Flynn should ask for immunity but maintains that the Russia investigation is a "witch hunt" and an "excuse" by the media and Democrats.

Trump continues to tweet that the Russia investigation is made up and that Obama intelligence officials are out to get him.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/04/05/politics/trump-associates-russians-meetings/index.html
	One week, three more Trump-Russia connections
	Updated 6:36 AM ET, Thu April 6, 2017 

	In December, Donald Trump's son-in-law and close adviser met privately with the head of a Russian bank under U.S. sanctions.

	In January, a major Trump donor with ties to his administration flew to a remote island and conferred with a confidant of Russian President Vladimir Putin.

	And four years ago, a Trump adviser interacted with a Russian spy trying to elicit intelligence.

	Three revelations in the past week have raised new questions from lawmakers about the Trump team's relations with Russian leaders and broadened Congress's inquiries into whether Trump associates colluded with Russia in its effort to sway the 2016 presidential election.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/04/world/middleeast/syria-gas-attack.html
	Worst Chemical Attack in Years in Syria; U.S. Blames Assad

	APRIL 4, 2017 

	BEIRUT, Lebanon — One of the worst chemical bombings in Syria turned a northern rebel-held area into a toxic kill zone on Tuesday, inciting international outrage over the ever-increasing government impunity shown in the country’s six-year war.

	Western leaders including President Trump blamed the Syrian government of President Bashar al-Assad and called on its patrons, Russia and Iran, to prevent a recurrence of what many described as a war crime.


http://novorossia.today/putin-95-of-world-terrorist-attacks-are-orchestrated-by-the-cia/
	Putin: ‘95% Of World Terrorist Attacks Are Orchestrated By The CIA’
	on: April 06, 2017


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/putin-spokesman-unconditional-support-for-assad-not-possible/
 	April 6, 2017, 4:33 PM
	Putin spokesman: Russian support for Assad has its limits

	President Vladimir Putin’s spokesman Dmitry Peskov said in an interview that “unconditional support is not possible in this current world.” 

	But he added that “it is not correct to say that Moscow can convince Mr. Assad to do whatever is wanted in Moscow. This is totally wrong.”


https://www.whitehouse.gov/the-press-office/2017/04/06/statement-president-trump-syria
	Statement by President Trump on Syria

	April 06, 2017

	THE PRESIDENT:  My fellow Americans:  On Tuesday, Syrian dictator Bashar al-Assad launched a horrible chemical weapons attack on innocent civilians.  Using a deadly nerve agent, Assad choked out the lives of helpless men, women, and children.  It was a slow and brutal death for so many.  Even beautiful babies were cruelly murdered in this very barbaric attack.  No child of God should ever suffer such horror.

	Tonight, I ordered a targeted military strike on the airfield in Syria from where the chemical attack was launched.  It is in this vital national security interest of the United States to prevent and deter the spread and use of deadly chemical weapons.  There can be no dispute that Syria used banned chemical weapons, violated its obligations under the Chemical Weapons Convention, and ignored the urging of the U.N. Security Council.  

	Years of previous attempts at changing Assad's behavior have all failed, and failed very dramatically.  As a result, the refugee crisis continues to deepen and the region continues to destabilize, threatening the United States and its allies.  

	Tonight, I call on all civilized nations to join us in seeking to end the slaughter and bloodshed in Syria, and also to end terrorism of all kinds and all types.  We ask for God's wisdom as we face the challenge of our very troubled world.  We pray for the lives of the wounded and for the souls of those who have passed.  And we hope that as long as America stands for justice, then peace and harmony will, in the end, prevail.  

	Goodnight.  And God bless America and the entire world.  Thank you.

	END


http://www.cnbc.com/2017/04/06/the-us-warned-the-russians-ahead-of-syria-missile-strikes-official.html
	The US warned the Russians ahead of Syria missile strikes

 	Friday, 7 Apr 2017 | 1:38 AM ET

	A U.S. official said the Russians had been warned before the U.S. launched at least 59 tomahawk missiles aimed at Syria.

	Pentagon spokesman Captain Jeff Davis said in an official statement: "Russian forces were notified in advance of the strike using the established deconfliction line. U.S. military planners took precautions to minimize risk to Russian or Syrian personnel located at the airfield."

	The strikes, which hit an airfield near Homs, struck aircraft and infrastructure including the runway, NBC reported. There is no word on casualties yet, but no people were targeted, the official told NBC.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-mideast-crisis-syria-idUSKBN1782S0
	Sat Apr 8, 2017 | 9:06am EDT
	Russia warns of serious consequences from U.S. strike in Syria

	Russia warned on Friday that U.S. cruise missile strikes on a Syrian air base could have "extremely serious" consequences, as President Donald Trump's first major foray into a foreign conflict opened up a rift between Moscow and Washington.


http://www.wsaw.com/content/news/Local-protesters-call-for-President-Trump-to-release-his-tax-returns--418733133.html
	Posted: Sat 11:09 PM, Apr 08, 2017
	Local protesters call for President Trump to release his tax returns

	WAUSAU, Wis.(WSAW)-- People all across the country are demanding President Trump to release his tax returns before April 15, which is the Saturday before taxes are due.

	Protesters in our area gathered along Grand Avenue near the Marathon County Court House Saturday afternoon. Those who attended said they're hoping local lawmakers will also call on President Trump to release his taxes after he refused to do so during the election.

	"I want them to be aware of whats going on around them. Too many people have become complacent. Like everyone else he should be held accountable. I know they came after Barack Obama for his birth certificate. What is so special about Donald Trump?" said Nancy Stencil the Chairperson for the Marathon County Democratic Office.

	Nationwide marches are scheduled for April 15. According to CNN, there are 135 marches scheduled for that day in 40 different states.


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/first-read/trump-s-white-house-offers-mixed-messages-syria-n744556
	Team Trump Offers Mixed Messages on Syria

	- U.S. Ambassador Nikki Haley on Meet the Press: "In no way do we see peace in that area with Assad as the head of the Syrian government. And we have to make sure that we're pushing that process. The political solution has to come together for the good of the people of Syria.”

	- Haley on CNN: “Regime change is something that we think is going to happen because all of the parties are going to see that Assad is not the leader that needs to be taking place for Syria.”

	- Tillerson on CBS: “[W]e believe that the first priority is the defeat of ISIS, that, by defeating ISIS and removing their caliphate from their control, we have now eliminated at least or minimized a particular threat, not just the United States, but to the whole stability in the region. And once the ISIS threat has been reduced or eliminated, I think we can turn our attention directly to stabilizing the situation in Syria."

	- National Security Adviser H.R. McMaster on FOX: “[W]hat Ambassador Haley pointed out is it's very difficult to understand how a political solution could result from the continuation of the Assad regime. Now, we are not saying that we are the ones who are going to affect that change. What we are saying is, other countries have to ask themselves some hard questions. Russia should ask themselves, what are we doing here?”

	...The waters are muddy here, and it’s complicating the way forward for an administration that hoped to take advantage of a show of decisiveness last week...


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2017/05/01/syrian-missile-attack-after-dinner-entertainment-commerce-secretary-wilbur-ross-says/101175242/
	Syrian missile attack was 'after-dinner entertainment,' Commerce Secretary Wilbur Ross says

	Commerce Secretary Wilbur Ross likened the U.S. attack on a Syrian airbase to "after-dinner entertainment" for those who were at Mar-a-Lago that week, according to a new report.

	The way Ross describes it, on April 6, in the middle of President Trump's summit with Chinese President Xi Jinping, "just as dessert was being served, the president explained to Mr. Xi he had something he wanted to tell him, which was the launching of 59 missiles into Syria. It was in lieu of after-dinner entertainment."


http://www.cnn.com/2017/04/12/politics/donald-trump-xi-jingping-syria-chocolate-cake/index.html
	Trump, Xi talked Syria strike over 'beautiful' chocolate cake

	President Donald Trump, in an interview with Fox Business, said he informed Chinese President Xi Jinping about the air strikes he authorized in Syria over the "most beautiful piece of chocolate cake that you've ever seen" at his ocean-side club and that the communist leader was "enjoying it."

	"I was sitting at the table. We had finished dinner. We're now having dessert. And we had the most beautiful piece of chocolate cake that you've ever seen and President Xi was enjoying it," Trump said, before telling interviewer Maria Bartiromo he was told the strike was ready to go.

	Trump added that he told Xi that the United States had "just fired 59 missiles ... heading to Iraq," incorrectly identifying the country he was striking when relaying the story to Bartiromo.

	Of Xi, Trump said, "And he was eating his cake. And he was silent."

	
http://www.cbsnews.com/news/what-happened-to-russias-agreement-to-eliminate-syrias-chemical-weapons/
	What happened to Russia's agreement to eradicate Syria’s chemical weapons?

	April 10, 2017, 6:00 AM


https://apnews.com/19772be1238e49fbb62c509a5b659b3d/official-us-military-takes-extra-precautions-syria
	Official: Russia knew Syrian chemical attack was coming

	...The allegation of Russian foreknowledge is grave, even by the standards of the currently dismal U.S.-Russian relations.


http://thehill.com/policy/international/middle-east-north-africa/328165-us-determines-russia-knew-of-chemical-weapons
	WH disputes report Russia knew of chemical attack in Syria beforehand
	By Mallory Shelbourne - 04/10/17 04:26 PM EDT 

	The Associated Press reported Monday that the United States determined that Russia knew about last week’s chemical attack on a town in Syria beforehand.

	But in a Monday evening statement, a senior administration official disputed that report. 


http://thehill.com/policy/international/russia/328164-kremlin-putin-wont-meet-tillerson-wednesday
	Kremlin: Putin won’t meet with Tillerson Wednesday
	By Mark Hensch - 04/10/17 04:12 PM EDT

	The Kremlin says Russian President Vladimir Putin does not plan on meeting with Secretary of State Rex Tillerson when he visits Moscow on Wednesday.

	...The decision to not receive Tillerson could raise tensions between the U.S. and Russia following the American airstike on Syria. The Trump administration launched a missile strike last week in response to a chemical attack officials attributed to Syrian President Bashar Assad’s forces.

	Russia has been a staunch backer of Assad during the country's civil war, and Peskov said Monday that it would not abandon that support.

	"Returning to pseudo-attempts to resolve the crisis by repeating mantras that Assad must step down cannot help sort things out,” Peskov said.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/10/world/middleeast/syria-trump-assad.html
	On Trump’s Syria Strategy, One Voice Is Missing: Trump’s
	APRIL 10, 2017

	WASHINGTON — In the days since President Trump ordered a cruise missile strike against Syria in retaliation for a chemical attack on civilians, his administration has spoken with multiple voices as it seeks to explain its evolving policy. But one voice has not been heard from: that of Mr. Trump himself.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	April 11 Phone Call

	On the morning of April 11, the President called me and asked what I had done about his request that I “get out” that he is not personally under investigation. I replied that I had passed his request to the Acting Deputy Attorney General, but I had not heard back. He replied that “the cloud” was getting in the way of his ability to do his job. He said that perhaps he would have his people reach out to the Acting Deputy Attorney General. I said that was the way his request should be handled. I said the White House Counsel should contact the leadership of DOJ to make the request, which was the traditional channel.

	He said he would do that and added, “Because I have been very loyal to you, very loyal; we had that thing you know.” I did not reply or ask him what he meant by “that thing.” I said only that the way to handle it was to have the White House Counsel call the Acting Deputy Attorney General. He said that was what he would do and the call ended.

	That was the last time I spoke with President Trump.


https://web.archive.org/web/20170412000123/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-obtained-fisa-warrant-to-monitor-former-trump-adviser-carter-page/2017/04/11/620192ea-1e0e-11e7-ad74-3a742a6e93a7_story.html
	FBI obtained FISA warrant to monitor former Trump adviser Carter Page
	By Ellen Nakashima, Devlin Barrett and Adam Entous
 	April 11 at 7:11 PM

	The FBI obtained a secret court order last summer to monitor the communications of an adviser to presidential candidate Donald Trump, part of an investigation into possible links between Russia and the campaign, law enforcement and other U.S. officials said.

	The FBI and the Justice Department obtained the warrant targeting Carter Page’s communications after convincing a Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Court judge that there was probable cause to believe Page was acting as an agent of a foreign power, in this case Russia, according to the officials. 

	...Applications for FISA warrants, Comey said, are often thicker than his wrists, and that thickness represents all the work Justice Department attorneys and FBI agents have to do to convince a judge that such surveillance is appropriate in an investigation. 


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/328590-trump-reinforces-turnaround-on-syria-and-russia
	Trump reinforces turnaround on Syria and Russia
	04/12/17

	Asked if he thought Russia knew of the sarin nerve gas attack that the U.S. and its allies have pinned on Syrian President Bashar Assad, whose government has been facing armed opposition in a yearslong civil war, Trump hedged.

	“I think it's certainly possible. I think it's probably unlikely,” he said. “I would like to think that they didn't know, but certainly they could have.”

	...Trump has been signaling a more aggressive and antagonistic approach to Syria and Russia, Assad’s primary backer, since the chemical attack — moving away from his campaign promises to forge better ties with Moscow and to avoid U.S. military interventions in the Middle East. 


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-russia-tillerson-putin-idUSKBN17E11W
	Wed Apr 12, 2017

	Putin says U.S.-Russia ties worse since Trump took office

	Levels of trust between Moscow and Washington have deteriorated since U.S. President Donald Trump took office, Russian President Vladimir Putin said in an interview broadcast on Wednesday.

	Asked about relations since Trump became president, Putin said, according to a transcript of the interview released by the Kremlin: "One could say that the level of trust on a working level, especially on the military level, has not improved, but rather has deteriorated."

	Asked about accusations that Syria's government launched a chemical weapons attack in Idlib province, Putin said that Damascus had given up its chemical weapons stocks.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/852510810287075329
	Things will work out fine between the U.S.A. and Russia. At the right time everyone will come to their senses & there will be lasting peace!
	6:16 AM - 13 Apr 2017 


The cloud of Russian collusion over Trump's presidency lingers. Assad attacks his own people in one of the worst chemical attacks in years. Russian involvement is suspected. Putin posits that 95% of the worlds terrorist attacks are orchestrated by the CIA.

Putin signals less than enthusiastic support for Assad. Trump orders a cruise missile strike on a Syrian airfield over dinner with Chinese President Xi. Trump seems to think this makes him very cool. The strike is largely symbolic, although Mattis will later claim it destroyed "40% of Syria's air force."

Russia warns of "serious consequences" for the missile strike. Protestors around the country demand Trump to release his tax returns, and larger protests are planned for next week. Trump's administration can't make up its mind on whether or not it supports Assad.

U.S. intelligence finds Russian foreknowledge of the chemical strike and evidence of a cover up. The Trump administration disputes this. Trump remains silent on his Syria policy. Putin refuses to meet Tillerson at his next visit to Moscow.

The next day, Trump calls up Comey again to ask him his request to "get it out" that he is not under investigation. Comey tells Trump he forwarded his request to Boente but hasn't heard back. Trump tells Comey that "the cloud" was getting in the way of his ability to do his job, and says he might have "his people" reach out to Boente. Comey says this is what Trump should do. Trump says he will, and adds "Because I have been very loyal to you, very loyal; we had that thing you know." Trump ends the call saying he will reach out to Boente. That was the last time Comey spoke to Trump.

The next day, the Washington post leaks that Trump advisor Carter Page is under investigation for acting as an agent of Russian intelligence. Trump posits that maybe it's possible that Russia had foreknowledge of the Syria attack. Putin charges that U.S. relations have gotten worse under Trump. Trump tweets that "things will work out fine between the U.S.A and Russia."


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/trump-says-he-never-spoke-to-treasury-secretary-about-releasing-tax-returns/
	April 30, 2017
	Trump says he "never spoke" to Treasury secretary about releasing tax returns

	WASHINGTON -- President Donald Trump said he never spoke to Treasury Secretary Steve Mnuchin about releasing his tax returns, after Mnuchin said last week that Mr. Trump has "no intention" of releasing them.

	"Well, I never spoke to him about it. Honestly, he's never asked me about it," Mr. Trump said from the White House in an interview that aired Sunday on CBS News' "Face the Nation."

	"I said, number one, I'm under audit," the president continued. "Right now, I'm under audit. After the audit is complete. It's a routine audit, but I have a very big tax return. You've seen the pictures. My tax return is probably higher than that from the floor. When you look at other people's tax return, even other wealthy people, their tax return is this big. My tax return is this high."


http://thehill.com/homenews/news/331495-christie-vetoes-nj-bill-seeking-trump-tax-returns
	Christie vetoes NJ bill seeking Trump tax returns

	By Mark Hensch - 05/01/17

	New Jersey Gov. Chris Christie (R) has vetoed a bill requiring President Trump to publish his tax returns before seeking reelection in the state.

	“The hypocrisy and false outrage underlying this bill is stunning – even by Trenton standards,” he said in a statement accompanying Monday’s veto, according to Reuters.

	Christie, who backed Trump in 2016 after suspending his own presidential campaign, called the legislation “politics at its worst.”


http://thehill.com/blogs/floor-action/senate/331486-gop-senator-questions-comey-over-inconsistencies-on-trump-dossier
	GOP senator questions Comey over 'inconsistencies' on Trump dossier
	By Jordain Carney - 05/01/17 

	Sen. Chuck Grassley (R-Iowa) is pushing FBI Director James Comey to clarify "inconsistencies" in information about a controversial opposition research dossier on President Trump. 

	Grassley, who chairs the Judiciary Committee, sent a letter to Comey saying there are discrepancies between information he gave during a March briefing and Justice Department documents made available after the closed-door meeting. 
 
	"There appear to be material inconsistencies between the description of the FBI’s relationship with Mr. Steele that you did provide in your briefing and information contained in Justice Department documents made available to the Committee only after the briefing," Grassley wrote in the letter dated April 28. 
 
	The GOP senator warned that "whether those inconsistencies were honest mistakes or an attempt to downplay the actual extent of the FBI's relationship" with Christopher Steele, the former MI6 agent who wrote the dossier, the bureau needs to respond to Grassley's previous request for information.


http://thehill.com/policy/international/russia/331492-trump-putin-to-speak-on-tuesday-phone-call
	Trump, Putin to speak on Tuesday phone call

	By Mark Hensch 05/01/17 09:26 PM EDT

	Trump’s discussion with Putin is scheduled for 12:30 p.m. that afternoon in the Oval Office, it said Monday.

	...Russia is under intense congressional and media scrutiny following FBI Director James Comey’s announcement in March about his bureau’s activities.

	Comey said that the FBI is probing Moscow’s interference in the 2016 presidential race, including collusion between Russian officials and members of Trump’s campaign.

	The House Intelligence Committee has invited Comey and National Security Agency Director Mike Rogers to appear before the panel Tuesday as part of its probe into Russia’s meddling.

	The Senate Intelligence Committee, which has its own investigation of Moscow’s intrusions, reportedly brought on two additional staffers last week.

	Trump repeatedly praised Putin during his election campaign, adding his administration would improve relations with Russia.


https://www.theatlantic.com/international/archive/2017/05/putin-trump-meeting/525174/
	Putin's Disappointing Phone Call With Trump

	Reports of a planned meeting were less than met the eye.

	Julia Ioffe May 2, 2017 

	On Tuesday afternoon, after President Donald Trump and Russian President Vladimir Putin had their third phone call in about as many months, news emerged that the two leaders would finally meet this summer. For those tracking the Trump-Putin dance, it might seem just another date in a long love affair.

	The reality, however, looks far bleaker for Putin.

	Consider this: After three phone calls and an infinite amount of hope for a Trump-Putin detente dashed against the rocks of American politics, all that Trump and Putin could agree on, according to the readouts provided from each side, was that the war in Syria is bad and that maybe a personal meeting this summer would be good. But even that part about the meeting, it turned out, was just in the Kremlin’s account of the presidential phone call. The White House made no mention of any agreement to meet...

	...Julia Ioffe


http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2016/10/seven-reasons-the-new-russian-hack-announcement-is-a-big-deal-214330
	 Seven Reasons the New Russian Hack Announcement Is a Big Deal
	It might turn out to be bigger than the Trump tape. A Moscow-watcher explains what's really going on.
	By Julia Ioffe 

	...This marks a new sophistication in Russia’s understanding of American politics. The Russians didn’t always know what the DNC was—or at least why it was worth hacking. The fact that it now does represents a massive leap forward for Russian intelligence.

	Just a few years ago, the Russians wouldn’t have known about the intricacies of American domestic politics.


http://www.startribune.com/trump-schedules-another-phone-call-with-russia-s-putin/420974963/
	Trump, Putin signal new effort to cooperate on Syria
	May 2, 2017 — 4:35pm

	WASHINGTON — President Donald Trump and Russian President Vladimir Putin signaled improving prospects for cooperation in Syria Tuesday in what the White House called a "very good" phone discussion that included a focus on setting up safe zones in the war-torn nation.

	The Kremlin said the leaders also agreed to try to set up their first in-person meeting in July, on the sidelines of an international summit in Germany. The White House later confirmed that information.

	Tuesday's call marked the first time Trump and Putin have spoken since the U.S. launched missiles against an air base in Syria, an attack that outraged Russia, one of the Syrian government's strongest backers. The U.S. military action sparked new tensions between Washington and Moscow, with top U.S. officials sharply condemning Putin's continued support for embattled Syrian leader Bashar Assad.

	But the leaders appeared to again be edging toward closer cooperation following Tuesday's call. 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/inside-the-oval-office-with-trump-and-the-russians-broad-smiles-and-loose-lips/2017/05/16/2e8b0d14-3a66-11e7-8854-21f359183e8c_story.html
	On May 2, eight days before Lavrov showed up at the White House, Russian President Vladimir Putin was on the phone with Trump and made a request. ­Putin had “new ideas” about stopping the civil war carnage in Syria, according to a senior U.S. official, and noted that his top diplomat, Lavrov, would soon be visiting the United States for a previously scheduled meeting with Secretary of State Rex Tillerson.

	“Will you see him?” Putin asked Trump, according to the official, who spoke on the condition of anonymity to describe the private talks.

	“Yes,” Trump replied.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/02/trump-clinton-comey-best-thing-that-ever-happened-237911
	Trump jabs back at Clinton: Comey was 'best thing that ever happened' to her

	05/02/2017 

	President Trump woke up Tuesday fuming at Democrats and calling for a shutdown of the federal government later this year. He went to bed Tuesday fuming at Hillary Clinton and accusing James Comey, his FBI director, of taking it easy on her -- in another extraordinary 140-character post for the commander-in-chief.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/859601184285491201
	FBI Director Comey was the best thing that ever happened to Hillary Clinton in that he gave her a free pass for many bad deeds! The phony...
	7:51 PM - 2 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/859604996236742656
	...Trump/Russia story was an excuse used by the Democrats as justification for losing the election. Perhaps Trump just ran a great campaign?
	8:06 PM - 2 May 2017


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/03/james-comey-senate-hearing-criticism-democrats-republicans-237926
	Comey forcefully defends ‘painful’ decision on Clinton probe
	The FBI director says idea that agency could have swayed election makes him 'mildly nauseous.'
	05/03/2017 10:52 AM

	Comey's testimony was the most expansive and detailed insight the FBI chief has offered into his thinking during the days before the election, but it seemed to do little to quiet Democratic senators' concerns that he applied a double standard that resulted in Clinton being kneecapped in advance of the vote even though the FBI was also — without public notice —conducting a politically explosive investigation into the Trump campaign's possible collusion with Russia.

 	...Comey said his instincts as an ex-prosecutor were not to do anything that might affect an election, but he concluded that worrying about electing Trump would be wrong to even consider. "Not for a second," he said he replied to the junior FBI attorney asking whether that should be factored in. "Down that path lies the death of the FBI."

	As it turned out, the newly discovered emails were not momentous.

	...The FBI chief also disclosed that his investigators turned out to be wrong about something else: how long it would take to pore through the messages. He said they initially told him there was no chance they could finish before the election, but a computer program the FBI compiled ultimately culled out duplicate messages and had the task completed in just a week.

	"We'd seen them all before," Comey said of the messages.

	The timing issue is pivotal because had Comey known that the work could be done in advance of the election, he might have waited to notify Congress once the content of the messages was clear. Instead, he sounded what many Democrats regard as a false alarm that deflated Clinton's campaign.

 	...At the outset of the hearing, Chairman Chuck Grassley (R-Iowa) suggested that there's little substance to the story that has dominated Washington in recent months — allegations of coordination between the Trump campaign and the Russian government. 

	...Under questioning from Sen. Lindsey Graham (R-S.C.), Comey confirmed he discussed the issue with Yates, who is set to testify about the issue next week before a Senate subcommittee chaired by Graham.

	Yates is expected to tell senators she delivered a strong and unusual warning to the White House in January that Flynn had lied about his contacts with Russia and was vulnerable to being compromised. Flynn was ousted by Trump less than a month later after it became public that he had misled his colleagues about his phone conversations with Russian ambassador Sergey Kislyak.


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/331793-spicer-trump-has-confidence-in-comey
	Spicer: Trump has confidence in Comey
	05/03/17 02:46 PM EDT

	President Trump has confidence in FBI Director James Comey, despite his claim that Comey gave Democratic nominee Hillary Clinton a “free pass” during the 2016 presidential campaign, his top spokesman said Wednesday. 

	"The president has confidence in the director,” White House press secretary Sean Spicer told reporters. 

	Spicer said the president’s Tuesday night tweets were directed at Clinton’s comments made earlier that day


http://dailycaller.com/2017/05/06/roger-stone-still-talks-with-president-trump/
	Roger Stone Still Talks With President Trump
	KERRY PICKET
	2:13 PM 05/06/2017 

	WASHINGTON–Republican political operative Roger Stone says he still communicates with President Donald Trump and the last conversation he had was relatively recent.

	Stone noted he has not spoken to the president about Congress’s investigation into Russia’s influence peddling in the 2016 election and that lawmakers wish to talk to Stone.

	“I think the president and I understand that any conversation we had in October was monitored and I imagine my conversations these days are monitored, so we keep it pretty general. And by and large it is my policy not to discuss what I have had to discuss with the President,” Stone said on The David Webb Show on SiriusXM Patriot Ch. 125 Friday night.

	“You guys both know I’m a writer and I’m a memo writer. I’m a prolific writer. I’m happy to tell you my opinion any time you want to know, so I do write to the president from time to time just political thoughts and so on.”

	When asked when he last spoke with Trump, Stone replied, “In a little while now I would say I don’t want to characterize it, but less than a week ago.”

	He added, “He’s easier to find on the weekends. He’s got more time on his hands.”


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861550676505219073
	General Flynn was given the highest security clearance by the Obama Administration - but the Fake News seldom likes talking about that.
	4:57 AM - 8 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861592420043157504
	Ask Sally Yates, under oath, if she knows how classified information got into the newspapers soon after she explained it to W.H. Counsel.
	7:43 AM - 8 May 2017 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	WHITEHOUSE: You could perhaps have waited until you actually had seen the agents 302 from the interview of General Flynn. Why go ahead of that? Why not wait?

	YATES: Well, because this was a matter of some urgency, we...

	WHITEHOUSE: Describe.

	YATES: In making the determination about notification here, we had to balance a variety of interest. For the reasons that I just described a few minutes ago, we felt like it was critical that we get this information to the White House, because in part because the vice president was unknowingly making false statements to the public and because we believed that General Flynn was compromised with respect to the Russians.

	...YATES: ...And, in fact, Mr. McGahn responded back to me to let me know that anything that General Flynn would've said would have been based -- excuse me -- anything that Vice President Pence would have said would have been based on what General Flynn had told him.

	YATES: ...one of the questions that Mr. McGahn asked me when I went back over the second day was essentially, why does it matter to DOJ if one White House official lies to another White House official?

	And so we explained to him, it was a whole lot more than that and went back over the same concerns that we had raised with them the prior day, that the concern first about the underlying conduct itself, that he had lied to the vice president and others, the American public had been misled.

	YATES ...and in fact, I remember specifically saying, you know it wouldn't really be fair of us to tell you this and then expect you to sit on your hands.

	...KLOBUCHAR: ...And one of the White House officials has described the notification that you provided warning them of this as a heads up. How would you describe a heads-up?

	YATES: Well at the risk of trying to characterize. I mean we were there to tell the White House about something we were very concerned about and emphasized to them repeatedly. It was so they could take action.

	...DURBIN: On February 14th, after General Flynn resigned, Sean Spicer said, and I quote, "There was nothing in what General Flynn did in terms of conducting himself that was an issue." Do you have any idea what he meant by those words?

	YATES: No. I'm not -- all I can say is he didn't reach that conclusion from his conversation with us. I can't speak to how he arrived at that.

	...KLOBUCHAR: And during that meeting did they mention -- anyone mention that this refugee order was about to come out?

	YATES: No.

	KLOBUCHAR: Did the acting Attorney General of the United States?

	YATES: No and that was one thing that was of concern to us, is that not only was department leadership not consulted here and beyond department leadership, really the subject matter experts, the national security experts, not only was the department not consulted, we weren't even told about it. I learned about this from media reports.

	KLOBUCHAR: So you learned about it after the meeting at the White house Council from the media.

	YATES: Right.

	KLOBUCHAR: And then it's true that during your hearing, then Senator Sessions, now the Attorney General actually asked you if the views the President wants to execute are unlawful, should the Attorney General or Deputy Attorney General say no? And what did you say?

	YATES: And I said yes, the Attorney General should.

	...YATES: Well, certainly, in the course of the meetings, both on the 26th and 27th, Mr. McGahn certainly demonstrated that he understood that this was serious. So he did seem to be taking it seriously.

	I -- you know, I don't have any way of knowing what, if anything, they did. If nothing was done, then certainly, that would be concerning.

	...Had I remained at the Department of Justice, and if I were under the impression that nothing had been done, then, yes, I would have raised it again with the White House.

	...WHITEHOUSE: And that was the end of this episode, nobody came over to look at the material?

	YATES: I don't know what happened after that because that was my last day with DOJ.

	...YATES: I think they're coming back, and we have to do a whole lot more, both to harden our election systems, our state election systems, to ensure that folks out there know when they're looking at news feeds, that it may not be real news that they're reading.

	I think that we have to do more to deter the Russians, and it wouldn't hurt to prosecute a few folks...


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861713233786404864
	Sally Yates made the fake media extremely unhappy today --- she said nothing but old news!
	3:43 PM - 8 May 2017 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	GRAHAM: Without objection. General Clapper, on March 5, 2017, you said the following to a question. Here's the question.

	Does intelligence exist that can definitely answer the following question, whether there were improper contacts between the Trump campaign and Russian officials? You said we did not include any evidence in our report.

	And I say our, that's the NSA, the FBI, the CIA, with my office, the Director of National Intelligence, that had anything — that had any reflection of collusion between members of the Trump campaign and the Russians. There was no evidence of that included in our report.

	Chuck Todd (ph) then asked, I understand that, but does it exist? You say no, not to my knowledge. Is that still accurate?

	CLAPPER: It is.

	GRAHAM: Ms. Yates, do you have any evidence — are you aware of any evidence that would suggest that in the 2016 campaign anybody in the Trump campaign colluded — colluded with the Russian government intelligence services in improper fashion?

	YATES: And Senator, my answer to that question would require me to reveal classified information. And so, I — I can't answer that.

	GRAHAM: Well, I don't get that because he just said he issued the report. And he said he doesn't know of any. So, what would you know that's not in the report? ...

	YATES: Well, I think that Director Clapper also said that he was unaware of the FBI counter intelligence investigations.

	GRAHAM: Would it be fair to say that the counter-intelligence investigation was not mature enough to come to his — to get in the report. Is that fair, Mr. — Mr. Clapper?

	CLAPPER: I — that's an — that's a possibility.

	...FEINSTEIN: The Guardian has reported that Britain's intelligence service first became aware in late 2015 of suspicious interactions between Trump advisers and Russian intelligence agents. This information was passed on to U.S. intelligence agencies.

	Over the spring of 2016, multiple European allies passed on additional information to the United States about contacts between the Trump campaign and Russians. Is this accurate?

	YATES: I -- I can't answer that.

	FEINSTEIN: General Clapper, is that accurate?

	CLAPPER: Yes, it is and it's also quite sensitive.

	FEINSTEIN: OK. Let me ask you this.

	CLAPPER: The specifics are -- are --- are quite sensitive.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861712617299210240
	Director Clapper reiterated what everybody, including the fake media already knows- there is "no evidence" of collusion w/ Russia and Trump.
	3:41 PM - 8 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/861713823505494016
	The Russia-Trump collusion story is a total hoax, when will this taxpayer funded charade end?
	3:46 PM - 8 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861715019674910721
	Biggest story today between Clapper & Yates is on surveillance. Why doesn't the media report on this? #FakeNews!
	3:50 PM - 8 May 2017 


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/18/rod-rosenstein-james-coming-senators-briefing-238562
	Senators: Rosenstein knew Comey would be fired before writing memo

	Rod Rosenstein already knew James Comey was going to be fired as FBI director when he wrote the three-page memo that the White House would later assert had sealed Comey’s fate, multiple senators said Thursday as they left a highly-anticipated briefing with the deputy attorney general.

	Rosenstein learned Comey was being ousted on May 8, according to Senate Minority Whip Dick Durbin (D-Ill.), but the memo is dated May 9 — the day the firing took place.


https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2017/05/rosenstein-letter-annotated/526116/
	May 9, 2017

	MEMORANDUM FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

	FROM: ROD J. ROSENSTEIN

	DEPUTY ATTORNEY GENERAL

	SUBJECT: RESTORING PUBLIC CONFIDENCE IN THE FBI

	...As you and I have discussed, however, I cannot defend the Director's handling of the conclusion of the investigation of Secretary Clinton's emails, and I do not understand his refusal to accept the nearly universal judgment that he was mistaken. Almost everyone agrees that the Director made serious mistakes; it is one of the few issues that unites people of diverse perspectives.

	The director was wrong to usurp the Attorney General's authority on July 5, 2016, and announce his conclusion that the case should be closed without prosecution.

	...There is a well-established process for other officials to step in when a conflict requires the recusal of the Attorney General. On July 5, however, the Director announced his own conclusions about the nation's most sensitive criminal investigation, without the authorization of duly appointed Justice Department leaders.

	Compounding the error, the Director ignored another longstanding principle: we do not hold press conferences to release derogatory information about the subject of a declined criminal investigation. Derogatory information sometimes is disclosed in the course of criminal investigations and prosecutions, but we never release it gratuitously. The Director laid out his version of the facts for the news media as if it were a closing argument, but without a trial. It is a textbook example of what federal prosecutors and agents are taught not to do.

	...Concerning his letter to the Congress on October 28, 2016, the Director cast his decision as a choice between whether he would "speak" about the decision to investigate the newly-discovered email messages or "conceal" it. "Conceal" is a loaded term that misstates the issue. When federal agents and prosecutors quietly open a criminal investigation, we are not concealing anything; we are simply following the longstanding policy that we refrain from publicizing non-public information. In that context, silence is not concealment.

	...Although the President has the power to remove an FBI director, the decision should not be taken lightly. I agree with the nearly unanimous opinions of former Department officials. The way the Director handled the conclusion of the email investigation was wrong. As a result, the FBI is unlikely to regain public and congressional trust until it has a Director who understands the gravity of the mistakes and pledges never to repeat them. Having refused to admit his errors, the Director cannot be expected to implement the necessary corrective actions.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/09/us/politics/james-comey-fired-fbi.html
	F.B.I. Director James Comey is Fired by Trump
	May 9, 2017


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2017/05/09/full-text-trump-letter-comey-firing/101491982/
	Dear Director Comey:

	I have received the attached letters from the Attorney General and Deputy Attorney General of the United States recommending your dismissal as the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. I have accepted their recommendation and you are hereby terminated and removed from office, effective immediately.

	While I greatly appreciate you informing me, on three separate occasions, that I am not under investigation, I nevertheless concur with the judgement of the Department of Justice that you are not able to effectively lead the Bureau.

	It is essential that we find new leadership for the FBI that restores public trust and confidence in its vital law enforcement mission.

	I wish you the best of luck in your future endeavors.

	Donald J. Trump


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/18/rod-rosenstein-james-coming-senators-briefing-238562
	Senators: Rosenstein knew Comey would be fired before writing memo

	Rod Rosenstein already knew James Comey was going to be fired as FBI director when he wrote the three-page memo that the White House would later assert had sealed Comey’s fate, multiple senators said Thursday as they left a highly-anticipated briefing with the deputy attorney general.

	Rosenstein learned Comey was being ousted on May 8, according to Senate Minority Whip Dick Durbin (D-Ill.), but the memo is dated May 9 — the day the firing took place.

	...“Director Comey was very unpopular with most people. I actually thought when I made that decision — and I also got a very strong recommendation, as you know, from the deputy attorney general, Rod Rosenstein,” Trump said. “He had the very poor performance [before Congress]. … I believe that’s why the deputy attorney general went out and wrote his very, very strong letter.”


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	HOLT: Monday you met with the Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein.

	TRUMP: Right.

	HOLT: Did you ask for a recommendation?

	TRUMP: What I did is I was going to fire Comey. My decision. It was not...

	HOLT: You had made the decision before they came into your office (ph).

	TRUMP: I -- I was going to fire Comey. I -- there's no good time to do it, by the way.

	They...

	HOLT: Because in your letter, you said...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: They -- they were...

	HOLT: ...I -- I accepted -- accepted their recommendations.

	TRUMP: Yeah, well, they also...


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862135824745467905
	Cryin' Chuck Schumer stated recently, "I do not have confidence in him (James Comey) any longer." Then acts so indignant.  #draintheswamp
	7:42 PM - 9 May 2017


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/332676-trump-dings-cryin-chuck-schumer-for-bashing-comey-firing
	Trump dings ‘Cryin’ Chuck Schumer’ for bashing Comey firing

	At a press conference earlier Tuesday evening, Schumer said he told Trump that his decision to fire Comey was a "big mistake."

	"Earlier this afternoon President Trump called me and informed me he was firing Director Comey," Schumer told reporters. "I told the president, 'Mr. President, with all due respect, you are making a big mistake.’ ”

	He added that Trump didn't "really respond" to his comment.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/10/as-trump-fired-comey-his-staff-scrambled-to-explain-why/
 	After Trump fired Comey, White House staff scrambled to explain why
	May 10

	...After Spicer spent several minutes hidden in the darkness and among the bushes near these sets, Janet Montesi, an executive assistant in the press office, emerged and told reporters that Spicer would answer some questions, as long as he was not filmed doing so...


https://www.whitehouse.gov/the-press-office/2017/05/10/readout-president-donald-j-trumps-meeting-foreign-minister-sergey-lavrov
	May 10, 2017
	Readout of President Donald J. Trump’s Meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov of Russia

	President Donald J. Trump met today with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov of Russia, following on the visit of Secretary of State Rex Tillerson to Moscow last month. President Trump emphasized the need to work together to end the conflict in Syria, in particular, underscoring the need for Russia to rein in the Assad regime, Iran, and Iranian proxies. The President raised Ukraine, and expressed his Administration’s commitment to remain engaged in resolving the conflict and stressed Russia’s responsibility to fully implement the Minsk agreements.  He also raised the possibility of broader cooperation on resolving conflicts in the Middle East and elsewhere. The President further emphasized his desire to build a better relationship between the United States and Russia.


http://ktla.com/2017/05/10/trump-describes-meeting-with-russias-foreign-minister-ambassador-as-very-very-good/
	Trump Describes Meeting With Russia’s Foreign Minister, Ambassador as ‘Very, Very Good’

	Posted 10:52 AM, May 10, 2017

	President Donald Trump hosted Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and Russian Ambassador to the US Sergey Kislyak at the White House Wednesday amid the swirling investigation of Russian contacts with Trump campaign and transition officials in 2016 and Tuesday’s firing of FBI Director James Comey, who was handling the probe.

	...The Russian Embassy tweeted a photo of Trump shaking the hand of Russia’s ambassador in what appears to be the Oval Office. Current and former US intelligence officials have accused Kislyak of being a top spy and recruiter of spies, a notion that Russian officials have dismissed.

	A White House statement after the meeting omitted any mention of Kislyak’s presence, instead focusing on Trump’s conversation with Lavrov, which the President described as “very, very good.”

	...According to the statement, Trump emphasized the need for the US and Russia to work together to end violence in Syria and Ukraine, floated the prospect of US-Russia cooperation on resolving Middle East conflicts and returned to a campaign theme by emphasizing his desire for better relations with Moscow.

	Lavrov denies election meddling

	Lavrov, who started off a news conference at the Russian Embassy by remarking that “relations between our countries … are not in the best condition,” also fielded several questions about Russia’s alleged meddling in the 2016 race to obvious irritation. “There is not a single fact (or) compelling evidence regarding Russia’s intervention,” he said.

	At another point, he mocked the idea, saying it must be “humiliating for the American people to realize the Russian Federation is controlling the situation in the United States.”

	...Alleged ties to Russia

	Former Acting Attorney General Sally Yates said Monday that she alerted the White House earlier this year that then-Trump national security adviser Michael Flynn could be “essentially blackmailed by the Russians.”

	Her testimony pushed the story of the Trump campaign’s alleged ties to Russia back into the headlines.

	In an interview last week, Trump once again refused to blame Russia for attempting to influence the 2016 election through hacking and other means, despite an overwhelming consensus by US law enforcement and intelligence agencies.

	Trump and Putin also spoke by phone last week about the war in Syria for the first time since Trump ordered a missile strike against a Syrian government air base last month after an alleged chemical weapons attack by the Syrian regime.

	The US missile strike angered Moscow and led Lavrov to declare that “it’s sad how damaging this is to the already bad relations between US and Russia.”

	...In 2009, under then-President Barack Obama, Secretary of State Hillary Clinton famously presented Lavrov with a “reset” button to symbolically restart US-Russia relations. Unfortunately, instead of “reset” the Russian word on the button read “overcharged.”

	Diplomatically, Lavrov said he would keep the button on his desk. The attempt at a reset didn’t work


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/2017/05/11/russians-fail-disclose-its-official-photographer-works-tass-news-agency/101543498/
	Kremlin outfoxes White House over photos of Trump meeting with Russians

	...The widespread distribution of the Russian photos was a public relations coup for the Russians, who have been trying for several years to secure an Oval Office meeting for its foreign minister as a counterpoint to the strained relations between the two countries. Normally, such White House meetings are reserved for heads of state.

	Because of strained relations, it was Lavrov's first visit to the White House since 2013, despite lobbying efforts by the Russians, according to Politico, which reported that Trump agreed to receive him in the Oval Office at the request of Russian President Vladimir Putin.

	The issue is particularly sensitive because of the presence at the meeting of Kislyak, who has been at the center of several controversies involving administration officials, including now fired National Security Adviser Michael Flynn and Attorney General Jeff Sessions. The Russian embassy even tweeted a photograph of Trump smiling broadly as he put his arm around the diplomat while shaking his hand in the Oval Office.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/watch-kissinger-side-trump-delivers-first-person-response-comey-firing/
	May 10, 2017

	The same day President Donald Trump was meeting with Russia’s foreign minister at the White House — and less than a day after firing former FBI director James Comey — the press pool captured Trump posing in the Oval Office with Henry Kissinger.

	According to the pool report, journalists had expected to find Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov at the president’s side, but instead was invited to an unannounced meeting with Kissinger, who served as secretary of state under Richard Nixon.

	Trump said he had met with Kissinger to talk “about Russia and various other matters.”

	...Trump added that Kissinger has “been a friend of mine for a long time.” Shortly after winning the 2016 presidential election, Trump met Kissinger in New York to discuss “events and issues around the world.”

	The press had not been permitted to witness the meeting with Lavrov, which was documented in handout photos provided by the Russian government.

	A CBS reporter caught Russian President Vladimir Putin at a hockey game in Sochi to ask for his reaction and whether Tuesday’s firing would affect the relationship between the two countries.

	“There will be no effect,” Putin said, with a translator at his side. “Your question looks very funny for me. Don’t be angry with me. We have nothing to do with that.”

	“President Trump is acting in accordance with his competence, in accordance with his law and Constitution,” he added. 


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/334272-trump-told-russians-firing-nut-job-comey-eased-pressure-on-him-report
	Trump told Russians firing 'nut job' Comey eased pressure

	President Trump called former FBI chief James Comey a "nut job" during an Oval Office meeting with two Russian officials, telling them his firing relieved “great pressure,” The New York Times reported Friday.

	"I just fired the head of the F.B.I. He was crazy, a real nut job," Trump said, according to a report based on a summary of the meeting obtained by the Times. 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/11/opinion/trump-russia-fbi-investigation.html
	The Trump-Russia Nexus
	By THE EDITORIAL BOARD
	MAY 11, 2017

	The acting director of the F.B.I., Andrew McCabe, told Congress on Thursday that President Trump’s firing of James Comey has not derailed the agency’s investigation into possible collusion between Russia and the Trump campaign. Which is good news. Despite Mr. Trump’s assertion that the idea of collusion is “a total hoax,” and despite many unknowns, the links continue to pile up.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/863007411132649473
	James Comey better hope that there are no "tapes" of our conversations before he starts leaking to the press!
	5:26 AM - 12 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/863014620516233216
	When James Clapper himself, and virtually everyone else with knowledge of the witch hunt, says there is no collusion, when does it end?
	5:54 AM - 12 May 2017 


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/333105-trump-lawyer-claims-his-tax-returns-show-no-income-from-russia-with
	Trump lawyers: Tax returns show no income from Russia with few exceptions
	05/12/17 10:54 AM EDT

	President Trump's lawyers on Friday said that Trump's last 10 years of tax returns do not reveal "any income of any type from Russian sources" with some exceptions but refused to release copies of his tax returns to verify.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/trump-revealed-highly-classified-information-to-russian-foreign-minister-and-ambassador/2017/05/15/530c172a-3960-11e7-9e48-c4f199710b69_story.html
	Trump revealed highly classified information to Russian foreign minister and ambassador
	By Greg Miller and Greg Jaffe May 15


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/864452996129853444
	I have been asking Director Comey & others, from the beginning of my administration, to find the LEAKERS in the intelligence community.....
	5:10 AM - 16 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873120139222306817
	Despite so many false statements and lies, total and complete vindication...and WOW, Comey is a leaker!
	3:10 AM - 9 Jun 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873879934040780801
	I believe the James Comey leaks will be far more prevalent than anyone ever thought possible. Totally illegal? Very 'cowardly!'
	5:29 AM - 11 Jun 2017 



The hunt for Donald Trump's tax returns continues. Grassley reveals that Comey is under scrutiny for the alleged FBI involvement with the "dirty dossier." Trump schedules a call with Putin.

Russian spy Julia Ioffe says the call is no big deal and "bleak" for Putin. During the call, Trump and Putin discuss Putin's "new ideas" for deeper cooperation in Syria and schedule a meeting for July. Putin asks Trump to meet Lavrov during his visit next week. Trump relies "yes."

Trump blasts Comey on twitter. At a hearing the next day, Comey struggles to find an excuse for his actions during the 2016 election. Spicer maintains that Trump has "confidence" in Comey, writing off Trump's tweets. Roger Stone gives a mysterious interview claiming communications with Trump and suggesting those communications were monitored.

Yates is scheduled to testify on her warnings about Flynn. Before the hearing, Trump points out on twitter that Obama also hired Flynn, and implies Yates is a leaker.

Trump downplays Yate's testimony, which reveals Yates believed Flynn was compromised and her warnings to the White House were urgent. Yates says that "if nothing was done" after the warnings it would be "concerning."

Clapper confirms that foreign allies passed the U.S. intelligence describing "suspicious contacts" between Trump advisors and Russian intelligence agents. Trump asserts that Clapper testified there is "no evidence" of collusion between Russia and Trump.

Yates testimony also reveals that Flynn was interviewed on White House grounds without a lawyer, that the White House knew Flynn had been interviewed by the FBI, that the White House asked DOJ about potential criminal proceedings and that the White House failed to notify the DOJ and other officials of Trump's travel ban, and strongly implies that the calls with the Russian ambassador were problematic and that Trump himself hid these from Pence, among other things (as previously mentioned).

The day of Yate's and Clapper's hearing, Rosenstein learns that Comey is to be fired. The next day, Rosenstein publishes a memo recommending Comey be fired for reasons that tend to criticize Comey for being too hard on Clinton. Trump had criticized Comey for going too easy on Clinton 6 days earlier. Trump cites the memo as the reason he fired Comey, saying he believes Rosenstein wrote it because of Comey's "poor performance before Congress." When asked later if he asked Rosenstein for a recommendation to fire Comey, Trump doesn't answer but says he was going to fire Comey anyway.

In Comey's termination letter, Trump stresses that Comey informed him "on three separate occasions" that he is not under investigation. Trump's lawyers assert there are no connections to Russia in the last 10 years of Trump's tax returns, except for some exceptions.

In an apparent attempt to intimidate him, Trump warns Comey that he "better hope that there are no 'tapes' of our conversations before he starts leaking to the press." Trump continues to rant about leakers, accusing Comey of being a leaker and charging that he had long ago asked Comey to "find the LEAKERS in the intelligence community."

The day after firing Comey, Trump meets with Russian ambassadors Kislyak and Lavrov in the Oval Office. Apparently, Trump hoped to make deals for closer cooperation and warmer relations between the United States and Russia and, reportedly, Trump told Lavrov firing Comey had relieved "great pressure." Trump described the meeting as "very, very good."

However, following the meeting, Trump is besieged by a series of dramatic leaks, alleging his incompetence and deep, sordid ties to Russia. Trump wonders "when does it end?" 

Trump posits that Comey will leak more than anybody could possibly imagine, in such a way as to be potentially "totally illegal" but definitely "very cowardly."


Trump told Comey he wanted his "loyalty," expressed his hopes that Comey could "see his way to letting Flynn go," asked Comey to "lift the cloud" of the Russia investigation over his dealmaking before firing him. For the question of "what was Trump's intent?" behind these actions, Comey and Trump give very different interpretations.





------


First, what they agree on: both agree the Jan 6th, Jan 27th, Feb 14th, March 30th, and April 11th conversations occurred. Both agree that that a lot of the press reports about Russian collusion get the facts wrong. Both agree that, at least at one point, Trump expressed that he wanted the Russia investigation to be done well. Both agree that Comey told Trump he was not under investigation at least three times, although Comey mentions telling Trump he's not under investigation on Jan 6 and Trump does not.

Besides Comey's view of his conversations with Trump, neither are aware of any other attempt to impede the investigation, and this is backed up by other statements and testimonies:


http://www.npr.org/2017/06/07/531897778/intelligence-leaders-testify-before-senate-panel-hearing
	DAN COATS: I have never been pressured. I have never felt pressure to intervene or interfere in any way with shaping intelligence in a political way or in relationship to an ongoing investigation.

	...BLUNT: And you would characterize your quote as no effort to impede the Russian investigation as still accurate?

	McCABE: That’s correct.

	...RUBIO: The question is, are you aware of any efforts by anyone in the White House or the executive branch looking for advice from other members of the intelligence community about how to potentially influence an investigation?.

	ROGERS: Are you talking about me? No.

	COATS: No.

	McCABE: I'm not sure I understand the question, but if you're asking whether we—I’m aware of requests to other people in the intelligence community, I am not.

	RUBIO: Seeking advice on how it could potentially influence someone, you're not aware of anyone ever saying or reporting that to you?

	McCABE: No, sir.


With Adam Entous being the odd man out:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/top-intelligence-official-told-associates-trump-asked-him-if-he-could-intervene-with-comey-to-get-fbi-to-back-off-flynn/2017/06/06/cc879f14-4ace-11e7-9669-250d0b15f83b_story.html
 	Top intelligence official told associates Trump asked him if he could intervene with Comey on FBI Russia probe 

	By Adam Entous June 6

	The nation’s top intelligence official told associates in March that President Trump asked him if he could intervene with then-FBI Director James B. Comey to get the bureau to back off its focus on former national security adviser Michael Flynn in its Russia probe, according to officials.

	On March 22, less than a week after being confirmed by the Senate, Director of National Intelligence Daniel Coats attended a briefing at the White House together with officials from several government agencies. As the briefing was wrapping up, Trump asked everyone to leave the room except for Coats and CIA Director Mike Pompeo.

	The president then started complaining about the FBI investigation and Comey’s handling of it, said officials familiar with the account Coats gave to associates. Two days earlier, Comey had confirmed in a congressional hearing that the bureau was probing whether Trump’s campaign coordinated with Russia during the 2016 race.

	After the encounter, Coats discussed the conversation with other officials and decided that intervening with Comey as Trump had suggested would be inappropriate, according to officials who spoke on condition of anonymity to discuss sensitive internal matters.


And Pompeo, as far as I can tell, so far remaining silent.


Amusingly, both agree that Comey is cowardly:


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873879934040780801
	I believe the James Comey leaks will be far more prevalent than anyone ever thought possible. Totally illegal? Very 'cowardly!'


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	FEINSTEIN: You told the president, I would see what we could do. What did you mean?

	COMEY: It was kind of a cowardly way of trying to avoid telling him, we're not going to do that. That I would see what we could do. It was a way of kind of getting off the phone, frankly

	...FEINSTEIN: Now, here's the question, you're big. You're strong. I know the oval office, and I know what happens to people when they walk in. There is a certain amount of intimidation. But why didn't you stop and say, Mr. President, this is wrong. I cannot discuss this with you.

	COMEY: It's a great question. Maybe if I were stronger, I would have. I was so stunned by the conversation that I just took in. The only thing I could think to say, because I was playing in my mind -- because I could remember every word he said -- I was playing in my mind, what should my response be? That's why I carefully chose the words. Look, I've seen the tweet about tapes. Lordy, I hope there are tapes. I remember saying, “I agree he is a good guy,” as a way of saying, I'm not agreeing with what you asked me to do. Again, maybe other people would be stronger in that circumstance. That's how Ed myself. I hope I'll never have another opportunity. Maybe if I did it again, I'd do it better. 

	...COMEY: ...I don't know. I think — as I said earlier, I think the circumstances were such that it was — I was a bit stunned and didn't have the presence of mind. I don't know. I don't want to make you sound like I'm captain courageous.


------

But neither of their stories completely hold up.

Trump says Rosenstein wrote his memo on Comey because of Comey's poor performance in Congressional hearings, and Trump describes his reason to fire Comey as "accepting the recommendation" of Rosenstein and Sessions. But Trump was planning to fire Comey before that, and Trump asked Rosenstein for the memo:


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-rosensteins-full-opening-statement-comey-congress/
	On May 8, I learned that President Trump intended to remove Director Comey and sought my advice and input. Notwithstanding my personal affection for Director Comey, I thought it was appropriate to seek a new leader.

	I wrote a brief memorandum to the Attorney General summarizing my longstanding concerns about Director Comey’s public statements concerning the Secretary Clinton email investigation.

	I chose the issues to include in my memorandum. 

	...I sent my signed memorandum to the Attorney General after noon on Tuesday, May 9.


It looks like Trump was trying to hide his reasons for firing Comey.

Trump claims he "cherishes" the FBI, but it looks like Trump only likes the FBI when he thinks they're doing him favors:


https://www.bostonglobe.com/metro/2016/10/28/trump-says-fbi-letter-means-system-might-not-rigged-thought/WND8gcgRPAJDXd0EBerPaI/story.html
	October 28, 2016
	Trump says FBI letter means ‘system might not be as rigged as I thought’


http://www.businessinsider.com/trump-hillary-clinton-fbi-emails-rigged-system-2016-11
	Nov. 6, 2016
	Donald Trump on Sunday said Hillary Clinton was "being protected by a rigged system," hours after the FBI once again cleared her in its investigation into her use of a private email server.


Trump claims there is no collusion between his campaign and the Russians, but one of his foreign policy advisors had been recruited as a Russian agent, and his National Security Advisor made a deal with the Russians to hold off on retaliation against U.S. sanctions for election meddling. Trump's campaign has gone out of their way to aide the Russians in wars against our allies, something Trump said he'd "look into:"


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/week-transcript-donald-trump-vice-president-joe-biden/story?id=41020870
	 TRUMP: I'm not going to be mean to anybody. George, you know me pretty well. I don't bow, OK. I don't bow.

	But if we can have a good relationship with Russia and if Russia would help us get rid of ISIS, frankly, as far as I'm concerned, you're talking about tremendous amounts of money and lives and everything else, that would be a positive thing, not a negative thing.

	STEPHANOPOULOS: Even if that means conditioning our commitments to NATO, as you said?

	TRUMP: No, because you're not going to do that. NATO is going to be just fine. But NATO countries -- we have 28 countries -- many of them are taking advantage of us because they're not paying. So we're protecting these countries and they're not paying.

	And when people leave that last part in, everybody agrees with me.

	I'm all in favor of NATO. I said NATO is obsolete...

	STEPHANOPOULOS: Then why did you soften the GOP platform on Ukraine?

	TRUMP: I wasn't involved in that. Honestly, I was not involved.

	STEPHANOPOULOS: Your people were.

	TRUMP: Yes. I was not involved in that. I'd like to -- I'd have to take a look at it. But I was not involved in that. 


But there is no indication Trump has ever "looked into that." So how is he sure there is no collusion? Clearly, the FBI is not sure of that.

Trump said he has nothing to do with Russia except the Miss Universe pageant and selling a house to a wealthy Russian. But that's not what he's said before:


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	"It's ridiculous that I wouldn't be investing in Russia," Trump said in that deposition. "Russia is one of the hottest places in the world for investment."


http://www.eturbonews.com/5008/executive-talk-donald-trump-jr-bullish-russia-and-few-emerging-ma
	Executive Talk: Donald Trump Jr. bullish on Russia and few emerging markets

	“And in terms of high-end product influx into the US, Russians make up a pretty disproportionate cross-section of a lot of our assets;”


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/russia-trump-political-conflict-zone/story?id=42263092
 	Long before he ran for president, Trump displayed an ongoing interest in Russia and the former Soviet states. He negotiated projects in the Republic of Georgia and Azerbaijan, neither of which was completed. And he and his children at different times toured Moscow in search of a site for a Trump project there. 

 	...Trump was involved in a range of deals with Russian-born business executives, including the developer of the Trump project in Toronto. One of his partners in Trump Soho recruited financing from investors in Russia and Kazakhstan, according to court filings. And in 2013, Trump earned a cut of the proceeds when a Russian oligarch paid to host the Miss Universe Pageant at his venue in Moscow. 

	At the same time, wealthy Russians accounted for significant profits at Trump projects in the U.S.. Throughout the 2000s, records show Russians were buying into Trump branded real estate. 

	...There is ample evidence in Russian media from that period in the 2000s that brokers mounted a significant effort to attract buyers to Trump properties in Florida, Toronto and New York. And Trump and his children participated in those campaigns.
     
	During the marketing of the Trump SoHo project, in which Trump licensed his name to a group that included Russian investors, the Trump family met with a group of Russian journalists at their New York offices to help boost interest in the project, according to Russian media reports. During the meeting, Trump was quoted telling the gathering of Russian journalists: “I really like Vladimir Putin. I respect him. He does his work well. Much better than our Bush.”


Trump claims Yates didn't make her warning about Flynn sound urgent in her conversations with McGahn or her testimony, but Yates testified that the situation was a matter of urgency:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	YATES: ...The first meeting occurred on January 26, called Don McGahn first thing that morning and told him that I had a very sensitive matter that I needed to discuss with him, that I couldn't talk about it on the phone and that I needed to come see him.

	...We also told the White House Counsel that General Flynn had been interviewed by the FBI on February 24. Mr. McGahn asked me how he did and I declined to give him an answer to that.

	...not only did we believe that the Russians knew this, but that they likely had proof of this information.

	And that created a compromise situation, a situation where the national security adviser essentially could be blackmailed by the Russians. Finally, we told them that we were giving them all of this information so that they could take action, the action that they deemed appropriate.

	I remember that Mr. McGahn asked me whether or not General Flynn should be fired

	...WHITEHOUSE: You could perhaps have waited until you actually had seen the agents 302 from the interview of General Flynn. Why go ahead of that? Why not wait?

	YATES: Well, because this was a matter of some urgency, we...

	...YATES: ...And he said that they were concerned that taking action might interfere with the FBI investigation. And we told him, both the senior career official and I, that he should not be concerned with it, that General Flynn had been interviewed, that their action would not interfere with any investigation and in fact, I remember specifically saying, you know it wouldn't really be fair of us to tell you this and then expect you to sit on your hands.


Trump claims it is unfair to fire Flynn after "hearing from somebody we don't even know" (the acting Attorney General), but appears to think its fair to fire somebody after "illegal" and "unfair" leaks to the "witch hunting" media.

Trump, contradicting Comey's sworn testimony, claims he never asked Comey for "loyalty." But Trump asks everybody for loyalty:


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/06/26/style/hope-hicks-donald-trump.html
	Ms. Hicks, who has recently been featured in Marie Claire and GQ, remains loyal, apparently unperturbed by the controversies swirling around her candidate and prepared to stick it out.

	Mr. Trump, asked if Ms. Hicks would have a spot in his administration, replied, “She would definitely have a role.”

	...Or, as Ivanka Trump said in an interview: “My father makes people earn his trust. She’s earned his trust.”


http://www.nytimes.com/2006/09/24/fashion/24mentor.html
	Employees of Mr. Trump say he gives opportunities to those he hires but expects loyalty in return.


http://www.nytimes.com/books/first/t/trump-comeback.html
	Trump
	The Art of the Comeback
	By DONALD J. TRUMP

	...It was then that Rhona Graff, my very loyal secretary, came into my office...


http://www.mediaite.com/tv/donald-trump-blasts-michele-bachmann-for-bailing-on-debate-its-called-loyalty/
	Donald Trump phoned in to Don Imus‘ Fox Business Network show on Friday morning, and he lit into Michele Bachmann for her decision to skip his Dec. 27 debate.

	...“And then after all of that, she announced she’s not going to do the debate. It’s unbelievable. You know, it’s called loyalty. It’s actually called loyalty. How do you do that? You know, it’s amazing to me.” 


http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2016/07/2016-donald-trump-boss-employer-company-hired-fired-employees-workers-management-business-214020
	Trump the actual boss swings wildly between micromanaging meddler and can’t-be-bothered, broad-brush, big-picture thinker. ...He hires on gut instinct rather than qualifications; he listens to others, but not as much or as often as he listens to himself. He’s loyal—“like, this great loyalty freak,” as he once put it


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/answer-sheet/wp/2017/05/01/may-1-is-loyalty-day-in-america-heres-trumps-view-of-the-day-and-obamas/
	NOW, THEREFORE, I, DONALD J. TRUMP, President of the United States of America, do hereby proclaim May 1, 2017, as Loyalty Day.  This Loyalty Day, I call on all Americans to observe this day with appropriate ceremonies in our schools and other public places


http://www.politico.com/blogs/2016-gop-primary-live-updates-and-results/2016/03/donald-trump-loyalty-oaths-220416
	Donald Trump dismissed comparisons of his use of loyalty oaths during recent campaign rallies to Nazi Germany and other dark chapters of history on Tuesday as "ridiculous."

	"I mean, we’re having such a great time," Trump told NBC's "Today" in a pre-primary telephone interview.

	The loyalty pledges began at a rally Saturday in Orlando, Florida, where Trump asked the crowd: “Raise your right hand: ‘I do solemnly swear that I — no matter how I feel, no matter what the conditions, if there’s hurricanes or whatever — will vote, on or before the 12th for Donald J. Trump for president."


It's also interesting how Trump changed his story about the "tapes" of his conversations with Comey:


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/863007411132649473
	James Comey better hope that there are no "tapes" of our conversations before he starts leaking to the press!
	5:26 AM - 12 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/wikileaks/status/863088282686472192/photo/1
	WikiLeaks offers US$100k for the Trump-Comey tapes. To increase the reward send Bitcoin to reward address: 1FfzC3KrbrJ3CRbz4hqHnxSqvYfy9M5CT
	10:47 AM - 12 May 2017


http://www.foxnews.com/transcript/2017/05/12/hannity-trump-should-replace-wh-briefings-with-tweets.html
	Published May 12, 2017

	PIRRO: People suggest that the question that, apparently, The New York Times is selling, that you asked Comey whether or not you had his loyalty, was possibly inappropriate. Could you see how they would think that?

	TRUMP: No, I don't think -- I read that article. I don't think it's inappropriate, number one. It isn't--

	PIRRO: Did you ask that question?

	TRUMP: No. No, I didn't. But I don't think it would be a bad question to ask. I think loyalty to the country, loyalty to United States is important. You know, I mean, it depends on how you define loyalty, number one. And number two, I don't know how that got there because I didn't ask that question.

	PIRRO: What about the idea that in a tweet, you said that there might be tape recordings?

	TRUMP: Well, that I can't talk about. I won't talk about that. All I want is for Comey to be honest, and I hope he will be, and I'm sure he will be, I hope.


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/333461-white-house-refuses-to-say-if-comey-tapes-exist
	White House refuses to say if Comey tapes exist

	05/15/17 

	The White House refused to say Monday whether recordings exist of conversations between President Trump and visitors to the White House, including fired FBI Director James Comey.

	White House press secretary Sean Spicer also refused to say whether the president would comply with congressional requests to produce the recordings.

	Facing repeated questions from multiple news outlets, Spicer went back to the same line: “The president has made it clear what his position is.”


https://www.usnews.com/news/politics/articles/2017-06-10/trump-denies-seeking-comey-loyalty-dodges-tapes-question
 	Trump Denies Seeking Comey 'Loyalty,' Dodges Tapes Question 

	June 10, 2017, at 2:26 a.m.

	WASHINGTON (AP) — President Donald Trump says he's willing to testify under oath about his conversations with the man he fired as FBI director.

	The pledge came as Trump accused James Comey of lying to Congress about their private exchanges. The president specifically denied asking Comey for his "loyalty" early in Trump's term.

	Comey testified at a Senate hearing that he made memos after speaking to Trump on several occasions because he feared the president would lie about them. He also said Trump wanted him to back off on the FBI investigation of his former national security adviser, Michael Flynn.

	Trump dodged questions at a news conference about whether, as he's hinted, the conversations with Comey were taped. The House intelligence committee is seeking any tapes of the conversations.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/06/22/us/politics/trump-comey-tapes.html
	Trump Says He Did Not Tape Comey Conversations
	By MARK LANDLER and MAGGIE HABERMAN
	JUNE 22, 2017 

	WASHINGTON — President Trump cleared up one of the capital’s least suspenseful mysteries on Thursday, acknowledging that he did not record conversations with James B. Comey, the F.B.I. director he fired in anger over an investigation into his campaign’s possible ties to Russia.

	Meeting a self-imposed deadline of this week to resolve questions he himself raised by implying that he had taped Mr. Comey, Mr. Trump said on Twitter that he had not made tapes of what Mr. Comey has testified were attempts by the president to derail the Justice Department’s investigation.

	...Mr. Trump’s original tweet appeared to refer to an article in The New York Times that reported that he had asked Mr. Comey to pledge loyalty during a dinner at the White House shortly after the inauguration.


Trump came out swinging with threats he could blackmail Comey with the tapes. But after he denied asking for Comey's loyalty in an interview with Jeanine Pirro, Trump didn't sound so confident. It sounds like Trump was lying about the loyalty question.


Trump claims his meeting with Lavrov was "very public," but he announced it with less than 24 hours warning and barred the U.S. press from attending:


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/10/us/politics/trump-russia-meeting-american-reporters-blocked.html
	Trump Bars U.S. Press, but Not Russia’s, at Meeting With Russian Officials

	 When President Trump met with top Russian officials in the Oval Office on Wednesday, White House officials barred reporters from witnessing the moment. They apparently preferred to block coverage of the awkwardly timed visit as questions swirled about whether the president had dismissed his F.B.I. director in part to squelch the investigation into possible ties between his campaign and Moscow.

	...Within minutes of the meeting, the Foreign Ministry had posted photographs on Twitter of Mr. Trump and Mr. Lavrov smiling and shaking hands.

	...The White House released nothing.

	...Mr. Trump’s session with Mr. Lavrov was listed on his schedule as “Closed Press,” meaning the news media would not have a chance to photograph or otherwise document the meeting. 

	...reporters thought that White House officials might have reconsidered and decided to allow a glimpse of Mr. Trump’s meeting with the Russians after all. But instead, they were allowed into the Oval Office for a few moments to cover another, previously undisclosed meeting: between Mr. Trump and Henry Kissinger, the Nixon administration’s secretary of state.


Trump had scheduled the meeting more than a week earlier at Putin's request.


------


Comey's story doesn't completely hold up either.

Comey claims that "the administration" were the ones who defamed him, and that charges that the FBI was in disarray, was poorly led, and had lost confidence in Comey are lies. But this is hard to believe given the facts of Comey's handling of the email case, and contradicts numerous other public statements and reporting:


https://www.msn.com/en-us/news/politics/fbi-in-internal-feud-over-clinton-probe/ar-AAjCtQu
	The new investigative effort, disclosed by FBI Director James Comey on Friday, shows a bureau at times in sharp internal disagreement over matters related to the Clintons, and how to handle those matters fairly and carefully in the middle of a national election campaign. Even as the probe of Mrs. Clinton’s email use wound down in July, internal disagreements within the bureau and the Justice Department surrounding the Clintons’ family philanthropy heated up, according to people familiar with the matter.

	...The back-and-forth reflects how the bureau is probing several matters related, directly or indirectly, to Mrs. Clinton and her inner circle.

	...Some investigators grew frustrated, viewing FBI leadership as uninterested in probing the charity, these people said.

	...Others further down the FBI chain of command, however, said agents were given a much starker instruction on the case: “Stand down.” 

	...For agents who already felt uneasy about FBI leadership’s handling of the Clinton Foundation case, the moment only deepened their concerns, these people said.

	...Some FBI agents were dissatisfied with that answer, and asked for permission to make a similar request to federal prosecutors in Manhattan, according to people familiar with the matter. Mr. McCabe, these people said, told them no and added that they couldn’t “go prosecutor-shopping.”

	Not long after that discussion, FBI agents informed the bureau’s leaders about the Weiner laptop, prompting Mr. Comey’s disclosure to Congress and setting off the furor that promises to consume the final days of a tumultuous campaign.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-nation/wp/2016/10/28/read-the-letter-comey-sent-to-fbi-employees-explaining-his-controversial-decision-on-the-clinton-email-investigation/
	Read the letter Comey sent to FBI employees explaining his controversial decision on the Clinton email investigation 

	To all:

	This morning I sent a letter to Congress in connection with the Secretary Clinton email investigation.

	...Of course, we don’t ordinarily tell Congress about ongoing investigations

	...but here I feel an obligation to do so given that I testified repeatedly in recent months that our investigation was completed. I also think it would be misleading to the American people were we not to supplement the record.  At the same time, however, given that we don’t know the significance of this newly discovered collection of emails, I don’t want to create a misleading


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-justice-comey-idUSKBN1322K6
	FBI agents, lawmakers hammer Comey over Clinton emails inquiry

	...FBI "field agents have felt the derivative impact of the criticism fired at Director Comey as a result of the Clinton email scandal," said Jon Adler, president of the Federal Law Enforcement Officers Association Foundation, which represents more than 3,500 FBI agents.

	He said some agents disapprove of Comey's handling of the investigation and think he should resign, while others support him, but do not appreciate being in a political crossfire.

	A spokesman for the FBI Agents Association said the more than 13,000 active and former special agents it represents have become the victims of “unwarranted attacks” on their integrity.


http://www.cnn.com/2016/11/02/politics/james-comey-fbi-reputation/index.html
	Turmoil in the FBI

	Washington (CNN) - Among the casualties of the 2016 presidential campaign is the mystique of the FBI.

	...The tensions have multiplied since FBI Director James Comey made an unprecedented public announcement in July that there should be no charges against Clinton or her aides following a year-long probe.

	That announcement -- without prior notice to his bosses at the Justice Department and, according to his critics, usurping the traditional role of prosecutors to review FBI recommendations in secret -- opened up sharp divides between Justice and FBI officials

	...Soon after the FBI opened its investigation into the Clinton server in the summer of 2015, Comey decided it would be run from headquarters instead of New York, which is the jurisdiction where the Clinton server had been located.

	That decision angered some in New York who thought it was headquarters' interference into their case.

	...That didn't quiet all of the complaints, particularly now that the behind-the-scenes tussles are spilling out into the public.

	During the Clinton email server investigation, investigators and prosecutors debated whether to issue subpoenas to Clinton's aides, officials say. Leaders at the FBI and at the Justice Department thought it would be faster 

	...In July, Comey made his announcement to recommend no charges against Clinton.

	At a Capitol Hill hearing days later, Comey told members of Congress that he was proud there had been no leaks of his decision.

	But blowback from some current and former agents was immediate. As Comey made his rounds of visits to field offices around the country, he heard stinging criticism, particularly from retired agents.

	At one meeting in Kansas City, Comey was confronted with stinging criticism of the probe. He pushed back, saying the career agents who knew the most of the case arrived at the conclusion that the case against Clinton wasn't even a close call.

	FBI agents again pressed to take more overt steps in the Clinton Foundation probe, including possibly issuing subpoenas.

	...Officials at FBI headquarters decided the Clinton Foundation probe should be consolidated in New York. They ordered that agents in Los Angeles, Little Rock and Washington, D.C., turn over their files to the FBI New York office, which appeared to have the strongest case to make.

	Agents were told to continue their work. But the order to the other field offices angered agents there.

	...How will controversy shape the bureau?

	Decades after the death of J. Edgar Hoover, who built the mystique of FBI agents as a special class of investigators, the bureau continues to nurture that image. The bureau lends its help to Hollywood, which churns out movies and television shows glamorizing the work of FBI agents.

	...How much the recent controversy changes the FBI is to be seen.

	James V. DeSarno, who spent 28 years in the bureau and rose to the level of assistant director, agrees that Comey's July announcement and Friday letter were unprecedented. But he says it doesn't signal how the FBI will run cases.

	"I don't think he believes he's changed the rules," DeSarno said of Comey, "But I can see where other people may think he has."


https://washington.blogs.nytimes.com/2007/06/27/perspective-on-the-jewels-from-the-cias-chief-historian/
	Perspective on the Jewels From the C.I.A.’s Chief Historian
	By David Robarge June 27, 2007

	For more than 30 years, the Family Jewels have clouded the C.I.A.’s reputation... William Colby — who oversaw the compilation of the Jewels while serving as the agency’s operations chief and director-designate — is the source of some durable misconceptions about them. 

	...These misstatements were repeated at least in part in several widely read works

	...These final records — several of them in Colby’s own hand — make an unintentionally fitting conclusion to the Jewels collection, the product of a process he orchestrated as a damage control exercise but which almost proved to be the agency’s undoing.


https://www.usnews.com/news/politics/articles/2017-05-09/ap-source-abedin-didnt-send-as-many-emails-as-comey-said
	The FBI on Tuesday corrected the sworn testimony of Director James Comey, who last week told Congress that a top aide to Hillary Clinton had sent "hundreds and thousands" of emails to her husband's laptop, including some with classified information.

	In fact, the FBI said in a two-page letter to the Senate Judiciary Committee, only "a small number" of the thousands of emails found on the laptop had been forwarded there while most had simply been backed up from electronic devices. Most of the email chains on the laptop containing classified information were not the result of forwarding, the FBI said.

	Comey was fired soon after the letter was made public, with the Justice Department faulting his overall conduct during the handling of the investigation into Clinton's use of a private email server.


Comey said he wasn't sure at first why he was fired, but claims he later learned, after reading about Trump's conversations and watching Trump's interviews, that the President himself said Comey was fired because of the Russia investigation, saying he "takes the President at his word." Comey hints that he's referring to reports like these:


http://www.npr.org/2017/05/19/529171249/report-trump-told-russians-he-fired-nut-job-comey-because-of-investigation
	Report: Trump Told Russians He Fired 'Nut Job' Comey Because Of Investigation
	Jessica Taylor 

	"I just fired the head of the F.B.I. He was crazy, a real nut job," Trump told the Russian foreign minister and U.S. ambassador on May 10 during an Oval Office meeting, according to a transcript of the meeting read to The Times by a U.S. official. "I faced great pressure because of Russia. That's taken off."


https://www.vox.com/2017/5/11/15628276/trump-comey-fired-russia
	Trump has now admitted he fired Comey because of the Russia investigation
	by Andrew Prokop

	...But regardless of [the] recommendation, I was going to fire Comey. Knowing there was no good time to do it! 

	And in fact when I decided to just do it I said to myself, I said, “You know, this Russia thing with Trump and Russia is a made-up story, it’s an excuse by the Democrats for having lost an election that they should’ve won.”


In his conversation with Lavrov, trump said firing Comey took off "great pressure because of Russia," but Trump doesn't say he fired Comey because of the Russia investigation. And Trump might been referring to leaks when he said "pressure," for example.

In the interview, Trump claims he was thinking about how the Russia investigation is an "excuse by the Democrats" when he fired Comey. Before that, he says there was no good time to fire him. It sounds like Trump was aware firing Comey in the middle of the investigation looks bad and was trying to make excuses for it. You could probably argue from this that Trump has a guilty mind about firing Comey and thinks it could have affected the investigation, but you can't say "I take trump at his word that he fired Comey because of the Russia investigation," because that's not what he said.

Trump called up Comey on March 30 to ask if he could "get it out" that he wasn't under investigation, clear the name of his friends if the investigation found nothing wrong and "lift the cloud" of the Russia investigation. Leading up to the phone call, multiple media reports described the perception of Russian collusion as a "cloud" of Trump's presidency:


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/03/20/fbi-bombshell-comey-trump-russia-investigation/99411214/
	Analysis: FBI bombshell creates 'a big gray cloud' over Trump's White House

	Published 3:48 p.m. ET March 20, 2017

	WASHINGTON — Not since Watergate.

	...After more than five hours of testimony, Intelligence Chairman Devin Nunes, R-Calif., closed the hearing with an almost anguished plea to Comey to finish the investigation as soon as possible. “The longer this hangs out here, the bigger the cloud is,” he said. “There is a big gray cloud that you have now put over people who have very important work to do to lead this country.”


Comey interpreted "lift the cloud" to mean "drop the Russia investigation." But it sounds like Trump was referring to the "big gray cloud" reported by the media. "Getting out" that Trump wasn't under investigation would have helped "lift" that "cloud," and that's exactly what Trump asked.

At the February 14th Oval office meeting, Trump cleared the room and told Comey "I hope you can see your way clear to letting this go, to letting Flynn go. He is a good guy. I hope you can let this go." Comey interpreted this as an order to drop all ongoing criminal investigations into Flynn.

But this was the day after Trump fired Flynn, and Trump expressed that he believed that the IC had it out for Flynn, and that he was forced to fire Flynn because of leaks from "Obama people" in "intelligence." Trump preceded his Flynn comments by a long rant about leaks. The leak that did Flynn in the day before revealed that the Trump administration was warned that Flynn was vulnerable to blackmail, a warning that Trump had ignored for 18 days. A few days before that, there was a major leak that Flynn discussed sanctions with the Russian ambassador, and another that the CIA denied a security clearance to one of Flynn's aids.

It sounds like Trump thought the IC had it out for Flynn (and himself) and was trying to plea for clemency. "I hope you can let this go" makes it sound like Trump thought Comey was angry at him. Trump would later assert that Flynn was "treated unfairly by the media."

Trump has shown an awareness that obstruction of justice is wrong in his public statements, and it is unlikely that Trump would take such a risk for Flynn. There is no basis to conclude that Trump cares about anybody other than himself. And Trump is happy to blame his problems with Flynn on Obama instead of defending him:


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/861550676505219073
	General Flynn was given the highest security clearance by the Obama Administration - but the Fake News seldom likes talking about that.
	4:57 AM - 8 May 2017


https://archive.org/details/CSPAN_20170427_223700_Sean_Spicer_Says_Obama_Administration_Granted_Security_Clearance_to_General.../
	SPICER: ...His clearance was last re-issued by the Obama Administration in 2016 with full knowledge of his activities that occurred in 2015, as you point out. So the issue is, you know, he was issued a security clearance under the Obama Administration in the spring of 2016.


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	HOLT: Did you know that he had had -- that received payments from the Russian government? That he had...

	TRUMP: No.

	HOLT: ...received payments from the Turkish government?

	TRUMP: No, but Obama perhaps knew because he had clearance from the Obama administration. And his -- and -- and this is something they never want to report.

	He had clearance from the Obama administration, the highest clearance you can have. And I think it's a very unfair thing that the media doesn't talk about that.

	You know, you're talking about 2015. I don't know that I knew him in 2015.


There are compelling reasons to believe Trump suspects an investigation into Flynn could bring him down, but Comey had already told Trump that he was not under investigation 17 days earlier--after Trump learned of Flynn's legal jeopardy.

Comey says he wouldn't "go so far" as to "connect" Trump's demand for loyalty to the investigation:


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	SEN. RON WYDEN: ...I believe January 27th, all in one dinner, the president raised your job prospects, he asked for your loyalty and denied allegations against him. All took place over one supper. Now, you told senator Warner that the president was looking to, quote, get something. Looking back, did that dinner suggest that your job might be contingent on how you handled the investigation?

	COMEY: I don't know that I'd go that far. I got the sense my job would be contingent upon how he felt I — excuse me — how he felt I conducted myself and whether I demonstrated loyalty. But I don't know whether I'd go so far as to connect it to the investigation. 


But the timing of the requests makes it reasonable to suspect a connection. Trump had just learned that Flynn had been interviewed by the FBI about his contacts with the Russian ambassador. Flynn made major decisions during those calls, including setting up a later call between Trump and Putin, and Flynn called back four times in the same day. It's a reasonable suspicion that Trump was involved with the calls, which means the investigation into Flynn could implicate Trump.

Flynn was interviewed without a lawyer, suggesting he might not have been the target of that investigation. The White House was in a position to know this when they asked the DOJ about possible criminal proceedings a few hours before Comey's dinner. Meanwhile, Trump was preparing a "travel ban" that would give him an alibi for firing the acting Attorney General.

According to Trump's interview and media reports, it was during this dinner that Trump asked Comey if he was under investigation. But Comey had already assured Trump he wasn't under investigation earlier that month, a fact which Trump would conspicuously omit in a later interview. Clearly, something happened between January 6th and January 27th that made Trump feel the need to ask again.

But Comey says he wouldn't "go so far" as to connect Trump's demand for loyalty to any investigation.

When pressed for loyalty on Jan 27th, Comey told Trump he'd give him "honest loyalty." When Trump told Comey he hoped he could "let Flynn go," Comey didn't challenge Trump or ask for clarification. When Trump asked Comey if he could "lift the cloud" on March 30th, Comey told him he'd "see what he can do." When Trump asked Comey about this request and brought up "that thing we had" on April 11, Comey doesn't ask any questions. This is inappropriate behavior for an FBI director, but Comey's excuses are weak:


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	REED: Now, again, also, you've testified that the president asked you repeatedly to be loyal to him. And you responded you'd be honestly loyal. Which is your way of saying I'll be honest and I'll be ahead of the FBI independent, is that fair?

	COMEY: Correct. I tried honest first. And also, you see it in my testimony. I also tried to explain to him why it's in his interest and every president's interest for the FBI to be apart, in a way, because it's credibility is important to a president and total country. And so, I tried to hold the line. Hold the line. It got very awkward. And then I said you'll always have honesty from me. He said honest loyalty. And I then I proceeded with that as I saw that as a way to add this awkwardness. 

	...FEINSTEIN: You told the president, I would see what we could do. What did you mean?

	COMEY: It was kind of a cowardly way of trying to avoid telling him, we're not going to do that. That I would see what we could do. It was a way of kind of getting off the phone, frankly, and then I turned and handed it to the acting deputy attorney general. 

	...RUBIO: His specific ask was you'd tell the American people what you'd told him, told the leaders of Congress, Democrats and Republicans, he was not personally under investigation?

	COMEY: Yes, sir.

	RUBIO: What he was asking you to do, would you have done here today?

	COMEY: Correct. Yes, sir.

	RUBIO: Again, at that setting, did you say to the president, it would be inappropriate for you to do so and then talk to the White House counsel or somebody so hopefully they'd talked to him and tell him he couldn't do this?

	COMEY: First time I said, I'll see what we can do. Second time, I explained how it should work, that the White House counsel should contact the deputy attorney general.

	RUBIO: You told him that?

	COMEY: The president said, okay. I think that's what I'll do. 

	...McCAIN: So both President Trump and former candidate Clinton are both involved in the investigation, yet one of them, you said, there's going to be no charges. And the other one, the investigation continues. Well, I think there's a double standard there to tell you the truth. Then when the president said to you, he talked about the April 11th phone call, he said, quote, because I've been very loyal to you. Very loyal. We had that thing, you know. Does that arouse your curiosity as to what quote that thing was?

	COMEY: Yes.

	McCAIN: Why didn't you ask him?

	COMEY: It didn't seem to me to be important for the conversation we were having to understand that I took it to be some — an effort to communicate to me this — that there is a relationship between us where I've been good to you, you should be good to me. 

	...RUBIO: And in that meeting, as you understood it, he was asking not about the general Russia investigation, he was asking specifically about the jeopardy that Flynn was in himself?

	COMEY: That's how I understood it. Yes, sir.

	RUBIO: As you perceived it, while he hoped you did away with it, you perceived it as an order, given the setting, the position and some of the circumstances?

	COMEY: Yes.

	RUBIO: At the time, did you say something to the president about, that is not an appropriate request, or did you tell the white house counsel, it's not an appropriate request? Someone needs to tell the president he can't do these things.

	COMEY: I didn't, no.

	RUBIO: Why?

	COMEY: I don't know. I think — as I said earlier, I think the circumstances were such that it was — I was a bit stunned and didn't have the presence of mind. I don't know. I don't want to make you sound like I'm captain courageous. I don't know if I would have said to the president with the presence of mind, sir, that's wrong. In the moment, it didn't come to my mind. What came to my mind is be careful what you say. I said, I agree Flynn is a good guy. 


Comey's statements to Trump and the public make it sound like he's trying to confuse people.


Between Comey and Trump, it looks like we have two people describing the same events, and both are liars. This makes it difficult to figure out what was actually going on. Still, we can make a decent guess at what was really going on. The above timeline is helpful.

A few things about Trump provide some context.

First, Trump is obsessed with the press, especially for coverage about himself:


http://www.businessinsider.com/the-art-of-the-deal-donald-trump-leadership-2017-1/#he-learned-how-to-be-a-force-in-the-public-arena-from-roy-cohn-3
	8 key insights from Trump's book 'The Art of the Deal' reveal how the president thinks

	...He's long had an obsession with the press.

	...Trump developed a habit early in his career of closely monitoring all media coverage of himself and his properties, and often wrote letters to reporters and writers when he disagreed with their criticisms. "My people keep telling me I shouldn't write letters like this to critics," he writes. "The way I see it, critics get to say what they want about my work, so why shouldn't I be able to say what I want about theirs?"


http://www.businessinsider.com/the-art-of-the-deal-donald-trump-leadership-2017-1/#this-includes-making-the-most-of-controversy-and-drama-6
	Trump also learned to make the most of a disastrous story, as when he made the decision to destroy a few sculptures when he made way for Trump Tower in 1979, not expecting an outcry from art lovers and designers.

	"Even though the publicity was almost entirely negative, there was a great deal of it, and that drew a tremendous amount of attention to Trump Tower," he writes. "Almost immediately we saw an upsurge in the sales of apartments. I'm not saying that's a good thing, and in truth it probably says something perverse about the culture we live in. But I'm a businessman, and I learned a lesson from that experience: good publicity is preferable to bad, but from a bottom-line perspective, bad publicity is sometimes better than no publicity at all. Controversy, in short, sells."


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/donald-trump-alter-ego-barron/2016/05/12/02ac99ec-16fe-11e6-aa55-670cabef46e0_story.html
	Donald Trump masqueraded as publicist to brag about himself 

	...A “John Baron,” described as a “vice-president of the Trump organization,” appeared in a front-page New York Times article as early as 1980, defending Trump’s decision to destroy sculptures on the facade of the Bonwit Teller department store building, the Fifth Avenue landmark he was demolishing to make way for his Trump Tower. Barron was quoted variously as a “Trump spokesman,” “Trump executive” or “Trump representative” in New York magazine, The Washington Post and other publications.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/07/03/trump-fake-news-white-house-240196
	Trump: 'Fake News will be forced to discuss' White House accomplishments


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/881983493533822976
	Dow hit a new intraday all-time high! I wonder whether or not the Fake News Media will so report?
	2:10 PM - 3 Jul 2017 


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/trump-eventually-media-will-be-forced-to-focus-on-my-success/article/2627670
	Trump: Eventually media 'will be forced' to focus on my success

	President Trump said Monday that the media eventually "will be forced" to focus on his administration's accomplishments, instead of continuing what he has called unfair coverage.

	"At some point the Fake News will be forced to discuss our great jobs numbers, strong economy, success with ISIS, the border & so much else!" Trump tweeted Monday while at his golf resort in Bedminster, N.J.

		At some point the Fake News will be forced to discuss our great jobs numbers, strong economy, success with ISIS, the border & so much else!— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 3, 2017

	Trump's tweets were the focus of the weekend news cycle after he said CNN "has finally been exposed" as "garbage journalism." He later shared an altered video that showed him tackling a CNN character in a Wrestlemania skit.

	Trump also said on Sunday that the "dishonest media" would not prevent him from carrying out his agenda.

	The continued attacks on reporters soaked up much of the discussion on Sunday morning news shows.


Trump watches press reports about himself and sometimes responds publicly. Often he will try to manipulate reporting about himself. He is said to be very image concious.

Otherwise, Trump is no stranger to coercion and threats, veiled or otherwise:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/donald-trump-alter-ego-barron/2016/05/12/02ac99ec-16fe-11e6-aa55-670cabef46e0_story.html
	From the start of his career as a builder in New York, Trump worked the press. He believed in carrots and sticks, showering reporters with praise, then pivoting to a threat to sue them if they wrote something he considered inaccurate.


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/nationworld/politics/ct-trump-eminent-domain-lawyer-20160325-story.html
	Donald Trump had a problem.

	He'd met two people who seemed as stubborn as him: a feisty widow whose house stood in the way of his Atlantic City casino expansion, and her attorney.

	Trump's approach struck his adversaries as brazen. Even though the widow was suing him for damaging her house, Trump called her attorney, Glenn Zeitz, and, according to Zeitz, tried to hire him for a potentially more lucrative case.

	...At one point, Trump's team pushed city officials to condemn her house and tear it down.


http://articles.latimes.com/1996-02-25/news/mn-39769_1_trump-plaza
	Elderly Woman Battles Casinos Over Her Home
	February 25, 1996

	Even with giant casino hotels dwarfing her crumbling three-story home, Vera Coking refused to sell.

	...Coking watched from the outside as Donald J. Trump's newest casino project, a 22-story addition to neighboring Trump Plaza Hotel and Casino, opened Feb. 16, next door to the home where she has lived for 35 years.

	Trump lost out on a bid to have the lot seized in an eminent domain proceeding. So he built around her.

	Coking is surrounded on three sides by the casino hotels.

	Coking, whose wood-framed house is an eyesore with peeling white paint and a collapsed railing on the second-floor deck, lives on Social Security. Her health is failing, and she is in the process of fighting a condemnation action by the city.

	"If they give me the right price, I would sell," said Coking, who appears to be in her 70s.

	Her lawyer, Glenn A. Zeitz, continues to push Trump to buy her out. In recent talks, Zeitz said Trump's lawyers indicated that they would not pay more than $1 million. He said the house and lot are worth at least $2 million.

	Trump's employees have two words for the 5-foot-5 woman living at 127 Columbia Place. They call her "Trump's ulcer."

	"This is not an innocent little darling we're dealing with here," Trump said recently. "This is a tough, cunning, crafty person who has purposely allowed that property to go to hell, right at the foot of the entrance to Atlantic City, so she can get a higher price."

	Trump said he doesn't want the property badly enough to pay Coking's price.


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/nationworld/politics/ct-trump-eminent-domain-lawyer-20160325-story.html
	Still, Zeitz told Trump he wanted to give him something.

	Zeitz pulled out a baseball. He told Trump that when he first got involved in the case, the developer's lawyers told him that the Trump organization "plays hardball." He wanted Trump to know that he played hardball, too.

	Trump took the ball in his hand, Zeitz said. It had an inscription: "From 'The Vera.' To 'The Donald.' "

	The Donald handed it back.

	The next day Trump called Zeitz at the lawyer's weekend home in Avalon, New Jersey.

	...Trump pressed Zeitz to tell his client to take the deal and forget about both lawsuits. Then Trump added a wrinkle. He began talking about an Atlantic City tunnel project that a rival developer - casino mogul Steve Wynn - wanted built. The endeavor was similar to Coking's case in this respect: It would use eminent domain to buy out homeowners. But it was different in this respect: Trump wanted to block the project to prevent his rival from getting what he wanted

	...But he was stunned at what Trump said next. "He said to me that he wanted to hire me to represent Lillian Bryant and other people on the street," Zeitz recalled. "I would be getting hired by him to represent his interests."

	...Zeitz told Trump that he had to be loyal to his client and that it would be a conflict of interest to take the case while he was involved in Coking's lawsuit against the developer. Trump countered that he should rush a settlement of the Coking case so he'd no longer have a conflict, according to Zeitz.

	Zeitz said, "No."

	The next time they talked was in an Atlantic City courtroom.


http://time.com/4465744/donald-trump-undocumented-workers/
	In the summer of 1980, Donald Trump faced a big problem. For six months, undocumented Polish laborers had been clearing the future site of Trump Tower, his signature real estate project on Manhattan's Fifth Avenue, where he now lives, maintains his private offices and hosts his presidential campaign.

	The men were putting in 12-hour shifts with inadequate safety equipment at subpar wages that their contractor paid sporadically, if at all. A lawyer for many of the Poles demanded that the workers be paid or else he would serve Trump with a lien on the property. 

	...Worried the Poles would never get paid, Szabo put a second and third lien on the property. On Aug. 8, he called Macari and told him that because Trump had been paying the Poles, he was legally their employer. That meant that under the Fair Labor Standards Act, Trump couldn't sell any space in the tower until Szabo's clients were paid.

	Forty-five minutes later, Szabo testified, he received a call from a man who identified himself as a Mr. Barron from Trump's legal department, who said Trump was going to sue Szabo for $100 million for wrongful filing of mechanic's liens. At trial, Trump admitted that both he and a senior executive at the company had used the name Barron as a pseudonym. "I believe I occasionally used that name," said Trump.


(also: this explains everything??
https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP84B00049R001102790012-4.pdf
	"The KGB's Magical War for Peace"
	BY JOHN BARRON)


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/trump-threatens-government-shutdown-in-the-fall/
	Trump threatens government shutdown in the fall

	President Trump on Tuesday advocated for a "shutdown" in the fall, suggesting that it could force a rules change in the Senate to kill the filibuster on legislation. 

		The reason for the plan negotiated between the Republicans and Democrats is that we need 60 votes in the Senate which are not there! We either elect more Republican Senators in 2018 or change the rules now to 51%. Our country needs a good "shutdown" in September to fix mess!

		— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) May 2, 2017


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/03/21/us/politics/house-republicans-health-care-donald-trump.html
	Trump Warns House Republicans: Repeal Health Law or Lose Your Seats

	...The use of a political threat was a classic tactic for Mr. Trump, who keeps a running mental tally of his backers and detractors, and frequently boasts of his efforts to exact revenge from those who have crossed him.

	“We’re going to make sure to remember those who stood by us, and who stood by the word that they gave to their voters,” said Sean Spicer, the White House press secretary.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-obamacare-idUSKBN16R2P9
	Trump tries to rally support for healthcare bill

	...Republican Representative Walter Jones said Trump told lawmakers in the closed-door meeting at the Capitol that if the Republican bill does not pass, they would face "political problems." Jones said he thought Trump meant lawmakers could lose their seats.

	...While Trump predicted that Republicans could face challenges in primary contests ahead of the 2018 midterm elections if they do not gut Obamacare, there is also danger to them in doing so. If the Republican bill is passed, millions of voters might lose their healthcare coverage.


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/01/03/us/politics/for-donald-trump-lessons-from-a-brothers-suffering.html
	Then came the unveiling of Fred Sr.’s will, which Donald had helped draft. It divided the bulk of the inheritance, at least $20 million, among his children and their descendants, “other than my son Fred C. Trump Jr.”

	Freddy’s children sued, claiming that an earlier version of the will had entitled them to their father’s share of the estate, but that Donald and his siblings had used “undue influence” over their grandfather, who had dementia, to cut them out.

	A week later, Mr. Trump retaliated by withdrawing the medical benefits critical to his nephew’s infant child.

	“I was angry because they sued,” he explained during last week’s interview.


http://www.newyorker.com/news/john-cassidy/what-sort-of-man-is-donald-trump
	Trump and his siblings insisted that the will accurately reflected their father’s wishes. After the challenge, it didn’t take them long to retaliate. On March 30th, Fred III received a certified letter telling him that the medical benefits provided to his family by the Trump organization would end on May 1st. The letter prompted Fred III to return to court, this time in Nassau County, where a judge ordered the Trumps to restore the health coverage until the dispute was resolved. “I will stick to my guns,” Fred III told Evans. “I just think it was wrong. These are not warm and fuzzy people. They never even came to see William in the hospital. Our family puts the ‘fun’ in dysfunctional.” Fred III’s sister, Mary, told Evans, “William is my father’s grandson. He is as much a part of that family as anybody else. He desperately needs extra care.”

	Trump, for his part, was unapologetic about his actions. “Why should we give him medical coverage?” he told Evans. When she asked him if he thought he might come across as cold-hearted, given the baby’s medical condition, he said, “I can’t help that. It’s cold when someone sues my father. Had he come to see me, things could very possibly have been much different for them.”


Trump might be more calculated with (at least some of) his public statements than people give him credit for. He certainly gives himself a lot of credit. Trump sees connections between his public statements and world events that others don't:


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/week-transcript-donald-trump-vice-president-joe-biden/story?id=41020870
	 TRUMP: No, because you're not going to do that. NATO is going to be just fine. But NATO countries -- we have 28 countries -- many of them are taking advantage of us because they're not paying. So we're protecting these countries and they're not paying.

	And when people leave that last part in, everybody agrees with me.

	I'm all in favor of NATO. I said NATO is obsolete. I was asked a question by one of your competitors and I said NATO is obsolete, because it's not taking care of terror. You understand that. And it turned out I was right. A lot of people gave me credit for that.

	Then, three months ago, on the front page of "The Wall Street Journal," they said NATO to develop a terror division. And somebody who's supposed to be very extraordinary was put in charge of it.

	That was all because of me. So I was right about that. 


In particular, Trump understands the idea of making deals and threats over the media:


https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/exqkbp/remembering-john-barron-donald-trumps-spokesman-alter-ego-116
	But to John Barron, a "Trump spokesperson," that wasn't the case: Selling the property was Trump's idea the whole time, Barron told reporters, making it seem like the real estate mogul had never even wanted the damn castle in the first place, and was happy to see it go: "It sure is easier to get a large commission on a $105-million sale than to put up a building," Barron told New York at the time. Contrary to the public's perception, Trump actually left the bruising battle victorious—at least according to Trump himself. 

	...Over the course of nearly a decade, Trump was quick to dispatch John Barron to share his position on deals with media outlets: "We have no interest whatsoever in Lincoln West," Barron told the New York Times, in response to questions about a Manhattan property in 1984. 

	...To this day, the roots of the name "John Barron" are hazy, at best. Strangely enough, Trump named his third son Barron in 2006, long after he retired the fictional Barron. D'Antonio suggested the name may be a reference to Barron Hilton, the famous hotelier who Trump bought out in Atlantic City ("John Baron," of course, announced that deal). 


http://www.nytimes.com/1985/04/02/sports/trump-asks-help-in-paying-flutie.html
	TRUMP ASKS HELP IN PAYING FLUTIE
	April 2, 1985

	 Donald Trump, the owner of the New Jersey Generals, has asked the other United States Football League owners to provide ''partial reimbursement'' for Doug Flutie's multimillion dollar contract, a spokesman for Trump said yesterday.

	John Barron, a vice president of the Trump Organization, said Trump wanted the other owners to honor an agreement that he said had been reached earlier this year before Trump signed Flutie to a six-year contract worth $8.25 million.

	''When a guy goes out and spends more money than a player is worth, he expects to get partial reimbursement from the other owners,'' Barron said of Trump's signing of Flutie.

	He added, though, that had the owners not agreed to provide partial reimbursement, Trump ''probably would have'' signed Flutie anyway.''

	Trump, contacted last night, said: ''People wanted me to get him for the good of the league. I told them I would sign him, but at some point I wanted partial reimbursement for the cost.

	''From the standpoint of one team, it didn't make any economic sense to sign him. So I told them at some point I would ask for reimbursement.''

	He said he didn't have any specific figure in mind. ''I would want some percentage.'' 


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/week-transcript-donald-trump-vice-president-joe-biden/story?id=41020870
	QUESTION: (inaudible) will you defend the Baltic states if they're invaded by Russia? According to...

	TRUMP: I'll tell you what. Let me say it once again. Let me say it once again. OK? Many countries, including the NATO countries, some of which I think you have five that are current that have paid what they owe. And they can afford to pay this. It's not like they can't afford it.

	They just see us as a soft touch. You know, in business we say somebody's a soft touch. I don't know if I've been called a soft touch, but maybe I have sometimes. But in business, they call them a soft touch. They haven't paid us. OK? I want them to pay.

	Excuse me. I'm not saying anything. I don't talk. I'm not like Obama where he tells you everything he's going to do -- we're going to go and do this; we're going to go and do that. I don't talk. But they're going to pay.

	No, no -- yeah, it sends a signal. You know what signal it says? It says we're going to pay.

	You know, somebody said, "but we have treaties." I said that's right. And in the treaties, they're supposed to pay. They're going to pay. And they will pay. They will pay.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/863007411132649473
	James Comey better hope that there are no "tapes" of our conversations before he starts leaking to the press!
	5:26 AM - 12 May 2017 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/07/27/donald-trumps-falsehood-laden-press-conference-annotated/
	QUESTION: (inaudible) Putin (ph) say stay out? Why not say that?

	TRUMP: Why do I have to (ph) get involved with Putin? I have nothing to do with Putin. I've never spoken to him. I don't know anything about him other than he will respect me. He doesn't respect our president. And if it is Russia -- which it's probably not, nobody knows who it is -- but if it is Russia, it's really bad for a different reason, because it shows how little respect they have for our country, when they would hack into a major party and get everything. But it would be interesting to see -- I will tell you this -- Russia, if you're listening, I hope you're able to find the 30,000 e-mails that are missing. I think you will probably be rewarded mightily by our press. Let's see if that happens. That'll be next. Yes, sir...


Another thing that's important to understand is that it looks like there might be something very fishy in Donald Trump's tax returns:


https://apnews.com/38bd4abbb6d54133ac865c45a74acb43/secret-police-file-trump-sure-presidential-win-1996
	Secret police file: Trump sure of presidential win _ in 1996
	Jan. 12, 2017

	PRAGUE (AP) — Nearly 30 years ago, Donald Trump was confident he would win the U.S. presidential election — as an independent in 1996, according to recently uncovered files from Czechoslovakia’s Communist-era secret police.

	Czechoslovakia was the home nation of Trump’s first wife, Ivana, a model, athlete and businesswoman who became the mother of his three oldest children: Donald Jr., Ivanka and Eric.

	A year before the 1989 collapse of communism in many parts of Europe, details about Ivana Trump’s 1988 visit back to her homeland were recorded in a classified police report. The Oct. 22, 1988 report claimed that Trump refused to run for president in 1988 — despite alleged pressure to do so — because he felt, at 42, he was too young. But the secret report said he intended to run in the 1996 U.S. presidential race as an independent, when he would be 50.

	“Even though it looks like a utopia, D. TRUMP is confident he will succeed,” the police report said, based on information from an unspecified source who talked to Ivana Trump’s father, Milos Zelnicek, about her visit.

	It was unclear where the alleged “pressure” was coming from.

	The report is interesting because, in the United States, there was little public knowledge that Trump would consider a presidential run until a 1988 interview on “The Oprah Winfrey Show.”

	“I would never want to rule it out totally,” he said then.

	...Trump’s first wife was born Ivana Zelnickova in 1949 in the Czechoslovak city of Gottwaldov, the former city of Zlin that just had been renamed by the Communists, who took over the country in 1948. She married Trump, her second husband, in 1977. As she kept traveling home across the Iron Curtain on a regular basis, Ivana became a tempting target for the powerful, deeply feared Czechoslovak secret police agency known as the StB.

	...Svoboda said there’s no indication of a secret police file on Donald Trump. He didn’t travel to Czechoslovakia under communism, unlike his children, who used to spend summer vacations there.

	Due to such attention, the secret police reports contain detailed information about Ivana Trump’s trips to Czechoslovakia, including dates, telephone numbers she called, people she met, what they discussed and other details about her life with her husband. One of the reports claims the couple had a wedding deal in which Trump allegedly stated he wanted to have at least three children with her.

	The Associated Press visited the archive in Prague and obtained copies of all available documents about Ivana Trump. Some of the content has also been reported by Czech media and Germany’s Bild newspaper.

	The 1988 secret police report in particular suggested that Ivana Trump was nervous, “which is not common for her” after her father picked her up at Prague’s international airport after traveling in from Paris, where she visited a fashion house. Trump did not join her on this trip.

	Only after she and her father arrived in her hometown did Ivana Trump reveal that the U.S. ambassador to Prague at the time, Julian Martin Niemczyk, twice invited her to visit the embassy, which she declined to accept, according to a police source that met with her father on Oct. 11, 1988. Ivana Trump allegedly said she believed U.S. embassy staffers were following her. The fact that she was supposed to meet with a Czechoslovak security official during the trip added to her nervousness, the police file stated.

	She didn’t give any details about that meeting, the report said. But it added that she said “as a wife of D. TRUMP she receives constant attention because he is pressured to run for the office of U.S. president ... and any mistake she would make could have immense consequences for him.”

	Born in 1946, Trump planned to make history in 1996 as an independent candidate despite the fact that both the Democrats and the Republicans were allegedly wooing him to join them, the report said. A note at the end suggested that Ivana Trump’s trips home could be possibly used to reveal agents among the U.S. embassy’s staffers.

	...After Trump’s presidential win in November, Ivana Trump expressed interest in becoming the new U.S. ambassador to Prague — a possibility heartily welcomed by Czech President Milos Zeman.


http://www.businessinsider.com/czech-secret-agents-spied-on-donald-trump-he-is-tax-exempt-for-30-years-2016-12
	In June 1977, an informant with the cover name “Lubos” reported that Ivana had married a man in Austria in 1968 and had worked there at a petrol station. After that, the informant claimed, she emigrated to Canada and married the American Donald Trump.

	The spy writes that Trump’s company is absolutely safe, economically speaking, since it receives commissions from the state. One other juicy detail: “Another advantage is the personal relationship with the American President and the fact that he is completely tax-exempt for the next 30 years.” 


http://chipjacobs.com/articles/business-defence/the-full-employment-act-for-spies/
	The Full-Employment Act For Spies

	July 9, 1990

	...The same global changes that have accelerated prospects for world peace have spurred espionage opportunities between former adversaries.

	“The biggest problem is all the openness that comes from peace breaking out,” the FBI’s Lawler said. “One might say `We are all friends and don’t worry about spying,’ when in fact additional information allows them to spy even more. Added to that are the defense layoffs here. The Soviets could try to get to a disgruntled employee or somebody that needs money. 

	...“In Southern California, we have seen the Soviets use three espionage methods,” explained the FBI’s Lawler. “They collect information from trade shows and conventions and peruse annual reports and brochures. Sometimes they’ll wait for a greedy American to contact them, like the did with Boyce and Bell, or they’ll study organization charts and look for people with weakenesses or financial troubles. 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1992/11/29/trump-went-broke-but-stayed-on-top/e1685555-1de7-400c-99a8-9cd9c0bca9fe/
	TRUMP WENT BROKE, BUT STAYED ON TOP 

	November 29, 1992

	One day in 1990, as Donald Trump tells it, he and model Marla Maples were strolling along New York's Fifth Avenue when they passed a beggar.

	"You see that man? Right now he's worth $900 million more than me. ... Right now I'm worth minus $900 million," Trump told Maples.

	After a decade of profligate borrowing, Trump lacked the cash to make his loan payments. Although he owned hotels, skyscrapers, casinos and an airline, his debts exceeded the value of his properties by hundreds of millions of dollars.

	Trump's lenders could have forced him into personal bankruptcy and stripped him of almost everything. But that didn't happen.

	Instead, the bankers and investors to whom Trump owed money made a series of deals that left him wealthy. They let him keep some properties and took control of others, and they reduced Trump's personal debt by about $750 million, more than four-fifths of the total.

	They didn't do it out of charity. Rather, the lenders were reluctant to confront Trump in bankruptcy court, where they would face years of delay and massive legal expenses. In the end, lenders said, they feared they would recover less money in bankruptcy than they could get by striking compromises with Trump.


https://www.forbes.com/sites/beltway/2016/11/01/the-art-of-the-dodge-trumps-916-million-of-net-operating-losses/
	Today, The New York Times dissected the $916 million of Net Operating Losses (NOLs) that Donald Trump claimed on his 1995 tax return, which The Times disclosed last month.  Basically, Trump borrowed, and lost, a large amount of money in a series of failed ventures, mainly casinos. While the losses were mostly borne by his creditors, Trump took tax deductions for large amounts of interest, depreciation, and operating expenses.  As a result, he was potentially able to avoid paying federal income taxes for nearly two decades.

	We have no evidence that Trump broke any laws but, at a minimum, he seems to have aggressively stretched the law to avoid reporting taxable income of hundreds of millions of dollars from restructured loans.

	...In the early 1990s, Trump was in deep financial trouble and pressed his lenders to restructure his debt. But, based on documents filed in bankruptcy court, Trump did not report the income from restructuring his large public borrowings. He excluded the income despite reservations expressed by his own lawyers.  We do not know whether the IRS ever challenged his position.


http://www.oregonlive.com/today/index.ssf/2017/05/donald_trump_closely_tied_to_r.html
	Henry says that because of Trump's 1990s bankruptcies, which were mostly related to his involvement in the casino business, "none of the major New York banks would lend to him. Trump was pretty much unfinance-able."


http://www.nytimes.com/1995/10/25/nyregion/crowning-the-comeback-king.html
	Crowning the Comeback King

	October 25, 1995

 	Though there are still four years to go in the 90's, business and government leaders in New York honored Donald J. Trump yesterday for pulling off what they called "the comeback of the decade." 

 	Mr. Trump, the developer who came to epitomize opulent wealth during the 80's before tumbling into deep financial trouble, has managed to erase much of his debt and is moving ahead with major projects at a time other developers are idling. 

	... After the collapse of the real estate market of the 1980's, Mr. Trump's company was left holding some $8.8 billion in debt, causing his personal net worth to drop to a low of about $1 billion in the red by 1991.

	But since then, his fortunes have changed. He continues to pursue the trademark trophy-style projects he is known for, such as a hotel and condominium project on the southwest corner of Central Park that is expected to open by late 1996. 


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/week-transcript-donald-trump-vice-president-joe-biden/story?id=41020870
	 STEPHANOPOULOS: You said that...

	TRUMP: And we'll do better and yet we'll have a better relationship with Russia.

	And having a good relationship -- maybe. and having a good relationship with Russia is a good thing, not a bad thing.

	STEPHANOPOULOS: You said you have no investments in Russia.

	But do you owe any money to Russian individuals and institutions?

	TRUMP: No. Not.

	STEPHANOPOULOS: No?

	TRUMP: The primary thing I did what Russia -- I bought a house in Palm Beach at a bankruptcy. It was a bankrupt, you know, person. I bought it from the banks. I bought it for about $40 million. I sold it for $100 million to a Russian.
	
	That was probably five years ago. And that was primarily it.
	
	STEPHANOPOULOS: You partner now with...
	
	TRUMP: Now, well I sell...
	
	STEPHANOPOULOS: (INAUDIBLE) Grand...
	
	TRUMP: Will I sell -- many years ago. I don't think they're Russian. I think there were other people, but there were various partners.
	
	Will I sell condos to Russians on occasion?
	
	Probably.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	Peter Kiritchenko

	Kiritchenko, a Ukrainian businessman who owned two condominiums with his daughter at Trump International Beach Resort in Sunny Isles Beach, Fla., was named in a money-laundering scheme involving former Ukraine prime minister Pavlo Lazarenko.

	According to federal prosecutors in San Francisco in 2009, Kiritchenko helped Lazarenko launder millions of dollars obtained through extortion by purchasing luxury real estate in the United States and other countries.


http://www.nytimes.com/1998/06/29/nyregion/businessman-of-mystery-arts-patron-dogged-by-fbi-claim-of-russian-mob-ties.html
	Businessman of Mystery; Arts Patron Dogged by F.B.I. Claim of Russian Mob Ties

	...In an affidavit in support of a wiretap application in the Ivankov investigation in 1995, Lester R. McNulty, an F.B.I. agent in a squad formed to combat Russian organized crime, quoted German law enforcement officials and unnamed informers as stating that Mr. Komarov was laundering money for Mr. Ivankov and that Mr. Ivankov and two associates owned three-quarters of the Moscow Rolls-Royce dealership as a front to launder criminal proceeds.

	...After two visits to scout business opportunities in New York and Los Angeles in 1990, he said, he came for good in 1992, leaving his wife and their grown son, Roman, in Moscow. With a nest egg of $300,000 and a $150,000 advance payment against future clothing shipments to trading partners in Russia, he said, he bought a $400,000 co-op apartment on the 31st floor of the Trump Plaza on Third Avenue and 61st Street, and later bought a $450,000 apartment in Miami.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	...Viktor Khrapunov

	Khrapunov, a former Kazakhstan energy minister and mayor of Almaty, owns three units in the Trump SoHo through shell companies, according to lawyers for the Kazakh city who filed a 2014 federal lawsuit against him in Los Angeles. Almaty's lawyers alleged in the lawsuit that Khrapunov used real estate in California, New York, Europe and the Middle East to hide hundreds of millions of dollars looted by selling state-owned assets.


http://www.oregonlive.com/today/index.ssf/2013/04/feds_russian_mob_ran_celebrity.html
	Feds: Russian mob ran celebrity poker games; Trump Tower apartment raided, 34 charged

	...The money-laundering investigation led to arrests Tuesday in New York, Los Angeles, Miami and elsewhere around the country. There also were FBI raids at a $6 million apartment in Trump Tower on Fifth Avenue and a prestigious Madison Avenue art gallery owned by two of the defendants.

	...Prosecutors alleged proceeds were laundered through shell companies in Cyprus and in the United States by a criminal enterprise with strong ties to Russia and Ukraine.

	Assistant U.S. Attorney Harris Fischman told a U.S. magistrate judge in Manhattan that Vadim Trincher, 52, directed much of the international racketeering enterprise from his $5 million apartment at Trump Tower.

	"From his apartment he oversaw what must have been the world's largest sports book," Fischman said in a successful argument to have Trincher held for trial without bail. "He catered to millionaires and billionaires."

	Trincher's apartment is located directly below one owned by Donald Trump, authorities said.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	...Anatoly Golubchik, Vadim Trincher and Michael Sall

	Three Trump condo owners — Golubchik,  Trincher and Sall — were convicted in 2013 in federal court in New York of participating in an illegal high-stakes sports betting ring for a Russian-American organized crime group. The betting ring operated illegal gambling websites and catered almost exclusively to wealthy oligarchs from the former Soviet Union, according to prosecutors.

	Golubchik and Sall own Trump condos in Sunny Isles Beach. And professional poker player Trincher owns a condo in Trump Tower in New York City.

	Golubchik and Trincher were principal leaders of the enterprise, which included money laundering and extortion, prosecutors charged in the indictment.

	The godfather of the operation was identified as Alimzhan Tokhtakhounov, who federal prosecutors said was a Vor, “a powerful figure in former Soviet Union organized crime” who never left Russia because he was under indictment in the U.S. for his role in allegedly bribing officials at the 2002 Winter Olympics in Salt Lake City.

	Sall helped launder tens of millions of dollars from the gambling enterprise, prosecutors said when they announced that all three condo owners pleaded guilty to lesser charges. Sall pleaded guilty to interstate travel in aid of an unlawful activity — illegal gambling.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/05/22/politics/trump-taj-mahal/index.html
	Trump's Taj Mahal casino broke anti-money laundering rules in the 1990s

	It was the preferred spot for Russian mobsters to gamble

	...The Trump Taj Mahal casino broke anti-money laundering rules 106 times in its first year and a half of operation in the early 1990s, according to the IRS in a 1998 settlement agreement.

	It's a bit of forgotten history that's buried in federal records held by an investigative unit of the Treasury Department, records that congressional committees investigating Trump's ties to Russia have obtained access to, CNN has learned.

	The casino repeatedly failed to properly report gamblers who cashed out $10,000 or more in a single day, the government said. 


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	Money laundering was an issue for Trump's Taj Mahal Casino in Atlantic City, which was fined $10 million in 2015 for failing to report suspicious transactions. Federal rules are designed to protect the U.S. financial system from being used as a safe haven for dirty money and transnational crimes, Jennifer Shasky Calvery, then-director of the U.S. Treasury's Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCen), said at the time. It was the largest penalty the agency ever levied against a casino since reporting requirements began in 2003, according to The Wall Street Journal.

	"The Trump Organization admitted that it failed to implement and maintain an effective (anti-money laundering) program; failed to report suspicious transactions; failed to properly file required currency transaction reports; and failed to keep appropriate records as required by (the Bank Secrecy Act)," FinCen said in a statement.


http://money.howstuffworks.com/money-laundering2.htm
	How Money Laundering Works 

	Investing in legitimate businesses Launderers sometimes place dirty money in otherwise legitimate businesses to clean it. They may use large businesses like brokerage firms or casinos that deal in so much money it's easy for the dirty stuff to blend in

	...The variety of tools available to launderers makes this a difficult crime to stop, but authorities do catch the bad guys every now and then. 


https://taxcontroversy.foxrothschild.com/2017/02/crackdown-money-laundering-luxury-real-estate-sector-extended-another-six-months/
	The U.S. Treasury Department’s Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCEN) announced today that its aggressive efforts to combat money laundering in the luxury real estate market have been extended for an additional six months. Confirming his agency’s concerns about illicit funds flowing through the U.S. real estate industry, FinCEN Acting Director Jamal El-Hindi said today that this initiative is “producing valuable data that is assisting law enforcement and is serving to inform our future efforts to address money laundering in the real estate sector.” Today’s announcement means that temporary measures requiring U.S. title insurance companies to identify the natural persons behind shell companies used to pay all-cash to high-end residential real estate in six major metropolitan areas – known as “Geographic Targeting Orders” (GTOs) –remain in place for six more months.


http://www.cnbc.com/2017/05/10/russia-probe-senate-requests-documents-from-money-laundering-watchdog-agency.html
	Russia probe: Senate requests Trump documents from agency that monitors money laundering

	- The Senate Intelligence Committee has requested information about President Donald Trump and his top aides from a financial intelligence unit in the Treasury Department.

	- The agency, known as FinCEN, imposed a $10 million civil penalty on Trump Taj Mahal in 2015 for multiple violations of money-laundering laws.

	Wednesday, 10 May 2017 | 12:29 PM ET


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	...the Justice Department inquiry led by Mueller now has added flavors. The Post noted that the investigation also includes "suspicious financial activity" involving "Russian operatives." The New York Times was more specific in its account, saying that Mueller is looking at whether Trump associates laundered financial payoffs from Russian officials by channeling them through offshore accounts.

	Trump has repeatedly labeled Comey's and Mueller's investigations "witch hunts," and his lawyers have said that the last decade of his tax returns (which the president has declined to release) would show that he had no income or loans from Russian sources. In May, Trump told NBC that he has no property or investments in Russia. "I am not involved in Russia," he said.

	But that doesn't address national security and other problems that might arise for the president if Russia is involved in Trump, either through potentially compromising U.S. business relationships or through funds that flowed into his wallet years ago. In that context, a troubling history of Trump's dealings with Russians exists outside of Russia: in a dormant real-estate development firm, the Bayrock Group, which once operated just two floors beneath the president's own office in Trump Tower.

	Bayrock partnered with the future president and his two eldest children, Donald Jr. and Ivanka, on a series of real-estate deals between 2002 and about 2011, the most prominent being the troubled Trump Soho hotel and condominium in Manhattan.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	Felix Sater

	Sater spent a year in prison for stabbing a man in the face with a broken margarita glass at the Rio Grande restaurant and bar in New York in 1991.

	A federal criminal complaint in New York in 1998 accused Sater of money laundering and stock manipulation but was kept secret by prosecutors because the Russian immigrant was working as a CIA informant, according to numerous published reports.

	...Kriss, a former finance director for the developers, accused Sater, Lauria and Bayrock partners in a 2010 federal lawsuit of diverting millions of dollars to shell companies to avoid U.S. taxes. He also claimed they kept secret Sater's criminal past and his guilty plea to racketeering charges while “he was aiding the prosecution of his Mafia and Russian organized crime confederates.”

	...Sater's criminal past came to light in 2007. That year, Trump testified in a deposition in a defamation lawsuit that he didn't think Sater was a principal at Bayrock and that he was considering not doing business with him anymore. But Sater subsequently traveled to Russia carrying business cards identifying him as a senior adviser to Trump with a Trump Organization phone number and email address, according to photos of the card posted online by NBC, the BBC and other news organizations. In 2013, Trump said in another deposition that he didn't think Sater was connected to the Mafia, that Sater mostly dealt "with my company, not me" and that "if he was sitting in the room right now I really wouldn't know what he looked like."

	Sater told The Washington Post last year that he met one-on-one numerous times with Trump. He met alongside Donald Trump Jr. in Phoenix with local officials, and in New York he met repeatedly with Trump and his staff to talk about potential deals in Los Angeles, Ukraine and China, the Post reported.

	Trump's lawyer, in interviews with The New York Times and the Post, downplayed the relationship between the two men, saying Trump met and spoke with lots of people but his relationship was with Bayrock, not Sater. 

	...Alexander Mashkevich

	Mashkevich, a Kazakh mining billionaire, was another source of funds for the SoHo project, according Kriss’ lawsuit. Bayrock's investment pamphlet describes him in general as a source of Bayrock financing.

	Investigators in Belgium accused Mashkevich and two of his Kazakh business partners of money laundering and forgery connected to the $55 million in alleged bribes they received from a Belgian company in the mid-1990s, according to the Financial Times.

	Mashkevich and principal Bayrock partner Tevfik Arif were embroiled in a case in 2010, when Turkish police alleged prostitution and human trafficking after they raided a luxury yacht that Mashkevich chartered. After police boarded the Savarona — once owned by the founder of the modern Turkish state, Mustafa Kemal Atatürk — they arrested 10 wealthy men, including Arif, a former Kazakh official. They also found nine young women from Russia and Ukraine — two were 16 years old — and “a huge amount of contraceptives,” according to the Israeli newspaper Yedioth Ahronoth.


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	...Trump testified under oath in a 2007 deposition that Bayrock brought Russian investors to his Trump Tower office to discuss deals in Moscow, and said he was pondering investing there.

	"It's ridiculous that I wouldn't be investing in Russia," Trump said in that deposition. "Russia is one of the hottest places in the world for investment.

	One of Bayrock's principals was a career criminal named Felix Sater who had ties to Russian and American organized crime groups. Before linking up with the company and with Trump, he had worked as a mob informant for the U.S. government, fled to Moscow to avoid criminal charges while boasting of his KGB and Kremlin contacts there, and had gone to prison for slashing apart another man’s face with a broken cocktail glass.

	In a series of interviews and a lawsuit, a former Bayrock insider, Jody Kriss, claims that he eventually departed from the firm because he became convinced that Bayrock was actually a front for money laundering.

	...But Kriss's assertion that Bayrock was a criminal operation during the years it partnered with Trump has been deemed plausible enough to earn him a court victory: In December, a federal judge in New York said Kriss's lawsuit against Bayrock, which he first filed nine years ago, could proceed as a racketeering case.

	...When Sater emerged from prison 15 months later, he found his way back into trouble. With a group that included Lauria (who admits to having had ties to organized crime figures and grew up in New York as a close friend of a prominent Mafia boss), Sater opened an investment firm on the penthouse floor of 40 Wall Street


http://www.nytimes.com/1995/12/07/business/40-wall-street-is-sold-to-trump.html
	40 Wall Street Is Sold to Trump
	Published: December 7, 1995

	 The real estate developer Donald J. Trump completed his purchase of 40 Wall Street yesterday, buying the distinguished 70-story office building, across the street from the New York Stock Exchange, for a price estimated at less than $8 million.

	Mr. Trump in July had disclosed an agreement to buy the building, which contains 1.1 million square feet of space, from Kinson Properties of Hong Kong. Kinson paid $8 million for it in 1993.

	While representatives of Mr. Trump declined to disclose the price he had paid, published reports said it was less than $8 million.


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	From there, according to federal prosecutors, Sater and his team set about laundering money for the mob and fleecing about $40 million from unwitting and largely elderly investors, a number of whom were Holocaust survivors.

	By the time law enforcement authorities eventually caught on to the 40 Wall Street operation, Sater had fled to Russia. Lauria visited him there.

	Sater "was always hustling and scheming, and his contacts in Russia were the same kind of contacts he had in the United States," Lauria wrote in a 2003 memoir, "The Scorpion and the Frog." "The difference was that in Russia his crooked contacts were links between Russian organized crime, the Russian military, the KGB, and operatives who played both ways, or sometimes three ways."


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Russian_mafia#1992.E2.80.932000:_Growth_and_internationalization
	Russian mafia

	...1992–2000: Growth and internationalization

	When the USSR collapsed and a free market economy emerged, organized criminal groups began to take over Russia's economy, with many ex-KGB soldiers and veterans of the Afghan war offering their skills to the crime bosses.


http://articles.latimes.com/1988-02-16/news/mn-42975_1_russian-mafia
	'Russian Mafia' : KGB Steers Criminals to U.S. Careers
	February 16, 1988

	WASHINGTON — During his years of imprisonment, Soviet dissident Anatoly Sharansky chanced to meet a Russian criminal, a professional con artist who was pursuing a bizarre goal: Despite the rigors of prison life, he was diligently studying English in hopes of emigrating to America--to ply his trade as a swindler.

	America, he declared, was a land of easy pickings. Three of his friends were already there.

	"But how will you get there?" asked the astonished Sharansky, who knew first-hand how hard it is for Russians to get permission to leave their homeland. "You aren't Jewish."

	"The KGB will help me," the confident swindler replied. The Soviet secret police had helped his friends get to the United States by obtaining exit visas to Israel, he said, and he expected the same.

	Practical Reasons

	Sharansky's encounter, described in a recent interview, reflects growing evidence that the KGB has systematically helped criminals leave the Soviet Union. And U.S. officials say the Kremlin appears to have, from its point of view, two eminently practical reasons for doing so:

	--First, to be rid of the criminals--much as President Fidel Castro did when he opened Cuban jails during the Mariel boatlift a decade ago.

	--Second, to create a network in the West for their agents.


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	...About a year after the terrorist attacks of Sept. 11, 2001, Sater joined Bayrock, a company that marketed itself as a property developer and had opened Manhattan offices on the 24th floor of a well-known building at 725 Fifth Avenue: Trump Tower.

	In late 2002, Sater phoned Kriss and invited him to consult at Bayrock, bragging about a deep-pocketed investor, Tevfik Arif, who was partnering with him in search of bigger deals.

	Arif, born in Kazakhstan, was a former Soviet official who had relocated to Turkey to make his fortune. He ran several upscale, seaside hotels there that catered almost exclusively to Russians, according to Kriss, and he had also redeveloped a shopping center in Brooklyn. 

	...Bayrock was initially funded, in part, with a $10 million investment transferred to the firm by Arif's brother in Russia, who, according to Kriss's lawsuit, was able to tap into the cash reserves of a Kazakh chromium refinery. 

	...Bayrock never seemed to be short of money, however. According to Kriss’s lawsuit, the team running the little development firm in Trump Tower could locate funds "month after month, for two years, in fact more frequently, whenever Bayrock ran out of cash." If times got tight, Bayrock's owners would "magically show up with a wire from 'somewhere' just large enough to keep the company going."

	...It was Sater who initially developed the relationship with Trump, according to Kriss and court records from Trump's lawsuit against me. Sater had made the acquaintance of three Trump Organization executives who then introduced him to their boss. When the Bayrock team met Trump in 2002, the future president was enduring a long stretch in the financial wilderness, having narrowly escaped personal bankruptcy in the early 1990s.

	He eventually emerged from that mess as a pariah among big banks. He was also a determined survivor and tireless self-promoter and he parlayed those skills into recreating himself as a branding machine and golf course developer in the late 1990s and early 2000s.

	Kriss says that it was Arif and Sater who pitched the future president on the idea of launching an international chain of Trump-branded, mixed-use hotels and condominiums. And Bayrock got to Trump at a time when his “brand” could help get a little extra attention for a condo project, but didn’t amount to much more than that.

	“Trump was trying to build his brand and Bayrock was trying to market it,” Kriss recalls. “It wasn’t clear who needed each other more. This was before the show, remember.”

	The “show,” of course, was “The Apprentice.” It aired for the first time on Jan. 8, 2004, and became a sensation that vaulted Trump into reality TV stardom. In the real world, Trump's casinos were faltering. But on reality TV, Trump posed as a successful leader and dealmaker who embodied a certain kind of entrepreneurial flair and over-the-top billionairedom — an impression that stuck with tens of millions of TV viewers.

	The popularity of "The Apprentice" also gave the Bayrock-Trump partnership added zing.

	“That put Bayrock in a great position once the show debuted,” Kriss says. “The show did it for Trump, man. Nobody was interested in licensing his name before that.”

	The hook at Bayrock, for Trump, was an 18 percent equity stake in what became the Trump Soho hotel, a steady stream of management fees on all Bayrock projects and the ability to plaster his name on properties without having to invest a single dollar of his own.

	It’s not clear how carefully Trump vetted his Bayrock partners. But his lack of concern about their backgrounds — and the potential risk to his own reputation from dealing with them — was part of a pattern. In Atlantic City, he had partnered with men with organized crime ties. Later, he and his children struck deals in Brazil and Azerbaijan with partners who had murky backgrounds or unusual legal entanglements.


https://www.msn.com/en-us/money/markets/trump-dealt-with-a-series-of-people-who-had-mob-ties/ar-AAinc5y
	In 1981, a young and ambitious Donald Trump sat down with federal agents and discussed his calculation in entering the mob-infested world of Atlantic City casinos.

	He acknowledged it might tarnish the reputation his family built through traditional real-estate development in New York. He was aware a business partner in the New Jersey beach town knew people who might be unsavory. A Federal Bureau of Investigation agent advised Mr. Trump there were easier ways he could invest, said an FBI memo recounting the discussion.


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	Given Arif's halting English, it was Sater and Kriss who interacted most frequently with the Trump family—and Sater the most often with Trump himself. Kriss says that most of his own contacts were with the elder Trump children, Don Jr. and Ivanka, and included drafting contracts and occasional nights on the town.

	While Trump’s kids were involved in the back-and-forth with Bayrock, it was Trump himself who always had the final say.

	“Donald was always in charge,” says Kriss. “Donald had to agree to every term of every deal and had to sign off on everything. Nothing happened unless he said it was okay to do it. Even if Donald Jr., shook your hand on a deal, he came back downstairs to renegotiate if his father told him to.”

	The Trumps, Kriss says, saw Sater "frequently" and valued the relationship because “Felix demonstrated that he was loyal to them.” He says that at one point Sater was meeting with the future president in his Trump Tower office multiple times a week. Sater, according to a later court deposition, said that his business conversations with Trump in that office were wide-ranging and frequent — “on a constant basis."

	...The third and final major project Bayrock and Trump worked on together was their most high-profile effort, the 46-story Trump Soho hotel in lower Manhattan.

	Trump, Sater and Arif were all photographed together at a splashy launch party for the Trump Soho in 2007. Trump also pitched the Trump Soho on an episode of "The Apprentice," promising that "this brilliant, $370 million work of art will be an awe-inspiring masterpiece."

	"Have you previously associated with people you knew were members of organized crime?" one of my lawyers asked.

	"No, I haven't," Trump responded. "And it's hard to overly blame Bayrock. Things like that can happen. But I want to see what action Bayrock takes before I make a decision."

	..."I don't know him very well," Trump added, saying that he hadn't conversed very often with Sater. "If he were sitting in the room right now I really wouldn't know what he looked like."

	Trump also said that he didn't think that questions about Sater’s background meant that he should have ended his business partnership with him: “Somebody said that he is in the Mafia. What am I going to do?”


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	To expand his real estate developments over the years, Donald Trump, his company and partners repeatedly turned to wealthy Russians and oligarchs from former Soviet republics — several allegedly connected to organized crime, according to a USA TODAY review of court cases, government and legal documents and an interview with a former federal prosecutor.

	...Trump told reporters in February: "I have no dealings with Russia. I have no deals that could happen in Russia, because we’ve stayed away. And I have no loans with Russia. I have no loans with Russia at all."

	Yet in 2013, after Trump addressed potential investors in Moscow, he bragged to Real Estate Weekly about his access to Russia's rich and powerful. “I have a great relationship with many Russians, and almost all of the oligarchs were in the room,” Trump said, referring to Russians who made fortunes when former Soviet state enterprises were sold to private investors.

	...However, the deals, and the large number of Russians who have bought condos in Trump buildings, raise questions about the secrecy he has maintained around his real estate empire. Trump is the first president in 40 years to refuse to turn over his tax returns, which could shed light on his business dealings.


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/trump-lawyers-detail-immaterial-earnings-russian-sources/story?id=47372423
	President Trump’s tax returns for the past decade show little income from Russian sources and no debt owed to Russian lenders, his lawyers said. 

	 ..."Over the years, it is likely that [The Trump Organization] or third-party entities engaged in ordinary course sales of goods or services to Russians or Russian entities, such as sales / rentals / fees for condominiums, hotel rooms, rounds of golf, books or Trump-licensed products (e.g., ties, mattresses, wines, etc.) that could have produced income attributable to Russian sources,” according to the letter.

	"The amounts are immaterial," it added. 


Perhaps, the dealmaker Mr. Trump ran into financial trouble, but some friends in Russia's intelligence services found a "mutually beneficial" way to help him out. But indications of such a deal could appear in Donald Trump's tax returns. According to their records, the Soviets at least were interested in Mr. Trump and his tax returns (as well as being interested that Trump was being "pressured" to run for President in 1988).

But this is a problem, since if Trump's tax returns showed illicit activity, and someone else had their hands on them, he could be blackmailed with his tax returns.

It does look like someone else has a copy of Donald Trump's tax returns:


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/10/03/insider/the-time-i-found-donald-trumps-tax-records-in-my-mailbox.html
	The Time I Found Donald Trump’s Tax Records in My Mailbox

	By SUSANNE CRAIG OCT. 2, 2016 

	My colleagues make fun of my old-fashioned devotion to my mailbox.

	It’s about 30 feet from my desk — among all the other third-floor employees’ mailboxes — and I check it constantly, always hoping a tipster will have sent me some revealing letter or secret document.

	In Metro, we get a lot of junk mail and are regularly flooded with correspondence from prisoners in New York’s penitentiaries.

	But Friday, Sept. 23, was different.

	I walked to my mailbox and spotted a manila envelope, postmarked New York, NY, with a return address of The Trump Organization. My heart skipped a beat.
Continue reading the main story

	I have been on the hunt for Donald J. Trump’s tax returns. Mr. Trump, the Republican presidential nominee, has broken with decades-long tradition and refused to make his returns public. I have written extensively about his finances, but like almost every other reporter, I was eager to see his actual returns.

	The envelope looked legitimate. I opened it, anxiously, and was astonished.

	Inside were what appeared to be pages from Mr. Trump’s 1995 tax records, containing detailed figures that revealed his tax strategies. Almost immediately, I walked over to the desk of David Barstow — a three-time Pulitzer Prize-winning investigative reporter and my teammate in the quest for Mr. Trump’s tax returns.

	...People were fascinated not only by the story, but also with how we had gotten it. Why did the tipster send the documents to me, of all the reporters out there? Probably because I wrote an exhaustive examination of Mr. Trump’s $650 million of debt in August that drew millions of readers.

	The whole experience has left me eager to share a bit of advice with my fellow reporters: Check your mailboxes. Especially nowadays, when people are worried that anything sent by email will leave forensic fingerprints, “snail mail” is a great way to communicate with us anonymously.


We can only guess who:


http://www.mediaite.com/online/roger-stone-thinks-there-might-be-a-snitch-in-the-trump-campaign/
	Roger Stone Thinks There Might Be a Snitch in the Trump Campaign
	October 4th, 2016

	Trump ally Roger Stone suspects that the candidate’s campaign is out of joint, and someone in the tent might be responsible for leaking Trump’s 1995 tax returns.

	Speaking Tuesday on Boston Herald Radio, Stone, the former Trump campaign advisor, explained his theories about the provenance of the leaked returns, which ended up in mailboxes belonging to reporters at the New York Times and New York Daily News.

	Stone said the leak might have come from “Somebody who worked at The Trump Organization, perhaps. Or perhaps a former employee. But I would just be speculating.”


http://nypost.com/1999/11/10/trump-bares-naked-ambition-prez-hopeful-stuns-reform-party-with-raunchy-stern-talk/
	TRUMP BARES NAKED AMBITION – PREZ HOPEFUL STUNS REFORM PARTY WITH RAUNCHY STERN TALK
	November 10, 1999 

	...Trump’s political adviser, Roger Stone, said it’s unlikely Trump would release his tax returns – as many presidential candidates do in the spirit of full disclosure – to verify Trump’s worth.


http://www.mediaite.com/online/roger-stone-thinks-there-might-be-a-snitch-in-the-trump-campaign/
	It should be noted that Stone is an enthusiastic advocate of exposing stolen documents when they come from the other side. He trumpeted the much hyped Wikileaks revelations


https://twitter.com/wikileaks/status/823212055322853382
	Trump Counselor Kellyanne Conway stated today that Trump will not release his tax returns. Send them to: https://wikileaks.org/#submit  so we can.
	8:53 AM - 22 Jan 2017 


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/10/politics/roger-stone-wikileaks-russia/index.html
	As Russia probe looms, Roger Stone touts relationship to WikiLeaks

	As questions swirl around possible connections to President Donald Trump's campaign and Russia, his friend, Roger Stone, has retraced the line between himself and WikiLeaks.

	Over the weekend, the longtime Trump confidant tweeted that he had a "back channel" to WikiLeaks during the presidential campaign -- only to later delete it.

	...Last weekend's Twitter flare-up raised questions anew about Stone, who worked for the Trump campaign in 2015 and claims to have a connection to WikiLeaks and its leader, Julian Assange. 

	..."I do have a back-channel communication with Assange because we have a good mutual friend," he said in the October interview.

	..."I have no Russian clients. I have no Russian contacts, I have no Russian money. I have no Russian influences. I do like Russian vodka," Stone told Time in an interview published early February.

	Stone has known Trump for decades, dating back to when he said the two connected through attorney Roy Cohn -- who gained notoriety as an ally of Sen. Joseph McCarthy -- before establishing a business relationship. He was initially part of Trump's campaign before the two split ways amid disputed circumstances in August 2015. Later on in the campaign, Stone went on to start a super PAC in support of Trump as well as keep a line of communication open.


https://www.mediamatters.org/video/2017/03/14/cbs-evening-news-trump-ally-roger-stone-contacted-russian-hacker-least-16-times-during-2016-campaign/215681
	CBS Evening News: Trump Ally Roger Stone Contacted Russian Hacker "At Least 16 Times During The 2016 Campaign"

	Roger Stone: "That's Called Networking"


http://www.rawstory.com/2017/05/alex-jones-blames-leather-daddy-hr-mcmaster-for-russia-leaks-in-bizarre-shaved-heads-rant/
	Conspiracy theorist Alex Jones and right-wing gadfly Roger Stone suggested national security adviser H.R. McMaster was a gay “leather daddy” during a bizarre InfoWars discussion.

	The pair blamed McMaster and other national security officials for damaging leaks on President Donald Trump blurting out highly classified intelligence to senior Russian officials, and they suggested the White House was under attack by Obama and Clinton loyalists.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/03/21/us/roger-stone-donald-trump-russia.html
	Roger Stone, the ‘Trickster’ on Trump’s Side, Is Under F.B.I. Scrutiny

	By MAGGIE HABERMAN MARCH 21, 2017 

	In President Trump’s oft-changing world order, Roger J. Stone Jr., the onetime political consultant and full-time provocateur, has been one of the few constants — a loyalist and self-proclaimed “dirty trickster” who nurtured the dream of a presidential run by the developer-turned-television-star for 30 years.

	...Mr. Stone, 64, is the best known of the Trump associates under scrutiny as part of an F.B.I. investigation into Russian interference in the election.


It really looks like Russia's intelligence services have a copy of Donald Trump's tax returns. That means they can blackmail him with his tax returns.

So, we know three important things about Mr. Trump:

1. He watches the media obsessively and knows how to communicate and "make deals" via the media
2. He knows how blackmail and coercion works (having essentially used blackmail before himself)
3. The Russians have his fishy tax returns


This might explain a few things in the above timeline, like this:


http://www.hollywoodreporter.com/news/tom-arnold-claims-journalists-are-looking-supposed-trump-apprentice-tapes-959302
	12:14 PM PST 12/26/2016 

	...Then the Russian hack happened. That and him lying about releasing his taxes. ...You have to see his taxes. ...Terrible career move but I believe if Russia has something they can blackmail our president


http://www.cnbc.com/2016/12/28/us-to-announce-new-sanctions-against-russia-in-response-to-election-hacking.html
	US to announce new sanctions against Russia in response to election hacking
	Wednesday, 28 Dec 2016 4:06 PM ET

	In response to Graham's statements, a spokeswoman for Russia's Foreign Ministry promised retaliation in the event of new economic sanctions.

	"To be honest, we are tired of lie about the 'Russian hackers', which is being poured down in the United States from the very top," Russia Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Maria Zakharova said.

	She also called reports of possible new sanctions a "provocation directed by the White House".


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-russia-idUSKBN14I05A?il=0
	Wed Dec 28, 2016 
	Asked about Russia sanctions, Trump says 'we ought to get on with our lives'

	...Asked by reporters if the United States should sanction Russia, Trump replied: "I think we ought to get on with our lives. I think that computers have complicated lives very greatly. The whole age of computer has made it where nobody knows exactly what's going on."

	...Trump said he was not familiar with remarks earlier on Wednesday by Republican Senator Lindsey Graham, who said Russia and President Vladimir Putin should expect tough sanctions for the cyber attacks.


Or this:


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/putin-hopes-trump-will-lift-sanctions-says-no-need-to-rush-retaliation/article/2610560
	Putin hopes Trump will lift sanctions, says 'no need to rush' retaliation
	Dec 29, 2016, 4:26 PM 

	..."Considering the current transition period in Washington, we still expect that we'll be able to get rid of such clumsy actions," Putin's spokesman Dmitry Peskov said, per RT, a Kremlin-funded media outlet.

	Peskov suggested that Putin might delay Russian payback over the sanctions until after Trump takes office, saying "there's no need to rush" the retaliation. "As it said before, we consider this decision and these sanctions unjustified and illegal under international law," Peskov said.


https://twitter.com/TomArnold/status/814653874862571520
	Hey gamers here's a challenge. Trumps taxes are behind this door. Let's Make America Great Again

	6:06 PM - 29 Dec 2016


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/12/trump-russian-cyberattacks-intelligence-233045
	Trump: It's time 'to move on' from claims of Russian interference in election

	12/29/2016 06:14 PM EST

	...“It's time for our country to move on to bigger and better things,” he said in a statement. “Nevertheless, in the interest of our country and its great people, I will meet with leaders of the intelligence community next week in order to be updated on the facts of this situation.”


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-russia-idUSKBN14X1YX
	Trump adviser had five calls with Russian envoy on day of sanctions: sources

 	Michael Flynn, President-elect Donald Trump's choice for national security adviser, held five phone calls with Russia's ambassador to Washington on the day the United States retaliated for Moscow's interference in the U.S. presidential election, three sources familiar with the matter said.

	The calls occurred between the time the Russian embassy was told about U.S. sanctions and the announcement by Russian President Vladimir Putin that he had decided against reprisals, said the sources. 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/814919370711461890?lang=en
	Great move on delay (by V. Putin) - I always knew he was very smart!
	11:41 AM - 30 Dec 2016 


Or this:


http://www.newsweek.com/russias-lavrov-warns-master-deal-trump-putin-can-negotiate-too-548513
	1/26/17 at 11:03 AM 

	Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov has told parliament in his home country that although Donald Trump boasts of being a “master of the deal,” Russia’s own leader is also no slouch in getting the best results for Russia.

	Lavrov spoke in the lower house of parliament Thursday, referring to Donald Trump’s speech at his presidential inauguration last week, when he declared his prime policy would be “America first.” While Putin and Trump have voiced a willingness to improve their countries’ relationship, they are yet to settle on a date for a meeting.


http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/316382-petition-demanding-trumps-tax-returns-gets-record-number-of
	Petition for Trump’s tax returns gets record number of signatures
	By Max Greenwood - 01/26/17 04:59 PM EST 


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/white-house/trump-putin-speak-phone-weekend-n712851
	Jan 27 2017, 12:36 am ET
	Trump and Putin to Speak by Phone This Weekend

 	President Donald Trump will speak with Russian President Vladimir Putin by phone this weekend, an administration official familiar with the planning said.


Or this:


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/trump-talks-with-putin-merkel-foreign-leaders-phone-calls/
	Last Updated Jan 28, 2017 8:58 PM EST

	In a Kremlin statement, Russia also mentioned that the leaders spoke about plans to organize a summit for the two. The White House did not confirm the information in their own readout of the call. 

	Vice President Mike Pence, chief of staff Reince Priebus, chief White House strategist Steve Bannon and National Security Adviser Michael Flynn were in the Oval Office during the call. 


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/01/30/russia-putin-trump-could-meet-before-july/97234574/
	Russia: Putin, Trump could meet before July

	Published 8:05 a.m. ET Jan. 30, 2017

	Russian President Vladimir Putin could meet face-to-face with President Trump before July, after the two leaders held an hour-long phone conversation over the weekend, a presidential spokesman said.

	Dmitry Peskov, Putin’s spokesman, told Russian news agency TASS that the two could “quite likely” meet before a Group of 20 summit in Hamburg, Germany on July 7-8. He said he hoped the leaders’ aides will "waste no time" in preparing.


http://www.cnbc.com/2017/07/04/putin-trump-to-meet-in-hamburg-on-july-7-says-russian-news-agency.html
	Tuesday, 4 Jul 2017 | 6:56 AM ET

	A meeting between Russian President Vladimir Putin and his U.S. counterpart Donald Trump will take place on the sidelines of a G-20 summit in Hamburg on July 7, Russian news agencies quoted Kremlin foreign policy aide Yuri Ushakov as saying on Tuesday.

	"(It's been) agreed for the seventh," RIA news agency quoted him as saying. 


Or this:


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/putin-spokesman-unconditional-support-for-assad-not-possible/
 	April 6, 2017, 4:33 PM
	Putin spokesman: Russian support for Assad has its limits

	President Vladimir Putin’s spokesman Dmitry Peskov said in an interview that “unconditional support is not possible in this current world.” 

	But he added that “it is not correct to say that Moscow can convince Mr. Assad to do whatever is wanted in Moscow. This is totally wrong.”


https://www.whitehouse.gov/the-press-office/2017/04/06/statement-president-trump-syria
	Statement by President Trump on Syria

	April 06, 2017

	Tonight, I ordered a targeted military strike on the airfield in Syria from where the chemical attack was launched.  It is in this vital national security interest of the United States to prevent and deter the spread and use of deadly chemical weapons.

	...Goodnight.  And God bless America and the entire world.  Thank you.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-mideast-crisis-syria-idUSKBN1782S0
	Sat Apr 8, 2017 | 9:06am EDT
	Russia warns of serious consequences from U.S. strike in Syria

	Russia warned on Friday that U.S. cruise missile strikes on a Syrian air base could have "extremely serious" consequences, as President Donald Trump's first major foray into a foreign conflict opened up a rift between Moscow and Washington.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/10/world/middleeast/syria-trump-assad.html
	On Trump’s Syria Strategy, One Voice Is Missing: Trump’s
	APRIL 10, 2017

	WASHINGTON — In the days since President Trump ordered a cruise missile strike against Syria in retaliation for a chemical attack on civilians, his administration has spoken with multiple voices as it seeks to explain its evolving policy. But one voice has not been heard from: that of Mr. Trump himself.


http://thehill.com/policy/international/middle-east-north-africa/328165-us-determines-russia-knew-of-chemical-weapons
	WH disputes report Russia knew of chemical attack in Syria beforehand
	By Mallory Shelbourne - 04/10/17 04:26 PM EDT 

	The Associated Press reported Monday that the United States determined that Russia knew about last week’s chemical attack on a town in Syria beforehand.

	But in a Monday evening statement, a senior administration official disputed that report. 


Communicating (vague) threats via media is a way to blackmail someone with plausibly deniability. Consider that if Putin tried to blackmail Trump over, say, a "secret back channel" directly connecting the two, discovery of the backchannel would raise suspicion and spoil the blackmail scheme.

With that in mind, it's worth revisiting the previously mentioned Russian propaganda narrative accusing the Washington post of being a CIA front (with Jeff Bezos involved somehow). Trump has a habit of retweeting Russian fake news stories, and it looks like he actually believes some of them. In particular, it looks like he believes the one about U.S. intelligence agencies having a special relationship with the Washington Post:


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/339801-trump-rips-amazonwashingtonpost-as-fake-news
	President Trump on Wednesday attacked The Washington Post and its owner, Amazon founder Jeff Bezos, for its coverage of him and his administration. 

	“The #AmazonWashingtonPost, sometimes referred to as the guardian of Amazon not paying internet taxes (which they should) is FAKE NEWS!” the president tweeted Wednesday morning. 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/673881733415178240
	The @washingtonpost, which loses a fortune, is owned by @JeffBezos for purposes of keeping taxes down at his no profit company, @amazon.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/673884271954776064
	The @washingtonpost loses   money (a deduction) and gives owner @JeffBezos power to screw public on low taxation of @Amazon! Big tax shelter
	7:18 AM - 7 Dec 2015 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/673885376742825984
	If @amazon ever had to pay fair taxes, its stock would crash and it would crumble like a paper bag. The @washingtonpost scam is saving it!
	7:22 AM - 7 Dec 2015 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/831840306161123328
	Information is being illegally given to the failing @nytimes & @washingtonpost by the intelligence community (NSA and FBI?).Just like Russia
	4:19 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


This might explain some of the apparent back and forth between Trump and WaPo (and NY Times):


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/national-security-adviser-flynn-discussed-sanctions-with-russian-ambassador-despite-denials-officials-say/2017/02/09/f85b29d6-ee11-11e6-b4ff-ac2cf509efe5_story.html
 	National security adviser Flynn discussed sanctions with Russian ambassador, despite denials, officials say 

	By Greg Miller, Adam Entous and Ellen Nakashima February 9


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/justice-department-warned-white-house-that-flynn-could-be-vulnerable-to-russian-blackmail-officials-say/2017/02/13/fc5dab88-f228-11e6-8d72-263470bf0401_story.html
	Justice Department warned White House that Flynn could be vulnerable to Russian blackmail, officials say 

	By Adam Entous, Ellen Nakashima and Philip Rucker February 13


https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2017/02/13/us/politics/document-Michael-Flynn-Resignation-Letter.html
	Michael Flynn’s Resignation Letter

	February 13


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/15/us/politics/trump-condemns-leaks-to-news-media-in-a-twitter-flurry.html
	Flynn Was Brought Down by Illegal Leaks to News Media, Trump Says
	FEB. 15, 2017

	President Trump lashed out at the nation’s intelligence agencies again on Wednesday, saying that his former national security adviser, Michael T. Flynn, was brought down by illegal leaks to the news media, on a day of new disclosures about the Trump camp’s dealings with Russia during and after the presidential campaign.

	“From intelligence, papers are being leaked, things are being leaked,” Mr. Trump said at a White House news conference with Benjamin Netanyahu, the prime minister of Israel. “It’s a criminal action, criminal act, and it’s been going on for a long time before me, but now it’s really going on. And people are trying to cover up for a terrible loss that the Democrats had under Hillary Clinton.”


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/15/us/politics/trump-intelligence-agencies-stephen-feinberg.html
	White House Plans to Have Trump Ally Review Intelligence Agencies

	By JAMES RISEN and MATTHEW ROSENBERGFEB. 15, 2017 

	WASHINGTON — President Trump plans to assign a New York billionaire to lead a broad review of American intelligence agencies, according to administration officials, an effort that members of the intelligence community fear could curtail their independence and reduce the flow of information that contradicts the president’s worldview.

	The possible role for Stephen A. Feinberg, a co-founder of Cerberus Capital Management, has met fierce resistance among intelligence officials already on edge 


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	FEBRUARY 16, 2017, 2:55 PM

	QUESTION: Can we ask what you're going to do and also, we've heard about a -- a review of the intelligence community headed up by Steven Feinberg, what can you tell us about that?

	TRUMP: Well, first of all about that, we now have Dan Coats, hopefully soon, Mike Pompeo and James Comey and they're in position so I hope that we'll be able to straighten that out without using anybody else.

	...QUESTION: Thank you. I was just hoping that we could get a yes or no answer on one of these questions involving Russia. Can you say whether you are aware that anyone who advised your campaign had contacts with Russia during the course of the election?

	TRUMP: Well I told you, Gen. Flynn obviously was dealing. So that's one person. But he was dealing, as he should have been.

	QUESTION: During the election?

	TRUMP: No. Nobody that I know of. Nobody...

	QUESTION: So you're not aware of any contact during the course..

	TRUMP: Look, look, look...

	QUESTION: ... of the election?

	TRUMP: How many times do I have to answer this question?

	QUESTION: Can you just say yes or no?

	TRUMP: Russia is a ruse.

	I know you have to get up and ask a question. It's so important.

	Russia is a ruse. I have nothing to do with Russia.

	...TRUMP: Mike Flynn is a fine person, and I asked for his resignation. He respectfully gave it. He is a man who there was a certain amount of information given to Vice President Pence, who is with us today. And I was not happy with the way that information was given.

	He didn't have to do that, because what he did wasn't wrong -- what he did in terms of the information he saw.


https://web.archive.org/web/20170216214656/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/flynn-in-fbi-interview-denied-discussing-sanctions-with-russian-ambassador/2017/02/16/e3e1e16a-f3d5-11e6-8d72-263470bf0401_story.html
	Flynn in FBI interview denied discussing sanctions with Russian ambassador 

	By Sari Horwitz and Adam Entous February 16 at 4:37 PM


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/832708293516632065
	The FAKE NEWS media (failing @nytimes, @NBCNews, @ABC, @CBS, @CNN) is not my enemy, it is the enemy of the American People!
	1:48 PM - 17 Feb 2017 


But what's really interesting is how some of WaPo's and NYT's stories line-up with Trump's meetings with Comey. For instance, after the above leaks brought down Flynn, Trump singled-out Comey in the Oval Office to complain about leaks and tell him "I hope you can see your way to letting Flynn go," as if Trump thought Comey himself was somehow involved with the leaks, or could control them.

There is some evidence that Trump actually thinks Comey was behind the leaks. Trump accuses Comey of being a "leaker" after firing him, for one:


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/864452996129853444
	I have been asking Director Comey & others, from the beginning of my administration, to find the LEAKERS in the intelligence community.....
	5:10 AM - 16 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873120139222306817
	Despite so many false statements and lies, total and complete vindication...and WOW, Comey is a leaker!
	3:10 AM - 9 Jun 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873879934040780801
	I believe the James Comey leaks will be far more prevalent than anyone ever thought possible. Totally illegal? Very 'cowardly!'
	5:29 AM - 11 Jun 2017 


And this curious article claims to have discovered James Comey's twitter account, which follows, among other people, some of the same WaPo authors behind the Russia leaks:


http://gizmodo.com/this-is-almost-certainly-james-comey-s-twitter-account-1793843641
	ProjectExile7 follows 27 other accounts, the majority of which are either reporters, news outlets, or official government and law enforcement accounts. The New York Times’ Adam Goldman and David Sanger and the Washington Post’s Ellen Nakashima and David Ignatius, all of whom have been aggressively covering the FBI investigation into Trump’s contacts with Russian agents, made the list, as did Wittes and former Bush Administration colleague Jack Goldsmith. Donald Trump is on there


It's unclear if Trump ever saw this twitter account, but he might be unsophisticated enough to actually believe it actually belongs to James Comey (Comey "friend" Benjamin Wittes sort-of backs it up). Either way, it does look like Trump thinks Comey is somehow associated with these leaks.

The leaks leading up to the January 27th dinner between Trump and Comey tell a lot. First, several potentially relevant events lead up to the dinner:

- Trump has blamed the leak of the dossier on the IC, and appears to think U.S. intelligence agencies are leaking information on the Russia investigation out of hostility toward him.

- The Trump administration denied coordinating Flynn's contacts with the Russian ambassador and claimed they were innocuous, but the circumstances surrounding the calls hint at criminality or wrongdoing by Trump.

- Comey assured Trump he was not under investigation and refused to confirm the Russia investigation, and Trump has acted friendly toward Comey after others called for his resignation.

- According to Comey, Trump had asked Comey to stay on during the January 6th briefing, before the calls for Comey to resign. Comey also assured Trump he was not under investigation during this briefing.

- Trump has not yet said publicly he intends to keep Comey on as FBI director. He told 60 minutes he wanted to speak with Comey after the election first.

- Meanwhile, Trump has been briefed that Wikileaks is affiliated with Russian intelligence, and Wikileaks has threatened to release Trump's tax returns.


One mystery about Trump's and Comey's accounts of the Jan 27 dinner is: why can't they agree on who initiated it?


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	TRUMP: I had a dinner with him. He wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on. We had a very nice dinner at the White House...

	HOLT: He -- he asked...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: ...very early on. That dinner was arranged. I think he asked for the dinner.

	And he wanted to stay on as the FBI head. And I said I'll, you know, consider. We'll see what happens.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	KING: With regard to the — several of these conversations, in his interview with Lester Holt on NBC, the president said, I had dinner with him. He wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on. Is this an accurate statement?

	COMEY: No, sir.

	KING: Did you in any way initiate that dinner?

	COMEY: No. He called me at my desk at lunchtime and asked me, was I free for dinner that night. Called himself. Said, can you come over for dinner tonight? I said, yes, sir. He said, will 6:00 work? I think 6:00 first. Then he said, I was going to invite your whole family but we'll do it next time. Is that a good time? I said, sir, whatever works for you. He said, how about 6:30? I said, whatever works for you, sir. Then I hung up and had to call my wife and break a date with her. I was supposed to take her to dinner that night.

	KING: One of the all-time great excuses for breaking a date.

	COMEY: Yeah. In retrospect, I love spending time with my wife and I wish I would have been there that night. 


Trump says Comey asked him for the dinner because he "wanted to stay on as the FIB head." Comey says Trump asked him for the dinner and he really didn't want to go.

One explanation lies in the media reports in WaPo and NYT starting a few days earlier:


https://www.wsj.com/articles/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-to-russia-1485134942
https://www.dowjones.com/scoops/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-russia/
	U.S. Eyes Michael Flynn’s Links to Russia
	By Carol E. Lee, Devlin Barrett and Shane Harris
	Jan. 22, 2017 8:29 p.m. ET 

	Counterintelligence agents have investigated communications by President Trump’s national security adviser, including phone calls to Russian ambassador in late December

	Michael Flynn is the first person inside the White House under Mr. Trump whose communications are known to have faced scrutiny as part of investigations by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Central Intelligence Agency, National Security Agency and Treasury Department to determine the extent of Russian government contacts with people close to Mr. Trump.

	It isn’t clear when the counterintelligence inquiry began, whether it produced any incriminating evidence or if it is continuing. Mr. Flynn, a retired general who became national security adviser with Mr. Trump’s inauguration, plays a key role in setting U.S. policy toward Russia.

	The counterintelligence inquiry aimed to determine the nature of Mr. Flynn’s contact with Russian officials and whether such contacts may have violated laws, people familiar with the matter said.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-reviewed-flynns-calls-with-russian-ambassador-but-found-nothing-illicit/2017/01/23/aa83879a-e1ae-11e6-a547-5fb9411d332c_story.html
 	FBI reviewed Flynn’s calls with Russian ambassador but found nothing illicit 

	By Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller January 23

	The FBI in late December reviewed intercepts of communications between the Russian ambassador to the United States and retired Lt. Gen. Michael T. Flynn — national security adviser to then-President-elect Trump — but has not found any evidence of wrongdoing or illicit ties to the Russian government, U.S. officials said. 

	...Although Flynn’s contacts with Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak were listened to, Flynn himself is not the active target of an investigation, U.S. officials said. The Wall Street Journal reported Sunday that U.S. counterintelligence agents had investigated the communications between Flynn and Kislyak.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/24/us/politics/trump-comey-fbi-director-.html
	Trump Is Said to Keep James Comey as F.B.I. Director

	By MICHAEL S. SCHMIDT and ADAM GOLDMAN JAN. 24, 2017 

	WASHINGTON — The F.B.I. director, James B. Comey, told his top agents from around the country that he had been asked by President Trump to stay on the job running the federal government’s top law enforcement agency, according to people familiar with the matter.

	...When Mr. Comey and the president-elect met at Trump Tower for the first time this month for an intelligence briefing, Mr. Trump told the F.B.I. director that he hoped he would remain in his position, according to people briefed on the matter. And Mr. Trump’s aides have made it clear to Mr. Comey that the president does not plan to ask him to leave, these people said.


https://web.archive.org/web/20170124155639/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-director-james-comey-to-say-on-in-trump-administration/2017/01/24/033d3bc8-e246-11e6-a453-19ec4b3d09ba_story.html?utm_term=.13d7738addb2
 	FBI Director James Comey to stay on in Trump administration

	By Matt Zapotosky, Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller January 24 at 10:21 AM 

	...The news that Comey would stay in place became public Tuesday, some time after he began informing senior FBI officials around the country that he had been asked to continue.

	Under normal circumstances, the revelation might have been unsurprising: Comey is less than four years into a 10-year term, and it is extremely rare for a president to remove an FBI director. But President Trump had notably declined to say whether he would keep the FBI director, telling “60 Minutes” in an interview after his election that he wanted to meet with Comey first. 


Assuming Trump is watching the media like a hawk as usual, Trump learns the following leading up to the dinner:


- Carol Lee, Devlin Barrett, and Shane Harris of The Wall Street Journal report on Jan 22 that multiple U.S. intelligence agencies are investigating Flynn's contacts with the Russian ambassador.

- Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller of The Washington Post report on Jan 23 that the FBI found no wronging and Flynn is not under investigation.

- Matt Zapotosky, Ellen Nakashima, and Greg Miller of The Washington Post and Adam Goldman of the NY Times report on Jan 24 that Trump intends to keep Comey as FBI Director.


But Trump hasn't publicly confirmed he wants Comey as FBI director yet, and Comey has recently faced calls for his resignation. On top of that, Trump has reasons to believe the WSJ report that Flynn is under investigation is legitimate: for one, he probably directed Flynn's calls and knows their contents. And  Trump has said the Wall Street Journal and "financial media" are "much better, much more honest" than "the political media," and the Trump campaign had previously revoked The Washington Post's press credentials for "incredibly inaccurate coverage."

For a man who sees patterns and deals being made over the media (and perhaps fancies himself a mob boss), it wouldn't be too hard for Trump to interpret these Washington Post reports as an offer for a deal by Comey--essentially, keep me as FBI director and the investigation into you goes away. Trump would notice the conspicuous disconnected between the WaPo report and the WSJ report, and would certainly notice if the Washington Post learned that he accepted Comey as FBI director before he did. Trump might also have picked up that Flynn had been interviewed by the FBI within a few hours of Comey's January 24th "job offer."

Yates perhaps throws a wrench in this deal. Two days after the supposed Comey "offer," Yates warns Trump that Flynn is vulnerable to blackmail, then invites him to review the evidence underlying his conduct. But this would surely inconvenience any supposed deal to make Flynn's investigation "disappear," as the WaPo article enticed, as Trump would have a hard time pretending the investigation didn't exist with knowledge of both the investigation and the underlying evidence. Trump will later claim he was "surprised" by Yates warning, having "read various articles" that Flynn was "just doing his job."

Trump goes on to hastily create an alibi to fire Yates, his conspicuously unconstitutional travel ban, surprising Yates and everybody else with its roll-out and causing global chaos. Trump asks Comey if he's not under investigation then asks for his loyalty. Comey tells Trump he's not under investigation, and he'll get "honest loyalty." Comey keeps his job.





Trump will also claim he was "surprised" by Yates warnings about Flynn, as he "read various articles" saying Flynn "was just doing his job," indicating an awareness of the Jan 23 Washington Post report (the source for the "Flynn cleared of wrongdoing" story). Trump is also aware of the Jan 22 Wall Street Journal report--the WaPo report references it and the White House had commented on it. It is unclear if Trump was aware of the Jan 23rd CNN report independently corroborating the Jan 22 WSJ report.

Did Trump honestly believe the WaPo report over the WSJ report that Flynn "did nothing wrong?" It is hard to believe--Trump has said the Wall Street Journal and "financial media" are "much better, much more honest" than "the political media," and the Trump campaign had previously revoked The Washington Post's press credentials for "incredibly inaccurate coverage." On top of this, Flynn was interviewed by the FBI at the White House on the 24th  (and so adding FBI agents to the WH visitor logs) and on the 26th, Yates told the White House that Flynn was under investigation and the DOJ had evidence of misconduct.

After learning about FLynn's conduct, it looks like Trump was worried about a criminal investigation: on the 27th, McGahn came back to the DOJ with requests to see the underlying evidence and to discuss "the applicability of certain criminal statues" and "the likelihood that the Department of Justice would pursue a criminal case." In particular, it looks like Trump was worried about a criminal investigation of himself: 



at their Jan 26th meeting, Yates tells White House counsel Don McGahn that Flynn was interviewed by the FBI, and McGahn asks "how'd he do?" Yates doesn't answer, but McGahn comes back the afternoon of the 27th 




Trump will echo this claim that Flynn did nothing wrong, despite Yate's warning to the White House, Flynn being interviewed by the FBI on White House grounds , and the Wall Street Journal and other outlets reporting that Flynn is under investigation.




It's Trump truly believed the Washington Post report of the Wall Street Joural


It's interesting that Trump claims to believe the Washington Post over the Wall Street Journal--Actually,




-----


http://www.thompsontimeline.com/congressional-testimony-of-fbi-director-james-comey/
	CHAFFETZ: You did not look at testimony that Hillary Clinton gave in the United State Congress, both the House and the Senate.

	...Did you review and look at those transcripts as to the intent of your recommendation.

	COMEY: I’m sure my folks did. I did not.


	...DESJARLAIS: OK. Do you know if she asked her whether she stands by the fact she that said she just used one device and that was for her convenience?

	COMEY: I don’t know. I know they established, in talking to her, she used many devices during her four years. So I don’t know whether they asked her specifically about that statement. That’s easy to check, though.

	DESJARLAIS: OK. I guess my point is, you’re trying to get inside the head of Hillary Clinton in this investigation and know whether there was intent. And so we all know what she told the people. That has been well-documented.

	She said that she did not do those things, that she did not send or receive classified e-mails, that she used one server and one device for her convenience.

	And since then, I think even in your statement, you recognize that those were not correct. Is that fair?

	COMEY: I really don’t want to get in the business of trying to parse and judge her public statements. And so I think I’ve tried to avoid doing that sitting here.

	DESJARLAIS: Why do you feel that’s important?

	COMEY: Because what matters to me is what did she say to the FBI.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	SEN. DIANNE FEINSTEIN: Thanks very much, Mr. Chairman. Mr. Comey, I just want you to know that I have great respect for you. Senator Cornyn and I sit on the judiciary committee and we have the occasion to have you before us. You're a man of strength and I regret the situations we all find ourselves in. I just want to say that. Let me begin with one overarching question. Why do you believe you were fired?

	COMEY: I guess I don't know for sure. I believe — I think the president, at his word, that I was fired because of the Russia investigation. Something about the way I was conducting it, the president felt created pressure on him that he wanted to relieve. Again, I didn't know that at the time. I watched his interview. I read the press accounts of his conversations. I take him at his word there. Look, I could be wrong. Maybe he's saying something that's not true. I take him at his word, at least based on what I know now. 








http://www.thompsontimeline.com/congressional-testimony-of-fbi-director-james-comey/
	COMEY: ...ignorance of the law is no excuse, but here’s the distinction. You have to have general criminal intent. You don’t need to know what particular statute you’re violating, but you must be aware of the generally wrongful nature of your conduct…


http://www.thompsontimeline.com/congressional-testimony-of-fbi-director-james-comey/
	COMEY: In our system of law, there’s a thing called mens rea. It’s important to know what you did and when you did it. This Latin phrase “mens rea” means, “What were you thinking?”

	We don’t want to put people in jail unless we prove that they knew they were doing something they shouldn’t do.

	...At the time Congress passed that statute in 1917, there was a lot of concern in the House and Senate about whether that was going to violate the American tradition of requiring that before you go and lock somebody up, you proved they knew they were doing something wrong. So there was a lot of concern about it.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	FEINSTEIN: Now, here's the question, you're big. You're strong. I know the oval office, and I know what happens to people when they walk in. There is a certain amount of intimidation. But why didn't you stop and say, Mr. President, this is wrong. I cannot discuss this with you.

	COMEY: It's a great question. Maybe if I were stronger, I would have. I was so stunned by the conversation that I just took in. The only thing I could think to say, because I was playing in my mind -- because I could remember every word he said -- I was playing in my mind, what should my response be? That's why I carefully chose the words. Look, I've seen the tweet about tapes. Lordy, I hope there are tapes. I remember saying, “I agree he is a good guy,” as a way of saying, I'm not agreeing with what you asked me to do. Again, maybe other people would be stronger in that circumstance. That's how Ed myself. I hope I'll never have another opportunity. Maybe if I did it again, I'd do it better. 

	...FEINSTEIN: You told the president, I would see what we could do. What did you mean?

	COMEY: It was kind of a cowardly way of trying to avoid telling him, we're not going to do that. That I would see what we could do. It was a way of kind of getting off the phone, frankly, and then I turned and handed it to the acting deputy attorney general. 

	...RUBIO: At the time, did you say something to the president about, that is not an appropriate request, or did you tell the white house counsel, it's not an appropriate request? Someone needs to tell the president he can't do these things.

	COMEY: I didn't, no.

	RUBIO: Why?

	COMEY: I don't know. I think -- as I said earlier, I think the circumstances were such that it was -- I was a bit stunned and didn't have the presence of mind. I don't know. I don't want to make you sound like I'm captain courageous. I don't know if I would have said to the president with the presence of mind, sir, that's wrong. In the moment, it didn't come to my mind. What came to my mind is be careful what you say. I said, I agree Flynn is a good guy. 




	...COLLINS: I'd like to now turn to the conversations with the president about Michael Flynn, which had been discussed at great length.

	First, let me make very clear that the president never should have cleared the room and he never should have asked you, as you reported, to let it go, to let the investigation go. But I remain puzzled by your response. Michael Flynn is a good guy. You could have said, Mr. President, this meeting is inappropriate. This response could compromise the investigation. You should not be making such a request. It's fundamental to the operation of our government, the FBI be insulated from this kind of political pressure. You talked a bit today about that you were stunned by the president making the request. But my question to you is later on, upon reflection, did you go to anyone at the department of justice and ask them to call the white house counsel's office and explain that the president had to have a far better understanding and appreciation of his role vis-à-vis the FBI?

	COMEY: In general, I did. I spoke to the attorney general and spoke to the new deputy attorney general, Mr. Rosenstein, when he took office and explained my serious concern about the way in which the president is interacting, especially with the FBI. As I said in my testimony, I told the attorney general, it can't happen that you get kicked out of the room and the president talks to me. Why didn't we raise the specific? It was of investigative interest to figure out, what just happened with the president's request? I wouldn't want to alert the white house it had happened until we figured out what we were going to do with it investigatively.

	COLLINS: Your testimony was that you went to attorney general sessions and said, don't ever leave me alone with him again. Are you saying that you also told him that he had made a request that you let it go with regard to part of the investigation of Michael Flynn?

	COMEY: No. I specifically did not. I did not. 


	...FEINSTEIN: You have the president of the United States asking you to stop an investigation that is an important investigation. What was the response of your colleagues?

	COMEY: I think they were as shocked and troubled by it as I was. Some said things that led me to believe that. I don't remember exactly. But the reaction was similar to mine. They're all experienced people who never experienced such a thing, so they were very concerned. Then the conversation turned to about, so what should we do with this information? That was a struggle for us. Because we are the leaders of the FBI, so it's been reported to us, and I heard it and now shared it with the leaders of the FBI, our conversation was, should we share this with any senior officials at the justice department? Our primary concern was, we can't infect the investigative team. We don't want the agents and analysts working on this to know the president of the united States has asked, and when it comes from the president, I took it as a direction, to get rid of this investigation because we're not going to follow that request. So we decided, we have to keep it away from our troops.

	Is there anyone else we ought to tell at the justice department? We considered whether to tell -- the attorney general said we believe rightly he was shortly going to recuse. There was no other senate confirmed leaders in the justice department at that point. The deputy attorney general was Mr. Boente, acting shortly in the seat. We decided the best move would be to hold it, keep it in a box, document it, as we'd already done, and this investigation is going to do on. Figure out what to do with it down the road. Is there a way to corroborate it? It was our word against the president's. No way to corroborate this. My view of this changed when the prospect of tapes was raised. That's how we thought about it then. 





------








http://fortune.com/2016/07/15/hillary-clinton-email-scandal-poll/
	Republicans are also more likely than Democrats to say Clinton's email use is a major problem, 85 percent to 22 percent. But 49 percent of Democrats say it's a minor problem, while just 29 percent don't think it's a problem at all.








------


...

probably: discredit/politicize USIC
ruin USIC capabilities
politicize/cast doubt on Russian methods


I guess it does make sense to:

politicize CIA/narrative of Russian intervention as much as possible so that Repulicans, who typically like CIA/hate Russia, are reversed

utterly destroy the narrative and USIC by reveailing Russia narrative to be fake (dossier, intel leak thing, maybe hacking, others?) and USIC top levels to be corrupt and scheming

Republicans continue to hate CIA distrust Russia narratives

liberals confused, defeated, maybe feel betrayed by USIC 

key is that Republicans tend to be more bullheaded, so this wouldn't work as well the other way around

would likely rely, in their view, on liberals soul searching and tears to finish off themselves

fuck I'm cold

this has gotten to my head lol

but best case scenario for them is both Republicans and Democrats end up distrusting USIC


Politicizing any idea, event, institution, person, thing, etc. makes it easier for propagandists to control public perception around said thing.


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/first-read/democrats-now-give-cia-higher-marks-republicans-do-s-really-n703206



------






http://www.nationalreview.com/article/448480/james-comey-testimony-obstruction-justice-not-proven


------


Trump asking Comey to stay:

Trump might know Comey is known to threaten to quit? And that this causes problems...

Trump also says his advisors told him good things about Comey iirc?

And Trump got a "favor" from Comey, at least in his view


------


Comey wants people to think Trump is dirty:



http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	WARNER: ...Now you've had extensive experience at the department of justice and at the FBI. You've worked under presidents of both parties. What was about that meeting that led you to determine that you needed to start putting down a written record?

	COMEY: A combination of things. I think the circumstances, the subject matter, and the person I was interacting with. Circumstances, first, I was alone with the president of the United States, or the president-elect, soon to be president. The subject matter I was talking about matters that touch on the FBI's core responsibility, and that relate to the president, president-elect personally, and then the nature of the person. I was honestly concerned he might lie about the nature of our meeting so I thought it important to document. 




	WARNER: ...you should be prepared to assure then President-elect Trump that the FBI was not investigating him personally. Now, I understand that your leadership team, agreed with that but was that a unanimous decision? Was there any debate about that?

	COMEY: Wasn't unanimous. One of the members of the leadership team had a view you that although it was technically true we did not have a counter-intelligence file case open on then President-elect Trump. His concern was because we're looking at the potential, again, that's the subject of the investigation, coordination between the campaign and Russia, because it was President Trump, President-elect Trump's campaign, this person's view was inevitably his behavior, his conduct will fall within the scope of that work. And so he was reluctant to make the statement. I disagreed. I thought it was fair to say what was literally true. There was not a counterintelligence investigation of Mr. Trump, and I decided in the moment to say it, given the nature of our conversation.

	WARNER: At that moment in time, did you ever revisit that as in the subsequent sessions?

	COMEY: With the FBI leadership team? Sure. And the leader had that view that didn't change. His view was still that it was probably although literally true, his concern was it could be misleading, because the nature of the investigation was such that it might well touch, obviously it would touch, the campaign, and the person that headed the campaign would be the candidate, and so that was his view throughout. 



	WARNER: ...What was your impression, and what did you mean by this notion of a patronage relationship?

	COMEY: Well, my impression, and again it's my impression, I could always be wrong but my common sense told me what was going on is, either he had concluded or someone had told him that you didn't, you've already asked Comey to stay, and you didn't get anything for it.

	And that the dinner was an effort to build a relationship, in fact, he asked specifically, of loyalty in the context of asking me to stay. As I said, what was odd about that is we'd already talked twice about it by that point and he said I very much hope you'll stay. In fact, I just remembered sitting a third, when you've seen the. IC tour of me walking across the blue room, and what the president whispered in my ear was "I really look forward to working with you." So after those encounters -- 

	WARNER: That was a few days before your firing.

	COMEY: On the Sunday after the inauguration. The next Friday I have dinner and the president begins by wanting to talk about my job and so I'm sitting there thinking wait a minute three times we've already, you've already asked me to stay or talked about me staying. My common sense, again I could be wrong but my common sense told me what's going on here is, he's looking to get something in exchange for granting my request to stay in the job. 


-----


Comey interprets Trump saying he was fired because of the Russia investigation:

http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	SEN. DIANNE FEINSTEIN: Thanks very much, Mr. Chairman. Mr. Comey, I just want you to know that I have great respect for you. Senator Cornyn and I sit on the judiciary committee and we have the occasion to have you before us. You're a man of strength and I regret the situations we all find ourselves in. I just want to say that. Let me begin with one overarching question. Why do you believe you were fired?

	COMEY: I guess I don't know for sure. I believe — I think the president, at his word, that I was fired because of the Russia investigation. Something about the way I was conducting it, the president felt created pressure on him that he wanted to relieve. Again, I didn't know that at the time. I watched his interview. I read the press accounts of his conversations. I take him at his word there. Look, I could be wrong. Maybe he's saying something that's not true. I take him at his word, at least based on what I know now. 

	...FEINSTEIN: Do you believe the Russia investigation played a role?

	COMEY: In why I was fired?

	FEINSTEIN: Yes.

	COMEY: Yes. I've seen the president say so. 



	WYDEN: How would you characterize Attorney General Sessions's adherence to his recusal? In particular, with regard to his involvement in your firing, which the president has acknowledged was because of the Russian investigation.

	COMEY: That's a question I can't answer. I think it is a reasonable question. If, as the president said, I was fired because of the Russia investigation, why was the attorney general involved in that chain? I don't know. So I don't have an answer for the question. 



	HEINRICH: Fair enough. Told the reporter he never did that. You've testified that the president asked for your loyalty in that dinner. White house denies that. A lot of this comes down to who should we believe. Do you want to say anything as to why we should believe you?

	COMEY: My mother raised me not to say things like this about myself so I'm not going to. I think people should look at the whole body of my testimony. As I used to say to juries, when I talked about a witness, you can't cherry pick it. You can't say, I like these things he said but on this, he's a ten liar. You have to take it together. 


	HEINRICH: Fair enough. Told the reporter he never did that. You've testified that the president asked for your loyalty in that dinner. White house denies that. A lot of this comes down to who should we believe. Do you want to say anything as to why we should believe you?

	COMEY: My mother raised me not to say things like this about myself so I'm not going to. I think people should look at the whole body of my testimony. As I used to say to juries, when I talked about a witness, you can't cherry pick it. You can't say, I like these things he said but on this, he's a ten liar. You have to take it together. 

>:D


----

Comey interprets Trump's comments as asking him to fire Flynn:



http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	FEINSTEIN: Let's go to the Flynn issue. The senator outlined, “I hope you could see your way to letting Flynn go. He is a good guy. I hope you can let this go.” But you also said in your written remarks, and I quote, that you “had understood the president to be requesting that we drop any investigation of Flynn in connection with false statements about his conversations with the Russian ambassador in December,”. Please go into that with more detail.

	COMEY: Well, the context and the president's word are what led me to that conclusion. As I said in my statement, I could be wrong, but Flynn had been forced to resign the day before. And the controversy around general Flynn at that point in time was centered on whether he lied to the vice president about his nature of conversations with the Russians, whether he had been candid with others in the course of that. So that happens on the day before. On the 1, the president makes reference to that. I understood what he wanted me to do was drop any investigation connected to Flynn's account of his conversations with the Russians. 


	RUBIO: And in that meeting, as you understood it, he was asking not about the general Russia investigation, he was asking specifically about the jeopardy that Flynn was in himself?

	COMEY: That's how I understood it. Yes, sir. 

	RUBIO: As you perceived it, while he hoped you did away with it, you perceived it as an order, given the setting, the position and some of the circumstances?

	COMEY: Yes. 



	RUBIO: The president's wishes were known to them, certainly by the next day when he had a press conference with the prime minister. Going back, the three requests were, number one, be loyal. Number two, let the Mike Flynn thing go. He is a good guy, been treated unfairly. Number three, can you please tell the American people what these leaders in congress already know, which you already know and what you told me three times, that I'm not under personally under investigation.

	COMEY: That's right. 



	WYDEN: Your testimony was that the president's request about Flynn could infect investigation. Had the president got what he wanted and what he asked of you, what would have been the effect on the investigation?

	COMEY: We would have closed any investigation of general Flynn in connection with his statements and encounters -- statements about encounters with Russians in the late part of December. We would have dropped an open criminal investigation. 




------

Comey excuses for not correcting Trump:


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	FEINSTEIN: Now, here's the question, you're big. You're strong. I know the oval office, and I know what happens to people when they walk in. There is a certain amount of intimidation. But why didn't you stop and say, Mr. President, this is wrong. I cannot discuss this with you.

	COMEY: It's a great question. Maybe if I were stronger, I would have. I was so stunned by the conversation that I just took in. The only thing I could think to say, because I was playing in my mind -- because I could remember every word he said -- I was playing in my mind, what should my response be? That's why I carefully chose the words. Look, I've seen the tweet about tapes. Lordy, I hope there are tapes. I remember saying, “I agree he is a good guy,” as a way of saying, I'm not agreeing with what you asked me to do. Again, maybe other people would be stronger in that circumstance. That's how Ed myself. I hope I'll never have another opportunity. Maybe if I did it again, I'd do it better. 




	FEINSTEIN: You told the president, I would see what we could do. What did you mean?

	COMEY: It was kind of a cowardly way of trying to avoid telling him, we're not going to do that. That I would see what we could do. It was a way of kind of getting off the phone, frankly, and then I turned and handed it to the acting deputy attorney general. 


Or Comey could tell him that's innapropriate...


	RUBIO: At the time, did you say something to the president about, that is not an appropriate request, or did you tell the white house counsel, it's not an appropriate request? Someone needs to tell the president he can't do these things.

	COMEY: I didn't, no.

	RUBIO: Why?

	COMEY: I don't know. I think -- as I said earlier, I think the circumstances were such that it was -- I was a bit stunned and didn't have the presence of mind. I don't know. I don't want to make you sound like I'm captain courageous. I don't know if I would have said to the president with the presence of mind, sir, that's wrong. In the moment, it didn't come to my mind. What came to my mind is be careful what you say. I said, I agree Flynn is a good guy. 



	COLLINS: I'd like to now turn to the conversations with the president about Michael Flynn, which had been discussed at great length.

	First, let me make very clear that the president never should have cleared the room and he never should have asked you, as you reported, to let it go, to let the investigation go. But I remain puzzled by your response. Michael Flynn is a good guy. You could have said, Mr. President, this meeting is inappropriate. This response could compromise the investigation. You should not be making such a request. It's fundamental to the operation of our government, the FBI be insulated from this kind of political pressure. You talked a bit today about that you were stunned by the president making the request. But my question to you is later on, upon reflection, did you go to anyone at the department of justice and ask them to call the white house counsel's office and explain that the president had to have a far better understanding and appreciation of his role vis-à-vis the FBI?

	COMEY: In general, I did. I spoke to the attorney general and spoke to the new deputy attorney general, Mr. Rosenstein, when he took office and explained my serious concern about the way in which the president is interacting, especially with the FBI. As I said in my testimony, I told the attorney general, it can't happen that you get kicked out of the room and the president talks to me. Why didn't we raise the specific? It was of investigative interest to figure out, what just happened with the president's request? I wouldn't want to alert the white house it had happened until we figured out what we were going to do with it investigatively.

	COLLINS: Your testimony was that you went to attorney general sessions and said, don't ever leave me alone with him again. Are you saying that you also told him that he had made a request that you let it go with regard to part of the investigation of Michael Flynn?

	COMEY: No. I specifically did not. I did not. 


------

what is cloud



FEINSTEIN: You describe two phone calls that you received from president trump. One on March 30th and one on April 11. He, quote, described the Russia investigation as a cloud that was impairing his ability, end quote, as president, and asked you, quote, to lift the cloud, end quote. How did you interpret that? What did you believe he wanted you to do?

COMEY: I interpreted that as he was frustrated that the Russia investigation was taking up so much time and energy. I think he meant of the executive branch, but in the public square in general. It was making it difficult for him to focus on other priorities of his. But what he asked me was actually narrowing than that. I think what he meant by the cloud — and, again, I could be wrong — but the entire investigation is taking up oxygen and making it hard for me to focus on what I want to focus on. The ask was to get it out that I, the president, am not personally under investigation.

FEINSTEIN: After April 11th, did he ask you more ever about the Russia investigation? Did he ask you any questions?

COMEY: We never spoke again after April 11th.

FEINSTEIN: You told the president, I would see what we could do. What did you mean?

COMEY: It was kind of a cowardly way of trying to avoid telling him, we're not going to do that. That I would see what we could do. It was a way of kind of getting off the phone, frankly, and then I turned and handed it to the acting deputy attorney general.

FEINSTEIN: So I want to go into that. Who did you talk with about that, lifting the cloud, stop the investigation back at the FBI, and what was their response?

COMEY: The FBI, during one of the two conversations — I'm not remembering exactly — I think the first, my chief of staff was sitting in front of me and heard my end of the conversation because the president's call was a surprise. I discussed the lifting the cloud and the request with the senior leadership team who, typically, and I think in all the circumstances, was the deputy director, my chief of staff, the general counsel, the deputy director's chief counsel and, I think in a number of circumstances, the number three in the FBI and a few of the conversations included the head of the national security branch. The group of us that lead the FBI when it comes to national security.

FEINSTEIN: You have the president of the United States asking you to stop an investigation that is an important investigation. What was the response of your colleagues?

COMEY: I think they were as shocked and troubled by it as I was. Some said things that led me to believe that. I don't remember exactly. But the reaction was similar to mine. They're all experienced people who never experienced such a thing, so they were very concerned. Then the conversation turned to about, so what should we do with this information? That was a struggle for us. Because we are the leaders of the FBI, so it's been reported to us, and I heard it and now shared it with the leaders of the FBI, our conversation was, should we share this with any senior officials at the justice department? Our primary concern was, we can't infect the investigative team. We don't want the agents and analysts working on this to know the president of the united States has asked, and when it comes from the president, I took it as a direction, to get rid of this investigation because we're not going to follow that request. So we decided, we have to keep it away from our troops.

Is there anyone else we ought to tell at the justice department? We considered whether to tell -- the attorney general said we believe rightly he was shortly going to recuse. There was no other senate confirmed leaders in the justice department at that point. The deputy attorney general was Mr. Boente, acting shortly in the seat. We decided the best move would be to hold it, keep it in a box, document it, as we'd already done, and this investigation is going to do on. Figure out what to do with it down the road. Is there a way to corroborate it? It was our word against the president's. No way to corroborate this. My view of this changed when the prospect of tapes was raised. That's how we thought about it then.

FEINSTEIN: Thank you, Mr. Chairman.


So did Comey interpret the request as asking to get out that he was not under investigation? or "chill" the invetigation? or to "get it out there" and clear the air?



http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	FEINSTEIN: You describe two phone calls that you received from president trump. One on March 30th and one on April 11. He, quote, described the Russia investigation as a cloud that was impairing his ability, end quote, as president, and asked you, quote, to lift the cloud, end quote. How did you interpret that? What did you believe he wanted you to do?

	COMEY: I interpreted that as he was frustrated that the Russia investigation was taking up so much time and energy. I think he meant of the executive branch, but in the public square in general. It was making it difficult for him to focus on other priorities of his. But what he asked me was actually narrowing than that. I think what he meant by the cloud — and, again, I could be wrong — but the entire investigation is taking up oxygen and making it hard for me to focus on what I want to focus on. The ask was to get it out that I, the president, am not personally under investigation. 



	RUBIO: Are those the only two instances in which that back and forth happened, where the president was basically saying, and I'm paraphrasing here, it's okay. Do the Russia investigation. I hope it all comes out. I have nothing to do with anything Russia. It'd be great if it all came out, people around me were doing things that were wrong?

	COMEY: Yes. As I recorded it accurately there. That was the sentiment he was expressing. Yes, sir. 





------


fucking over the president


http://www.npr.org/2017/06/07/531643428/comey-opening-statement-for-senate-intelligence-hearing-annotated
	The IC leadership thought it important, for a variety of reasons, to alert the incoming President to the existence of this material, even though it was salacious and unverified. Among those reasons were: (1) we knew the media was about to publicly report the material and we believed the IC should not keep knowledge of the material and its imminent release from the President-Elect; and (2) to the extent there was some effort to compromise an incoming President, we could blunt any such effort with a defensive briefing.

	The Director of National Intelligence asked that I personally do this portion of the briefing because I was staying in my position and because the material implicated the FBI’s counter-intelligence responsibilities. We also agreed I would do it alone to minimize potential embarrassment to the President-Elect. Although we agreed it made sense for me to do the briefing, the FBI’s leadership and I were concerned that the briefing might create a situation where a new President came into office uncertain about whether the FBI was conducting a counter-intelligence investigation of his personal conduct. 




http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	COLLINS: Did you limit that statement to counterintelligence invest -- investigations, or were you talking about any FBI investigation?

	COMEY: I didn't use the term counterintelligence. I was briefing him about salacious and unverified material. It was in a context of that that he had a strong and defensive reaction about that not being true. My reading of it was it was important for me to assure him we were not person investigating him. So the context then was actually narrower, focused on what I just talked to him about. It was very important because it was, first, true, and second, I was worried very much about being in kind of a Jay Hoover type situation. I didn't want him thinking I was briefing him on this to sort of hang it over him in some way. I was briefing him on it because, because we had been told by the media it was about to launch. We didn't want to be keeping that from him. He needed to know this was being said. I was very keen not to leave him with an impression that the bureau was trying to do something to him. So that's the context in which I said, sir, we're not personally investigating you. 





	RUBIO: What he was asking you to do, would you have done here today?

	COMEY: Correct. Yes, sir. 



	COLLINS: Then on the January 27th dinner, you told the president that he should be careful about asking you to investigate because, “you might create a narrative that we are investigating him personally, which we weren't.” Again, were you limiting that statement to counterintelligence investigations, or more broadly, such as a criminal investigation?

	COMEY: I didn't modify the word investigation. It was, again, he was reacting strongly against the unverified material, saying I'm tempted to order you to investigate it. In the context of that, I said, sir, be careful about it. I might create a narrative we're investigating you personally. 



So Comey created perception that Trump was under investigation, says he would clear him, says "careful if we do anything about it we will create a narrative we're investigating you," then never bothers to actually do it, or really just shoot down the stupid dossier which is what he should have done all along anyway




So Comey is saying he needed to brief Trump on this because it was about to leak and he should know, and that he might be compromised.

But why conclude that? the dossier is sketchy

------

Comey docs mayb inadmissible:


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	BLUNT: So you didn't consider your memo or your sense of that conversation to be a government document. You considered it to be, somehow, your own personal document that you could share to the media as you wanted through a friend?

	COMEY: Correct. I understood this to be my recollection recorded of my conversation with the president. As a private citizen, I thought it important to get it out.

	BLUNT: Were all your memos that you recorded on classified or other ds memos that might be yours as a private citizen?

	COMEY: I'm not following the question.

	BLUNT: You said you used classified --

	COMEY: Not the classified documents. Unclassified. I don't have any of them anymore. I gave them to the special counsel. My view was that the content of those unclassified, memorialization of those conversations was my recollection recorded. 


	KING: With regard to your memos, isn't it true that in a court case when you're weighing evidence, contemporaneous memos and contemporaneous statements to third parties are considered probative in terms of the validity of testimony?

	COMEY: Yes.

	KING: Thank you. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 





------


http://www.npr.org/2017/06/07/531643428/comey-opening-statement-for-senate-intelligence-hearing-annotated
	The IC leadership thought it important, for a variety of reasons, to alert the incoming President to the existence of this material, even though it was salacious and unverified. Among those reasons were: (1) we knew the media was about to publicly report the material and we believed the IC should not keep knowledge of the material and its imminent release from the President-Elect; and (2) to the extent there was some effort to compromise an incoming President, we could blunt any such effort with a defensive briefing.

	The Director of National Intelligence asked that I personally do this portion of the briefing because I was staying in my position and because the material implicated the FBI’s counter-intelligence responsibilities. We also agreed I would do it alone to minimize potential embarrassment to the President-Elect. Although we agreed it made sense for me to do the briefing, the FBI’s leadership and I were concerned that the briefing might create a situation where a new President came into office uncertain about whether the FBI was conducting a counter-intelligence investigation of his personal conduct. 


http://time.com/4810345/james-comey-testimony-real-time-transcript/
	James Comey: ...I was speaking to him and briefing him about some salacious and unverified material. It was in a context of that that he had a strong and defensive reaction about that not being true, and my reading of it was, It was important for me to assure him we were not personally investigating him, and so the context then was actually narrower, focused on what I just talked to him about but very important because it was first true and second I was very, very much about being in kind of a -- kind of a J. Edgar Hoover type situation. I didn't want him thinking I was briefing him on this, to sort of hang it over him in some way, I was briefing him on it because we had been told by the media it was about to launch, we don't want to be keeping that from him, and if there was -- he needed to know this was being said. But I was very keen not to leave him with an impression that the bureau was trying to do something to him, and so that's the context in which I said, sir, we're not personally investigating you.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/03/read-the-full-testimony-of-fbi-director-james-comey-in-which-he-discusses-clinton-email-investigation/
	GRAHAM: Do you agree with me that a fusion was involved in preparing the dossier against Donald Trump? That would be interfering in our election by the Russians?

	COMEY: I don't want to say.




https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/03/20/full-transcript-fbi-director-james-comey-testifies-on-russian-interference-in-2016-election/
	KING: ...I think it was on January 6, when yourself, Admiral Rogers, Director Brennan, and General Clapper went to Trump tower to meet with President Trump. The media reports are that at the end of that meeting, Director Comey, you presented president-elect Trump with a copy of the now infamous or famous dossier. And I don't know how many people were in the room, but within hours, that was leaked to the media and that gave the media the excuse or the rationale to publish almost the entire dossier.

	Do you -- does that violate any law? I mean you were at a classified briefing with the president-elect of the United States and it had to be a very, very small universe of people who knew that you handed them that dossier and it was leaked out within hours. Are you making any effort to find out who leaked it and do you believe that constitute a criminal violation?

	COMEY: I can't say, Mr. King except I can answer in general.




https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/who-is-source-d-the-man-said-to-be-behind-the-trump-russia-dossiers-most-salacious-claim/2017/03/29/379846a8-0f53-11e7-9d5a-a83e627dc120_story.html
	In addition to the salacious allegations that gained widespread attention, the dossier attributed other claims to Millian.

	Over the summer, as Trump prepared to accept the Republican presidential nomination, Millian traveled to Russia. He posted pictures on his Facebook page showing that he attended a ­Russian government-sponsored summit in St. Petersburg in June. One photograph shows him with Russia’s minister for energy. Another shows him chatting with Russian aluminum magnate Oleg Deripaska, who is close to Putin. A spokeswoman for Deripaska declined to comment. A spokesman for the Russian Embassy did not respond to questions about Millian.

	Later in the summer, Millian continued boasting of his Trump connections.

	He told ABC News that he had been the “official broker” for the Trump-branded condo building and described Trump’s affinity for working with Russians. He pointed to “hundreds of millions of dollars that [Trump] received from interactions with Russian businessmen.”

	Millian added that Trump “likes Russia because he likes beautiful Russian ladies — talking to them, of course. And he likes to be able to make lots of money with Russians.”

	Millian told ABC that he was “absolutely not” involved with Russian intelligence. But when asked whether he had heard rumors to that effect, Millian replied, “Yes, of course.”




https://www.nytimes.com/2017/06/08/us/politics/senate-hearing-transcript.html
	HARRIS: Has anything you’ve learned in the months since your February 14th meeting changed your understanding of the president’s request? I guess it would be what he has said in public documents or public interviews?

	COMEY: Correct.







------

Several potentially relevant events lead up to the puzzling January 27th dinner between Trump and Comey:

- Trump has blamed the leak of the dossier on the IC, and appears to think U.S. intelligence agencies are leaking information on the Russia investigation out of hostility toward him.

- The Trump administration denied coordinating Flynn's contacts with the Russian ambassador and claimed they were innocuous, but the circumstances surrounding the calls hint at criminality or wrongdoing by Trump.

- Comey assured Trump he was not under investigation and refused to confirm the Russia investigation, and Trump has acted friendly toward Comey after others called for his resignation.

- According to Comey, Trump had asked Comey to stay on during the January 6th briefing, before the calls for Comey to resign. Comey also assured Trump he was not under investigation during this briefing, but this was before the "secret CIA assessment" and media reports on potential misconducted surrounding Flynn's contacts with the Russians.

- Meanwhile, Trump has been briefed that Wikileaks is affiliated with Russian intelligence, and Wikileaks has threatened to release Trump's tax returns.

In this context, Trump learns the following in the week leading up to the dinner:

- Carol Lee, Devlin Barrett, and Shane Harris of The Wall Street Journal report on Jan 22 that multiple U.S. intelligence agencies are investigating Flynn's contacts with the Russian ambassador.

- Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller of The Washington Post report on Jan 23 that the FBI found no wronging and Flynn is not under investigation.

- Matt Zapotosky, Ellen Nakashima, and Greg Miller of The Washington Post and Adam Goldman of the NY Times report on Jan 24 that Trump intends to keep Comey as FBI Director.

Speaking later of the Jan 27th dinner, Trump tells Lester Holt that Comey had "wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on," contradicting these reports. But Comey later testified that he never asked Trump to meet for dinner.

Trump will also claim he was "surprised" by Yates warnings about Flynn, as he "read various articles" saying Flynn "was just doing his job," indicating an awareness of the Jan 23 Washington Post report (the source for the "Flynn cleared of wrongdoing" story). Trump is also aware of the Jan 22 Wall Street Journal report--the WaPo report references it and the White House had commented on it. It is unclear if Trump was aware of the Jan 23rd CNN report independently corroborating the Jan 22 WSJ report.

Did Trump honestly believe the WaPo report over the WSJ report that Flynn "did nothing wrong?" It is hard to believe--Trump has said the Wall Street Journal and "financial media" are "much better, much more honest" than "the political media," and the Trump campaign had previously revoked The Washington Post's press credentials for "incredibly inaccurate coverage." On top of this, Flynn was interviewed by the FBI at the White House on the 24th  (and so adding FBI agents to the WH visitor logs) and on the 26th, Yates told the White House that Flynn was under investigation and the DOJ had evidence of misconduct.

After learning about FLynn's conduct, it looks like Trump was worried about a criminal investigation: on the 27th, McGahn came back to the DOJ with requests to see the underlying evidence and to discuss "the applicability of certain criminal statues" and "the likelihood that the Department of Justice would pursue a criminal case." In particular, it looks like Trump was worried about a criminal investigation of himself: 



at their Jan 26th meeting, Yates tells White House counsel Don McGahn that Flynn was interviewed by the FBI, and McGahn asks "how'd he do?" Yates doesn't answer, but McGahn comes back the afternoon of the 27th 




Trump will echo this claim that Flynn did nothing wrong, despite Yate's warning to the White House, Flynn being interviewed by the FBI on White House grounds , and the Wall Street Journal and other outlets reporting that Flynn is under investigation.




It's Trump truly believed the Washington Post report of the Wall Street Joural


It's interesting that Trump claims to believe the Washington Post over the Wall Street Journal--Actually,
